COMMUNIPAW.
It
used to be a favorite assertion of the venerable Diedrich
Knickerbocker, that there was no region more rich in themes
for the writer of historic novels, heroic melodramas, and
rough-shod epics, than the ancient province of the New
Netherlands, and its quondam capital, at the Manhattoes.
We live, he used to say, in the midst of history, mystery,
and romance; he who would find these elements, however,
must not seek them among the modern improvements and
monied people of the monied metropolis; he must dig for
them, as for Kidd the pirate's treasures, in out of the way
places, and among the ruins of the past. Never did sage
speak more truly. Poetry and romance received a fatal blow
at the overthrow of the ancient Dutch dynasty, and have ever
since been gradually withering under the growing domination
of the Yankees. They abandoned our hearths when the old
Dutch tiles were superseded by marble chimney pieces; when
brass andirons made way for polished grates, and the
crackling
and blazing fire of nut wood gave place to the smoke and
stench of Liverpool coal; and on the downfall of the last
crow-step gables, their requiem was tolled from the tower of
the Dutch Church in Nassau street, by the old bell that came
from Holland. But poetry and romance still lurk unseen
among us, or seen only by the enlightened few who are able
to contemplate the common-place scenes and objects of the
metropolis, through the medium of tradition, and clothed with
the associations of foregone ages.
He who would seek these elements in the country, must
avoid all turnpikes, railroads, steamboats, and other
abominable
inventions, by which the usurping Yankees are
strengthening
themselves in the land, and subduing everything to utility
and common-place. He must avoid all towns and cities of
white clapboard palaces, and Grecian temples, studded with
academies, seminaries, and institutes, which glisten
along our bays and rivers; these are the strongholds of Yankee
usurpation; but should he haply light upon some rough,
rambling
road, winding between stone fences, grey with moss, and
overgrown with elder, poke berry, mullein, and sweet brier,
and here and there a low, red-roofed, whitewashed
farmhouse
,
cowering among apple and cherry trees; an old stone
church, with elms, willows, and button-wood, as old looking
as itself, and tombstones almost buried in their own graves,
and peradventure a small log-built school-house, at a
crossroad
,
where the English language is still taught, with a
thickness
of the tongue instead of a twang of the nose, he may thank
his stars that he has found one of the lingering haunts of
poetry and romance.
Among these favored places, the renowned village of
Communipaw
was ever held by the historian of New Amsterdam
in especial veneration. Here the intrepid crew of the Goede
Vrouw first cast the seeds of empire. Hence proceeded the
expedition under Oloffe, the Dreamer, to found the city of New
Amsterdam, vulgarly called New York, which, inheriting the
genius of its founder, has ever been a city of dreams and
speculations. Communipaw, therefore, may truly be called
the parent of New York, though, on comparing the lowly
village
with the great flaunting city which it has engendered, one
is forcibly reminded of a squat little hen that has
unwittingly
hatched out a long-legged turkey.
It is a mirror also of New Amsterdam, as it was before the
conquest. Everything bears the stamp of the days of Oloffe,
the Dreamer, Walter, the Doubter, and the other worthies
of the golden age; the same gable-fronted houses,
surmounted
with weathercocks, the same knee-buckles and
shoe-buckles, and close quilled caps, and linsey woolsey
petticoats
,
and multifarious breeches. In a word, Communipaw is
a little Dutch Herculaneum or Pompeii, where the reliques of
the classic days of the New Netherlands are preserved in their
pristine state, with the exception that they have never been
buried.
The secret of all this wonderful conservation is simple. At
the time that New Amsterdam was subjugated by the Yankees
and their British allies, as Spain was, in ancient days, by the
Saracens, a great dispersion took place among the inhabitants.
One resolute band determined never to bend their necks to the
yoke of the invaders, and, led by Garret Van Horne, a gigantic
Dutchman, the Pelaye of the New Netherlands, crossed the
bay, and buried themselves among the marshes of
Communipaw
,
as did the Spaniards of yore among the Asturian
mountains
.
Here they cut off all communication with the captured
city, forbade the English language to be spoken in their
community
,
kept themselves free from foreign marriage and
intermixture
,
and have thus remained the pure Dutch seed of the
Manhattoes, with which the city may be repeopled, whenever
it is effectually delivered from the Yankees.
The citadel erected by Garret Van Horne exists to this day
in possession of his descendants, and is known by the lordly
appellation of The House of the four Chimneys, from having a
chimney perched like a turret at every corner. Here are to be
seen articles of furniture which came over with the first settlers
from Holland; ancient chests of drawers, and massive clothes
presses, quaintly carved, and waxed and polished until they shine
like mirrors. Here are old black letter volumes with brass
clasps, printed of yore in Leyden, and handed down from
generation to generation, but never read. Also old parchment
deeds in Dutch and English, bearing the seals of the early
governors of the province.
In this house the primitive Dutch Holy Days of Paas and
Pinxter, are faithfully kept up, and New Year celebrated with
cookies and cherry bounce; nor is the festival of the good St.
Nicholas forgotten; when all the children are sure to hang up
their stockings, and to have them filled according to their
deserts; though it is said the good Saint is occasionally
perplexed
in his nocturnal visits, which chimney to descend. A
tradition exists concerning this mansion, which, however
dubious it may seem, is treasured up with good faith by the
inhabitants. It is said that at the founding of it St. Nicholas
took it under his protection, and the Dutch Dominie of the
place, who was a kind of soothsayer, predicted that as long
as these four chimneys stood Communipaw would flourish.
Now it came to pass that some years since, during the great
mania for land speculation, a Yankee speculator found his way
into the Communipaw; bewildered the old burghers with a
project to erect their village into a great sea-port; made a
lithographic map, in which their oyster beds were transformed
into docks and quays, their cabbage gardens laid out in town
lots and squares, and the House of the Four Chimneys
metamorphosed
into a great bank, with granite pillars, which was
to enrich the whole neighborhood with paper money.
Fortunately at this juncture there rose a high wind, which
shook the venerable pile to its foundation, toppled down one of
the chimneys, and blew off a weathercock, the lord knows
whither. The community took the alarm, they drove the land
speculator from their shores, and since that day not a Yankee
has dared to show his face in Communipaw.
The following legend concerning this venerable place was
found among the papers of the authentic Diedrich.
GUESTS FROM GIBBET ISLAND.
A LEGEND OF COMMUNIPAW.
Whoever
has visited the ancient and renowned village of
Communipaw, may have noticed an old stone building, of most
ruinous and sinister appearance. The doors and
window-shutters
are ready to drop from their hinges; old clothes are
stuffed in the broken panes of glass, while legions of
half-starved
dogs prowl about the premises, and rush out and bark
at every passer by; for your beggarly house in a village is
most apt to swarm with profligate and ill-conditioned dogs.
What adds to the sinister appearance of this mansion, is a tall
frame in front, not a little resembling a gallows, and which
looks as if waiting to accommodate some of the inhabitants with
a well-merited airing. It is not a gallows, however, but an
ancient sign-post; for this dwelling, in the golden days of
Communipaw, was one of the most orderly and peaceful of
village taverns, where all the public affairs of Communipaw
were talked and smoked over. In fact, it was in this very
building that Oloffe the Dreamer, and his companions,
concerted
that great voyage of discovery and colonization, in
which they explored Buttermilk Channel, were nearly
shipwrecked
in the strait of Hell-gate, and finally landed on the
Island
of Manhattan, and founded the great city of New Amsterdam.
Even after the province had been cruelly wrested from the
sway of their High Mightinesses, by the combined forces of
the British and the Yankees, this tavern continued its ancient
loyalty. It is true, the head of the Prince of Orange
disappeared
from the sign; a strange bird being painted over it,
with the explanatory legend of
Die Wilde Gans
, or The
Wild Goose; but this all the world knew to be a sly riddle of
the landlord, the worthy Teunis Van Gleson, a knowing man
in a small way, who laid his finger beside his nose and winked,
when any one studied the signification of his sign, and observed
that his goose was hatching, but would join the flock
whenever
they flew over the water; an enigma which was the
perpetual recreation and delight of the loyal but fat-headed
burghers of Communipaw.
Under the sway of this patriotic, though discreet and quiet
publican, the tavern continued to flourish in primeval
tranquillity
,
and was the resort of all true-hearted Nederlanders,
from all parts of Pavonia; who met here quietly and secretly,
to smoke and drink the downfall of Briton and Yankee, and
success to Admiral Von Tromp.
The only drawback on the comfort of the establishment,
was a nephew of mine host, a sister's son, Yan Yost
Vanderscamp
by name, and a real scamp by nature. It is an old
Spanish proverb, worthy of all acceptation, that where God
denies sons the devil sends nephews, and such was the case
in the present instance. This unlucky whipster showed an
early propensity to mischief, which he gratified in a small
way, by playing tricks upon the frequenters of the Wild
Goose; putting gunpowder in their pipes or squibs in their
pockets, and astonishing them with an explosion, while they
sat nodding round the fire-place in the bar-room; and if
perchance a worthy burgher from some distant part of
Pavonia
lingered until dark over his potation, it was odds but
that young Vanderscamp would slip a brier under his horse's
tail, as he mounted, and send him clattering along the road, in
neck-or-nothing style, to his infinite astonishment and
discomfiture
.
It may be wondered at, that mine host of the Wild Goose
did not turn such a graceless varlet out of doors; but Teunis
Van Gieson was an easy-tempered man, and, having no child
of his own, looked upon his nephew with almost parental
indulgence
.
His patience and good nature were doomed to be
tried by another inmate of his mansion. This was a
crossgrained
curmudgeon of a negro, named Pluto, who was a kind
of enigma in Communipaw. Where he came from, nobody
knew. He was found one morning, after a storm, cast like a
sea-monster on the strand, in front of the Wild Goose, and lay
there, more dead than alive. The neighbors gathered round,
and speculated on this production of the deep; whether it were
fish or flesh, or a compound of both, commonly yclept a
merman. The kind-hearted Teunis Van Gieson, seeing that
he wore the human form, took him into his house, and warmed
him into life. By degrees, he showed signs of intelligence, and
even uttered sounds very much like language, but which no
one in Communipaw could understand. Some thought him a
negro just from Guinea, who had either fallen overboard, or
escaped from a slave-ship. Nothing, however, could ever
draw from him any account of his origin. When questioned
on the subject, he merely pointed to Gibbet Island, a small
rocky islet, which lies in the open bay just opposite to
Communipaw
,
as if that were his native place, though everybody
knew it had never been inhabited.
In the process of time, he acquired something of the Dutch
language, that is to say, he learnt all its vocabulary of oaths
and maledictions, with just words sufficient to string them
together. Donder en blicksem!' (thunder and lightning) was
the gentlest of his ejaculations. For years he kept about the
Wild Goose, more like one of those familiar spirits, or
household
goblins, that we read of, than like a human being. He
acknowledged allegiance to no one, but performed various
domestic offices, when it suited his humor; waiting
occasionally
on the guests; grooming the horses, cutting wood, drawing
water; and all this without being ordered. Lay any command
on him, and the stubborn sea-urchin was sure to rebel. He was
never so much at home, however, as when on the water, plying
about in skiff or canoe, entirely alone, fishing, crabbing, or
grabbing for oysters, and would bring home quantities for the
larder of the Wild Goose, which he would throw down at the
kitchen door with a growl. No wind nor weather deterred
him from launching forth on his favorite element: indeed, the
wilder the weather, the more he seemed to enjoy it. If a
storm was brewing, he was sure to put off from shore; and
would be seen far out in the bay, his light skiff dancing like a
feather on the waves, when sea and sky were all in a turmoil,
and the stoutest ships were fain to lower their sails.
Sometimes
,
on such occasions, he would be absent for days together.
How he weathered the tempests, and how and where he
subsisted, no one could divine, nor did any one venture to ask,
for all had an almost superstitious awe of him. Some of the
Communipaw oystermen declared that they had more than
once seen him suddenly disappear, canoe and all, as if they
plunged beneath the waves, and after a while come up again,
in quite a different part of the bay; whence they concluded that
he could live under water like that notable species of wild
duck, commonly called the Hell-diver. All began to consider
him in the light of a foul-weather bird, like the Mother Carey's
Chicken, or stormy Petrel; and whenever they saw him putting
far out in his skiff, in cloudy weather, made up their minds for
a storm.
The only being for whom he seemed to have any liking, was
Yan Yost Vanderscamp, and him he liked for his very
wickedness. He in a manner took the boy under his tutelage,
prompted him to all kinds of mischief, aided him in every wild
harum-searum freak, until the lad became the complete
scapegrace
of the village; a pest to his uncle, and to every one else.
Nor were his pranks confined to the land; he soon learned to
accompany old Pluto on the water. Together these worthies
would cruise about the broad bay, and all the neighboring
straits and rivers; poking around in skiffs and canoes; robbing
the set nets of the fishermen; landing on remote coasts, and
laying waste orchards and water-melon patches; in short,
carrying on a complete system of piracy, on a small scale.
Piloted by Pluto, the youthful Vanderscamp soon became
acquainted with all the bays, rivers, creeks, and inlets of the
watery world around him; could navigate from the Hook to
Spiting-devil on the darkest night, and learned to set even the
terrors of Hell-gate at defiance.
At length, negro and boy suddenly disappeared, and days
and weeks elapsed, but without tidings of them. Some said
they must have run away and gone to sea; others jocosely
hinted, that old Pluto, being no other than a namesake in
disguise
,
had spirited away the boy to the nether regions. All,
however
,
agreed in one thing, that the village was well rid of them.
In the process of time, the good Teunis Van Gieson slept
with his fathers, and the tavern remained shut up, waiting for a
claimant, for the next heir was Yan Yost Vanderscamp, and
he had not been heard of for years. At length, one day, a
boat was seen pulling for shore, from a long, black,
rakishlooking
schooner, which lay at anchor in the bay. The boat's
crew seemed worthy of the craft from which they debarked.
Never had such a set of noisy, roistering, swaggering varlets
landed in peaceful Communipaw. They were outlandish in
garb and demeanor, and were headed by a rough, burly, bully
ruffian, with fiery whiskers, a copper nose, a scar across his
face, and a great Flaunderish beaver slouched on one side of his
head, in whom, to their dismay, the quiet inhabitants were
made to recognise their early pest, Yan Yost Vanderscamp.
The rear of this hopeful gang was brought up by old Pluto,
who had lost an eye, grown grizzly-headed, and looked more
like the devil than ever. Vanderscamp renewed his acquaintance
with the old burghers, much against their will, and in a
manner not at all to their taste. He slapped them familiarly
on the back, gave them an iron grip of the hand, and was hail
fellow well met. According to his own account, he had been
all the world over; had made money by bags full; had ships
in every sea, and now meant to turn the Wild Goose into a
country-seat, where he and his comrades, all rich merchants
from foreign parts, might enjoy themselves in the interval of
their voyages.
Sure enough, in a little while there was a complete
metamorphose
of the Wild Goose. From being a quiet, peaceful
Dutch public house, it became a most riotous, uproarious
private dwelling; a complete rendezvous for boisterous men
of the seas, who came here to have what they call a blow
out on dry land, and might be seen at all hours lounging
about the door, or lolling out of the windows; swearing
among themselves, and cracking rough jokes on every passer
by. The house was fitted up, too, in so strange a manner;
hammocks slung to the walls, instead of bedsteads; odd
kinds of furniture, of foreign fashion; bamboo couches,
Spanish chairs; pistols, cutlasses, and blunderbusses,
suspended
on every peg; silver crucifixes on the mantel-pieces,
silver candlesticks and porringers on the tables, contrasting
oddly with the pewter and Delf ware of the original
establishment
.
And then the strange amusements of these
seamonsters
!
Pitching Spanish dollars, instead of quoits; firing
blunderbusses out of the window; shooting at a mark, or at
any unhappy dog, or cat, or pig, or barn-door fowl, that
might happen to come within reach.
The only being who seemed to relish their rough waggery,
was old Pluto; and yet he led but a dog's life of it; for they
practised all kinds of manual jokes upon him; kicked him
about like a foot-ball; shook him by his grizzly mop of wool,
and never spoke to him without coupling a curse by way of
adjective to his name, and consigning him to the infernal
regions. The old fellow, however, seemed to like them the
better, the more they cursed him, though his utmost
expression
of pleasure never amounted to more than the growl
of a petted bear, when his ears are rubbed.
Old Pluto was the ministering spirit at the orgies of the
Wild Goose; and such orgies as took place there! Such
drinking, singing, whooping, swearing; with an occasional
interlude
of quarrelling and fighting. The noisier grew the
revel, the more old Pluto plied the potations, until the
guests would become frantic in their merriment, smashing
everything to pieces, and throwing the house out of the
windows. Sometimes, after a drinking bout, they sallied
forth and scoured the village, to the dismay of the worthy
burghers, who gathered their women within doors, and would
have shut up the house. Vanderscamp, however, was not to
be rebuffed. He insisted on renewing acquaintance with his
old neighbors, and on introducing his friends, the merchants,
to their families; swore he was on the look-out for a wife,
and meant, before he stopped, to find husbands for all their
daughters. So, will-ye, nill-ye, sociable he was; swaggered
about their best parlors, with his hat on one side of his head;
sat on the good wife's nicely-waxed mahogany table, kicking
his heels against the carved and polished legs; kissed and
tousled the young vrouws; and, if they frowned and pouted,
gave them a gold rosary, or a sparkling cross, to put them in
good humor again.
Sometimes nothing would satisfy him, but he must have
some of his old neighbors to dinner at the Wild Goose.
There was no refusing him, for he had got the complete
upper hand of the community, and the peaceful burghers all
stood in awe of him. But what a time would the quiet,
worthy men have, among these rake-hells, who would delight
to astound them with the most extravagant gunpowder tales,
embroidered with all kinds of foreign oaths; clink the can
with them; pledge them in deep potations; bawl drinking
songs in their ears; and occasionally fire pistols over their
heads, or under the table, and then laugh in their faces, and
ask them how they liked the smell of gunpowder.
Thus was the little village of Communipaw for a time like
the unfortunate wight possessed with devils; until
Vanderscamp
and his brother merchants would sail on another trading
voyage, when the Wild Goose would be shut up, and everything
relapse into quiet, only to be disturbed by his next visitation.
The mystery of all these proceedings gradually dawned
upon the tardy intellects of Communipaw. These were the
times of the notorious Captain Kidd, when the American
harbors were the resorts of piratical adventurers of all kinds,
who, under pretext of mercantile voyages, scoured the West
Indies, made plundering descents upon the Spanish Main,
visited even the remote Indian Seas, and then came to dispose
of their booty, have their revels, and fit out new expeditions, in
the English colonies.
Vanderscamp had served in this hopeful school, and having
risen to importance among the buccaneers, had pitched upon
his native village and early home, as a quiet, out-of-the way,
unsuspected place, where he and his comrades, while
anchored
at New York, might have their feasts, and concert
their plans, without molestation.
At length the attention of the British government was called
to these piratical enterprises, that were becoming so frequent
and outrageous. Vigorous measures were taken to check and
punish them. Several of the most noted freebooters were caught
and executed, and three of Vanderscamp's chosen comrades, the
most riotous swash-bucklers of the Wild Goose, were hanged
in chains on Gibbet Island, in full sight of their favorite
resort. As to Vanderscamp himself, he and his man Pluto
again disappeared, and it was hoped by the people of
Communipaw
that he had fallen in some foreign brawl, or been
swung on some foreign gallows.
For a time, therefore, the tranquillity of the village was
restored
;
the worthy Dutchmen once more smoked their pipes in
peace, eyeing, with peculiar complacency, their old pests
and terrors, the pirates, dangling and drying in the sun, on
Gibbet Island.
This perfect calm was doomed at length to be ruffled. The
fiery persecution of the pirates gradually subsided. Justice
was satisfied with the examples that had been made, and there
was no more talk of Kidd, and the other heroes of like kidney.
On a calm summer evening, a boat, somewhat heavily laden,
was seen pulling into Communipaw. What was the surprise
and disquiet of the inhabitants, to see Yan Yost Vanderscamp
seated at the helm, and his man Pluto tugging at the oar.
Vanderscamp, however, was apparently an altered man. He
brought home with him a wife, who seemed to be a shrew, and
to have the upper hand of him. He no longer was the
swaggering
,
bully ruffian, but affected the regular merchant, and
talked of retiring from business, and settling down quietly, to
pass the rest of his days in his native place.
The Wild Goose mansion was again opened, but with
diminished splendor, and no riot. It is true, Vanderscamp had
frequent nautical visitors, and the sound of revelry was
occasionally
overheard in his house; but everything seemed to be
done under the rose; and old Pluto was the only servant that
officiated at these orgies. The visitors, indeed, were by no
means of the turbulent stamp of their predecessors; but quiet,
mysterious traders, full of nods, and winks, and hieroglyphic
signs, with whom, to use their cant phrase, everything was
smug. Their ships came to anchor at night, in the lower
bay; and, on a private signal, Vanderscamp would launch his
boat, and, accompanied solely by his man Pluto, would make
them mysterious visits. Sometimes boats pulled in at night, in
front of the Wild Goose, and various articles of merchandise
were landed in the dark, and spirited away, nobody knew whither.
One of the more curious of the inhabitants kept watch, and
caught a glimpse of the features of some of these night
visitors
,
by the casual glance of a lantern, and declared that he
recognised more than one of the freebooting frequenters of the
Wild Goose, in former times; from whence he concluded that
Vanderscamp was at his old game, and that this mysterious
merchandise was nothing more nor less than piratical plunder.
The more charitable opinion, however, was, that Vanderscamp
and his comrades, having been driven from their old line of
business, by the oppressions of government, had resorted to
smuggling to make both ends meet.
Be that as it may: I come now to the extraordinary fact,
which is the butt-end of this story. It happened late one
night, than Yan Yost Vanderscamp was returning across the
broad bay, in his light skiff, rowed by his man Pluto. He had
been carousing on board of a vessel, newly arrived, and was
somewhat obfuseated in intellect, by the liquid he had imbibed.
It was a still, sultry night; a heavy mass of lurid clouds was
rising in the west, with the low muttering of distant thunder.
Vanderscamp called on Pluto to pull lustily, that they might
get home before the gathering storm. The old negro made no
reply, but shaped his course so as to skirt the rocky shores of
Gibbet Island. A faint creaking overhead caused Vanderscamp
to cast up his eyes, when, to his horror, he beheld the bodies of
his three pot companions and brothers in iniquity, dangling in
the moonlight, their rags fluttering, and their chains creaking,
as they were slowly swung backward and forward by the rising
breeze.
What do you mean, you blockhead, cried Vanderscamp,
by pulling so close to the island?
I thought you'd be glad to see your old friends once more,
growled the negro; you were never afraid of a living man,
what do you fear from the dead?
Who's afraid? hiccupped Vanderscamp, partly heated by
liquor, partly nettled by the jeer of the negro; who's afraid?
Hang me, but I would be glad to see them once more, alive or
dead, at the Wild Goose. Come, my lads in the wind,
continued
he, taking a draught, and flourishing the bottle above
his head, here's fair weather to you in the other world; and
if you should be walking the rounds to-night, odds fish, but
I'll be happy if you will drop in to supper.
A dismal creaking was the only reply. The wind blew
loud and shrill, and as it whistled round the gallows, and
among the bones, sounded as if there were laughing and
gibbering
in the air. Old Pluto chuckled to himself, and now
pulled for home. The storm burst over the voyagers, while
they were yet far from shore. The rain fell in torrents, the
thunder crashed and pealed, and the lightning kept up an
incessant
blaze. It was stark midnight before they landed at
Communipaw.
Dripping and shivering, Vanderscamp crawled homeward.
He was completely sobered by the storm; the water soaked
from without having diluted and cooled the liquor within.
Arrived at the Wild Goose, he knocked timidly and dubiously
at the door, for he dreaded the reception he was to experience
from his wife. He had reason to do so. She met him at the
threshold, in a precious ill-humor.
Is this a time, said she, to keep people out of their beds,
and to bring home company, to turn the house upside down?
Company? said Vanderscamp meekly, I have brought
no company with me, wife.
No, indeed! they have got here before you, but by your
invitation; and a blessed looking company they are, truly.
Vanderscamp's knees smote together. For the love of
heaven, where are they, wife?
Where?why in the blue room, up stairs, making
themselves
as much at home as if the house were their own.
Vanderscamp made a desperate effort, scrambled up to the
room, and threw open the door. Sure enough, there at a table
on which burned a light as blue as brimstone, sat the three
guests from Gibbet Island, with halters round their necks, and
bobbing their cups together, as if they were hob-or-nobbing,
and trolling the old Dutch freebooter's glee, since translated
into English:
For three merry lads be we,
And three merry lads be we;
I on the land, and thou on the sand,
And Jack on the gallows tree.
Vanderscamp saw and heard no more. Starting back with
horror, he missed his footing on the landing place, and fell
from the top of the stairs to the bottom. He was taken up
speechless, and, either from the fall or the fright, was buried in
the yard of the little Dutch Church at Bergen, on the
following
Sunday.
From that day forward, the fate of the Wild Goose was
sealed. It was pronounced a
haunted house
, and avoided
accordingly
.
No one inhabited it but Vanderscamp's shrew of a
widow, and old Pluto, and they were considered but little
better
than its hobgoblin visitors. Pluto grew more and more
haggard and morose, and looked more like an imp of darkness
than a human being. He spoke to no one, but went about
muttering to himself; or, as some hinted, talking with the devil,
who, though unseen, was ever at his elbow. Now and then
he was seen pulling about the bay alone, in his skiff, in dark
weather, or at the approach of night-fall; nobody could tell
why, unless on an errand to invite more guests from the
gallows
.
Indeed it was affirmed that the Wild Goose still
continued
to be a house of entertainment for such guests, and that
on stormy nights the blue chamber was occasionally illuminated,
and sounds of diabolical merriment were overheard, mingling with
the howling of the tempest. Some treated these as idle stories,
until on one such night-it was about the time of the equinox
there was a horrible uproar in the Wild Goose, that could not
be mistaken. It was not so much the sound of revelry,
however
,
as strife, with two or three piercing shrieks, that
pervaded
every part of the village. Nevertheless, no one thought
of hastening to the spot. On the contrary, the honest burghers
of Communipaw drew their nightcaps over their ears, and
buried their heads under the bed-clothes, at the thoughts of
Vanderscamp and his gallows companions.
The next morning, some of the bolder and more curious
undertook to reconnoitre. All was quiet and lifeless at the
Wild Goose. The door yawned wide open, and had evidently
been open all night, for the storm had beaten into the house.
Gathering more courage from the silence and apparent
desertion
,
they gradually ventured over the threshold. The house
had indeed the air of having been possessed by devils.
Everything
was topsy turvy; trunks had been broken open, and
chests of drawers and corner cupboards turned inside out, as
in a time of general sack and pillage; but the most woful
sight was the widow of Yan Yost Vanderscamp, extended a
corpse on the floor of the blue chamber, with the marks of a
deadly gripe on the windpipe.
All now was conjecture and dismay at Communipaw; and
the disappearance of old Pluto, who was nowhere to be found,
gave rise to all kinds of wild surmises. Some suggested that
the negro had betrayed the house to some of Vanderscamp's
buccaneering associates, and that they had decamped together
with the booty; others surmised that the negro was nothing
more nor less than a devil incarnate, who had now
accomplished
his ends, and made off with his dues.
Events, however, vindicated the negro from this last
imputation
.
His skiff was picked up, drifting about the bay, bottom
upwards, as if wrecked in a tempest; and his body was found,
shortly afterwards, by some Communipaw fishermen, stranded
among the rocks of Gibbet Island, near the foot of the pirates'
gallows. The fishermen shook their heads, and observed that
old Pluto had ventured once too often to invite Guests from
Gibbet Island.
PETER STUYVESANT'S VOYAGE UP THE HUDSON.
FROM THE HISTORY OF NEW YORK.
Now
did the soft breezes of the south steal sweetly over the
face of nature, tempering the panting heats of summer into
genial and prolific warmth; when that miracle of hardihood
and chivalric virtue, the dauntless Peter Stuyvesant, spread his
canvas to the wind, and departed from the fair Island
of Manna-hata. The galley in which he embarked was
sumptuously adorned with pendants and streamers of gorgeous
dyes, which fluttered gayly in the wind, or drooped their ends
into the bosom of the stream. The bow and poop of this
majestic vessel were gallantly bedight, after the rarest Dutch
fashion, with figures of little pursy Cupids with periwigs on
their heads, and bearing in their hands garlands of flowers, the
like of which are not to be found in any book of botany;
being the matchless flowers which flourished in the golden age,
and exist no longer, unless it be in the imaginations of
ingenious
carvers of wood and discolorers of canvas.
Thus rarely decorated, in style befitting the puissant potentate
of the Manhattoes, did the galley of Peter Stuyvesant launch
forth upon the bosom of the lordly Hudson, which, as it rolled
its broad waves to the ocean, seemed to pause for a while and
swell with pride, as if conscious of the illustrious burden it
sustained.
But trust me, gentlefolk, far other was the scene presented to
the contemplation of the crew from that which may be
witnessed at this degenerate day. Wildness and savage
majesty reigned on the borders of this mighty riverthe hand
of cultivation had not as yet laid low the dark forest, and
tamed the features of the landscapenor had the frequent sail
of commerce broken in upon the profound and awful solitude
of ages. Here and there might be seen a rude wigwam perched
among the cliffs of the mountains with its curling column of
smoke mounting in the transparent atmospherebut so loftily
situated that the whoopings of the savage children, gambolling
on the margin of the dizzy heights, fell almost as faintly on
the ear as do the notes of the lark, when lost in the azure vault
of heaven. Now and then, from the beetling brow of some
precipice, the wild deer would look timidly down upon the
splendid pageant as it passed below; and then, tossing his
antlers in the air, would bound away into the thickets of the
forest.
Through such scenes did the stately vessel of Peter
Stuyvesant
pass. Now did they skirt the bases of the rocky heights
of Jersey, which spring up like everlasting walls, reaching from
the waves unto the heavens, and were fashioned, if tradition
may be believed, in times long past, by the mighty spirit
Manetho, to protect his favorite abodes from the unhallowed
eyes of mortals. Now did they career it gayly across the vast
expanse of Tappan Bay, whose wide-extended shores present a
variety of delectable sceneryhere the bold promontory,
crowned with embowering trees, advancing into the baythere
the long woodland slope, sweeping up from the shore in rich
luxuriance, and terminating in the upland precipicewhile at a
distance a long waving line of rocky heights threw their
gigantic shades across the water. Now would they pass
where some modest little interval, opening among these
stupendous
scenes, yet retreating as it were for protection into the
embraces of the neighboring mountains, displayed a rural
paradise
,
fraught with sweet and pastoral beauties; the velvet-tufted
lawnthe bushy copsethe twinkling rivulet, stealing through
the fresh and vivid verdureon whose banks was situated
some little Indian village, or, peradventure, the rude cabin of
some solitary hunter.
The different periods of the revolving day seemed each, with
cunning magic, to diffuse a different charm to the scene.
Now would the jovial sun break gloriously from the east,
blazing from the summits of the hills, and sparkling the
landscape
with a thousand dewy gems; while along the borders of
the river were seen heavy masses of mist, which, like midnight
caitiffs, disturbed at his approach, made a sluggish retreat,
rolling in sullen reluctance up the mountains. At such times
all was brightness, and life, and gayetythe atmosphere was
of an indescribable pureness and transparencythe birds broke
forth in wanton madrigals, and the freshening breezes wafted
the vessel merrily on her course. But when the sun sank
amid a flood of glory in the west, mantling the heavens and the
earth with a thousand gorgeous dyesthen all was calm, and
silent, and magnificent. The late swelling sail hung lifelessly
against the mastthe seaman, with folded arms, leaned against
the shrouds, lost in that involuntary musing which the sober
grandeur of nature commands in the rudest of her children.
The vast bosom of the Hudson was like an unruffled mirror,
reflecting the golden splendor of the heavens; excepting that
now and then a bark canoe would steal across its surface,
filled with painted savages, whose gay feathers glared brightly,
as perchance a lingering ray of the setting sun gleamed upon
them from the western mountains.
But when the hour of twilight spread its majestic mists
around, then did the face of nature assume a thousand fugitive
charms, which to the worthy heart that seeks enjoyment in the
glorious works of its Maker are inexpressibly captivating.
The mellow dubious light that prevailed just served to tinge
with illusive colors the softened features of the scenery.
The deceived but delighted eye sought vainly to discern in the
broad masses of shade, the separating line between the land
and water; or to distinguish the fading objects that seemed
sinking into chaos. Now did the busy fancy supply the
feebleness of vision, producing with industrious craft a fairy
creation of her own. Under her plastic wand the barren rocks
frowned upon the watery waste, in the semblance of lofty
towers and high embattled castlestrees assumed the direful
forms of mighty giants, and the inaccessible summits of the
mountains seemed peopled with a thousand shadowy
beings
.
Now broke forth from the shores the notes of an
innumerable
variety of insects, which filled the air with a strange but
not inharmonious concertwhile ever and anon was heard the
melancholy plaint of the Whip-poor-will, who, perched on
some lone tree, wearied the ear of night with his incessant
moanings. The mind, soothed into a hallowed melancholy,
listened with pensive stillness, to catch and distinguish each
sound that vaguely echoed from the shorenow and then
startled perchance by the whoop of some straggling savage, or
by the dreary howl of a wolf, stealing forth upon his nightly
prowlings.
Thus happily did they pursue their course, until they entered
upon those awful defiles denominated THE
Highlands
, where it
would seem that the gigantic Titans had erst waged their
impious war with heaven, piling up cliffs on cliffs, and hurling
vast masses of rock in wild confusion. But in sooth very
different is the history of these cloud-capt mountains. These,
in ancient days, before the Hudson poured its waters from the
lakes, formed one vast prison, within whose rocky bosom the
omnipotent Manetho confined the rebellious spirits who repined
at his control. Here, bound in adamantine chains, or jammed
in rifted pines, or crushed by ponderous rocks, they groaned
for many an age. At length, the conquering Hudson, in its
career towards the ocean, burst open their prison-house, rolling
its tide triumphantly through the stupendous ruins.
Still, however, do many of them lurk about their old abodes;
and these it is, according to venerable legends, that cause the
echoes which resound throughout these awful solitudes; which
are nothing but their angry clamors when any noise disturbs
the profoundness of their repose. For when the elements are
agitated by tempest, when the winds are up and the thunder
rolls, then horrible is the yelling and howling of these troubled
spirits, making the mountains to rebellow with their hideous
uproar; for at such times it is said that they think the great
Manetho is returning once more to plunge them in gloomy
caverns, and renew their intolerable captivity.
But all these fair and glorious scenes were lost upon the
gallant Stuyvesant; naught occupied his mind but thoughts of
iron war, and proud anticipations of hardy deeds of arms.
Neither did his honest crew trouble their heads with any
romantic speculations of the kind. The pilot at the helm
quietly smoked his pipe, thinking of nothing either past, present,
or to come; those of his comrades who were not industriously
smoking under the hatches were listening with open mouths to
Antony Van Corlear; who, seated on the windlass, was
relating to them the marvellous history of those myriads of
fireflies, that sparkled like gems and spangles upon the dusky
robe of night. These, according to tradition, were originally
a race of pestilent sempiternous beldames, who peopled these
parts long before the memory of man; being of that abominated
race emphatically called
brimstones;
and who, for their
innumerable
sins against the children of men, and to furnish an
awful warning to the beauteous sex, were doomed to infest the
earth in the shape of these threatening and terrible little bugs;
enduring the internal torments of that fire, which they formerly
carried in their hearts and breathed forth in their words; but
now are sentenced to bear about for everin their tails!
And now I am going to tell a fact, which I doubt much my
readers will hesitate to believe; but if they do, they are
welcome
not to believe a word in this whole historyfor nothing
which it contains is more true. It must be known then that
the nose of Anthony the Trumpeter was of a very lusty size,
strutting boldly from his countenance like a mountain of
Golconda
;
being sumptuously bedecked with rubies and other
precious
stonesthe true regalia of a king of good fellows, which
jolly Bacchus grants to all who bouse it heartily at the flagon.
Now thus it happened, that bright and early in the morning,
the good Antony, having washed his burly visage, was leaning
over the quarter railing of the galley, contemplating it in the
glassy wave below. Just at this moment the illustrious sun,
breaking in all his splendor from behind a high bluff of the
highlands, did dart one of his most potent beams full upon the
refulgent nose of the sounder of brassthe reflection of which
shot straightway down hissing hot, into the water, and killed a
mighty sturgeon that was sporting beside the vessel! This
huge monster, being with infinite labor hoisted on board,
furnished a luxurious repast to all the crew, being accounted of
excellent flavor, excepting about the wound, where it smacked
a little of brimstoneand this, on my veracity, was the first
time that ever sturgeon was eaten in these parts by Christian
people.
*
*
The learned Hans Megapolonsis, treating of the country about
Albany, in a letter which was written some time after the settlement
thereof, says, There is in the river great plenty of sturgeon which we
Christians do not make use of, but the Indians eat them greedily.
When this astonishing miracle came to be made known to
Peter Stuyvesant, and that he tasted of the unknown fish, he,
as may well be supposed, marvelled exceedingly: and as a
monument thereof, he gave the name of
Antony's Nose
to a
stout promontory in the neighborhoodand it has continued to
be called Anthony's Nose ever since that time.
But hold: whither am I wandering? By the mass, if I
attempt to accompany the good Peter Stuyvesant on this
voyage, I shall never make an end; for never was there a
voyage so fraught with marvellous incidents, nor a river so
abounding with transcendent beauties, worthy of being severally
recorded. Even now I have it on the point of my pen to
relate how his crew were most horribly frightened, on going
on shore above the highlands, by a gang of merry roistering
devils, frisking and curvetting on a flat rock, which projected
into the riverand which is called the
Duyvel's Dans-Kamer
to this very day. But no! Diedrich Knickerbockerit
becomes
thee not to idle thus in thy historic wayfaring.
Recollect that while dwelling with the fond garrulity of age
over these fairy scenes, endeared to thee by the recollections of
thy youth, and the charms of a thousand legendary tales,
which beguiled the simple ear of thy childhood; recollect tha
thou art trifling with those fleeting moments which should be
devoted to loftier themes. Is not Timerelentless Time!
shaking, with palsied hand, his almost exhausted hour-glass
before thee?hasten then to pursue thy weary task, lest the
last sands be run ere thou hast finished thy history of the
Manhattoes.
THE CHRONICLE OF BEARN ISLAND.
*
*
A rocky island on the Hudson a few miles below Albany.
SHOWING THE RISE OF THE GREAT VAN RENSELLAER DYNASTY,
AND THE FIRST SEEDS OF THE HELDERBERG WAR.
Compiled
from Knickerbocker's Hist. of New York
.
In
the golden days of New Amsterdam, according to the
accounts of its venerable historian, the ambition of its burghers
contented itself for a while within the bounds of the fair island of
Mannahata, insomuch that Spiten Devil and Hell-gate were to
them the pillars of Hercules, the
ne plus ultra
of human
enterprise
.
In process of time, however, the New Amsterdamers began
to cast wistful looks at the lands of their Indian neighbors; for
somehow or other Indian land has a wild flavor to the taste
of a settler, and looks greener in his eyes than the land he
lawfully occupies. Oloffe the Dreamer, at that time protector
of New Amsterdam, encouraged these notions; having the
inherent spirit of a land speculator, quickened and expanded by
his having become a landholder. Under his protectorship
certain exploring expeditions were sent forth to sow the seeds
of empire in the wilderness. One of these ascended the Hudson
and established a frontier post, or trading house, called Fort
Aurania, on the site of the present venerable City of Albany;
which, at that time, was considered the very end of the
habitable world. With this remote possession the mother city
of New Amsterdam for a long time held but little intercourse.
Now and then the company's yacht, as it was called (meaning
the yacht of the Honorable the East India Company), was sent
to carry supplies to the fort and to bring away the peltries
which had been purchased of the Indians. It was like an
expedition to the Indias, or the North Pole, and always made
great talk in the settlement. Sometimes an adventurous
burgher would accompany the expedition, to the great
uneasiness
of his friends; but, on his return, had so many stories to
tell of storms and tempests on the Tappan Zee; of hobgoblins
in the Highlands and at the Devils Dans Kammer, and of all
the other wonders and perils with which the river abounded in
those early days, that he deterred the less adventurous
inhabitants
from following his example.
Matters remained in this state until the time of Walter the
Doubter, and Fort Aurania seemed as remote as Oregon in
modern days. Now so it happened that one day as that most
dubious of Governors and his burgermeesters were smoking and
pondering over the affairs of the province, they were roused by
the report of a cannon. Sallying forth, they beheld a strange
vessel at anchor in the bay. It was unquestionably of Dutch
build; broad bottomed and high pooped, and bore the flag of
their High Mightinesses at the mast-head.
After a while a boat put off for land, and a stranger stepped
on shore, a lofty, lordly kind of man, tall and dry, with a
meagre face, furnished with huge moustaches. He was clad in
Flemish doublet and hose, and an insufferably tall hat, with a
cocktail feather. Such was the patroon Killian Van
Rensellaer
,
who had come out from Holland to found a colony or
patroonship on a great tract of wild land, granted to him by
their High Mightinesses, the Lords States General, in the upper
regions of the Hudson.
Killian Van Rensellaer was a nine days' wonder in New
Amsterdam; for he carried a high head, looked down upon
the portly, short-legged burgomasters, and owned no allegiance
to the governor himself; boasting that he held his patroonship
directly from the Lords States General.
He tarried but a short time in New Amsterdam; merely to
beat up recruits for his colony. Few, however, ventured to
enlist for those remote and savage regions; and when they
embarked
,
their friends took leave of them as if they should never
see them more; and stood gazing with tearful eye as the stout,
round-sterned little vessel ploughed and splashed its way up the
Hudson, with great noise and little progress, taking nearly a
day to get out of sight of the city.
And now, from time to time, floated down tidings to the
Manhattoes of the growing importance of this new colony.
Every account represented Killian Van Rensellaer as rising in
importance, and becoming a mighty patroon in the land. He
had received more recruits from Holland. His patroonship of
Rensellaerwick lay immediately below Fort Aurania, and
extended
for several miles on each side of the Hudson, besides
embracing the mountainous region of the Helderberg. Over
all this he claimed to hold separate jurisdiction, independent of
the colonial authorities at New Amsterdam.
All these assumptions of authority were duly reported to
Governor Van Twiller and his council, by dispatches from
Fort Aurania; at each new report the governor and his
counsellors
looked at each other, raised their eyebrows, gave an
extra puff or two of smoke, and then relapsed into their usual
tranquillity.
At length tidings came that the patroon of Rensellaerwick
had extended his usurpations along the river, beyond the limits
granted him by their High Mightinesses; and that he had even
seized upon a rocky island in the Hudson, commonly known
by the name of Bearn or Bear's Island, where he was
erecting a fortress, to be called by the lordly name of
Rensellaerstein
.
Wouter Van Twiller was roused by this intelligence. After
consulting with his burgomasters, he dispatched a letter to the
patroon of Rensellaerwick, demanding by what right he had
seized upon this island, which lay beyond the bounds of his
patroonship. The answer of Killian Van Rensellaer was in
his own lordly style.
By wapen recht!
that is to say, by
the right of arms, or, in common parlance, by club-law. This
answer plunged the worthy Wouter into one of the deepest
doubts he encountered in the whole course of his
administration
;
but while he doubted, the lordly Killian went on to
complete his sturdy little castellum of Rensellaerstein. This
done, he garrisoned it with a number of his tenants from the
Helderberg, a mountain region, famous for the hardest heads
and hardest fists in the province. Nicholas Koorn, his
faithful
squire, accustomed to strut at his heels, wear his cast off
clothes, and imitate his lofty bearing, was established in this
post as wacht meester. His duty it was to keep an eye on the
river, and oblige every vessel that passed, unless on the service
of their High Mightinesses, the Lords States General of
Holland
,
to strike its flag, lower its peak, and pay toll to the lord
of Rensellaerstein.
Many were the complaints rendered in to Wouter Van
Twiller by the skippers of the Hudson of these wrongs
inflicted
on them by the little wart of a castle; all which tended
marvellously to increase his doubts and perplexities, insomuch
that when William the Testy succeeded him in office, he found
whole bundles of statements of these offences filed away in the
archives of government, with the dubious superscription to be
considered. William the Testy was not a man to take
things so patiently. He wrote sharp remonstrances to Killian
Van Rensellaer, representing his assumption of sovereign
authority on the river as equal to the outrages of the Robber
Counts of Germany, from their castles on the Rhine. His
remonstrances
were treated with silent contempt, and thus a sore
place, or, in Hibernian phrase, a
raw
, was established in the
irritable soul of the little governor, insomuch that he winced
at the very name of Rensellaerstein.
Now it came to pass, that on a fine sunny day the
Company's
yacht, the Half-Moon, having been on one of its stated
visits to Fort Aurania, was quietly tiding it down the Hudson;
the commander, Govert Lockerman, a veteran Dutch skipper
of few words but great bottom, was seated on the high poop,
quietly smoking his pipe, under the shadow of the proud
flag of Orange when, on arriving abreast of Bearn Island, he
was saluted by a stentorian voice from the shore, Lower thy
flag, and be dd to thee!
Govert Lockerman, without taking his pipe out of
his
mouth, turned up his eye from under his broad-brimmed hat to
see who hailed him thus discourteously. There, on the
ramparts
of the fort, stood Nicholas Koorn, armed to the teeth,
flourishing a brass-hilted sword, while a steeple-crowned hat
and cock's tail-feather, formerly worn by Killian Van
Rensellaer
himself, gave an inexpressible loftiness to his
demeanor
.
Govert Lockerman eyed the warrior from top to toe, but
was not to be dismayed. Taking the pipe slowly out of his
mouth, To whom should I lower my flag? demanded he.
To the high and mighty Killian Van Rensellaer, the lord
of Rensellaerstein! was the reply.
I lower it to none but the Prince of Orange, and my
masters
,
the Lords States General. So saying, he resumed his
pipe, and smoked with an air of dogged determination.
Bang! went a gun from the fortress; the ball cut both sail
and rigging. Govert Lockerman said nothing, but smoked the
more doggedly.
Bang! went another gun; the shot whistling close astern.
Fire, and be dd, cried Govert Lockerman, cramming a
new charge of tobacco into his pipe, and smoking with still
increasing vehemence.
Bang! went a third gun. The shot passed over his head,
tearing a hole in the princely flag of Orange.
This was the hardest trial of all for the pride and patience
of Govert Lockerman; he maintained a stubborn though
swelling
silence, but his smothered rage might be perceived by the
short vehement puffs of smoke emitted from his pipe, by which
he might be tracked for miles, as he slowly floated out of shot
and out of sight of Bearn Island. In fact he never gave vent
to his passion until he got fairly among the Highlands of the
Hudson; when he let fly whole volleys of Dutch oaths, which
are said to linger to this very day among the echoes of the
Dunderberg, and to give particular effect to the thunder-storms
in that neighborhood.
William the Testy was shut up in his rural retreat of Dog's
Misery, planning an expedition against the marauding people
of Merryland, when Govert Lockerman burst in upon him,
bearing in his hand the tattered flag of Orange. I will not
pretend to describe the passion of the little man when he heard
of the outrage of Rensellaerstein. Suffice it to say, in the first
transports of his fury, he turned Dog's Misery topsy-turvy;
kicked every cur out of doors, and threw the cats out of the
window; after which, his spleen being in some measure
relieved
,
he went into a council of war with Govert Lockerman,
the skipper, assisted by Antony Van Corlear, the trumpeter.
The eyes of all New Amsterdam were now turned to see
what would be the end of this direful feud between William the
Testy and the patroon of Rensellaerwick; and some,
observing
the consultations of the governor with the skipper and the
trumpeter, predicted warlike measures by sea and land. The
wrath of William Kieft, however, though quick to rise, was
quick to evaporate. He was a perfect brush-heap in a blaze,
snapping and crackling for a time, and then ending in smoke.
Like many other valiant potentates, his first thoughts were all
for war, his sober second thoughts for diplomacy.
Accordingly, Govert Lockerman was once more dispatched
up the river in the Company's yacht, the Goed Hoop, bearing
Antony the Trumpeter as ambassador, to treat with the
belligerent
powers of Rensellaerstein. In the fulness of time
the yacht arrived before Bearn Island, and Antony the
Trumpeter
,
mounting the poop, sounded a parley to the fortress. In
a little while, the steeple-crowned hat of Nicholas Koorn, the
wacht-meester, rose above the battlements, followed by his
iron visage, and ultimately by his whole person, armed, as
before
,
to the very teeth; while one by one a whole row of
Helderbergers
reared their round burly heads above the wall, and
beside each pumpkin-head peered the end of a rusty musket.
Nothing daunted by this formidable array, Antony Van
Corlear
drew forth and read with audible voice a missive from
William the Testy, protesting against the usurpation of Bearn
Island, and ordering the garrison to quit the premises, bag and
baggage, on pain of the vengeance of the potentate of the
Manhattoes.
In reply the wacht-meester applied the thumb of his right
hand to the end of his nose, and the thumb of the left hand to
the little finger of the right, and spreading each hand like a
fan, made an aerial flourish with his fingers. Antony Van
Corlear was sorely perplexed to understand this sign, which
seemed to him something mysterious and masonic. Not liking
to betray his ignorance, he again read with a loud voice the
missive of William the Testy, and again Nicholas Koorn
applied
the thumb of his right hand to the end of his nose, and
the thumb of his left hand to the little finger of the right, and
repeated this kind of nasal weathercock. Antony Van
Corlear
now persuaded himself that this was some short-hand sign
or symbol, current in diplomacy, which, though unintelligible to
a new diplomat like himself, would speak volumes to the
experienced intellect of William the Testy; considering his
embassy therefore at an end, he sounded his trumpet with great
complacency, and set sail on his return down the river, every
now and then practising this mysterious sign of the
wacht-meester
,
to keep it accurately in mind.
Arrived at New Amsterdam, he made a faithful report of his
embassy to the governor, accompanied by a manual exhibition
of the response of Nicholas Koorn. The governor was
equally perplexed with his ambassador. He was deeply versed
in the mysteries of freemasonry; but they threw no light on
the matter. He knew every variety of windmill and
weathercock
,
but was not a whit the wiser, as to the aerial sign in
question. He had even dabbled in Egyptian hieroglyphics, and
the mystic symbols of the obelisks, but none furnished a key
to the reply of Nicholas Koorn. He called a meeting of his
council. Antony Van Corlear stood forth in the midst, and
putting the thumb of his right hand to his nose, and the thumb
of his left hand to the little finger of the right, he gave a faithful
fac-simile of the portentous sign. Having a nose of unusual
dimensions, it was as if the reply had been put in capitals, but
all in vain; the worthy burgomasters were equally perplexed
with the governor. Each one put his thumb to the end of his
nose, spread his fingers like a fan, imitated the motion of
Antony Van Corlear, and then smoked on in dubious silence.
Several times was Antony obliged to stand forth like a
fugleman
,
and repeat the sign, and each time a circle of nasal
weathercocks might be seen in the council-chamber.
Perplexed in the extreme, William the Testy sent for all the
soothsayers, and fortunetellers, and wise men of the
Manhattoes
,
but none could interpret the mysterious reply of Nicholas
Koorn. The council broke up in sore perplexity. The
matter
got abroad, Antony Van Corlear was stopped at every
corner
to repeat the signal to a knot of anxious newsmongers,
each of whom departed with his thumb to his nose, and his
fingers in the air, to carry the story home to his family. For
several days all business was neglected in New Amsterdam;
nothing was talked of but the diplomatic mission of Antony
the Trumpeter, nothing was to be seen but knots of politicians
with their thumbs to their noses. In the meantime the fierce
feud between William the Testy and Killian Van Rensellaer,
which at first had menaced deadly warfare, gradually cooled off,
like many other war questions, in the prolonged delays of
diplomacy
.
Still to this early affair of Rensellaerstein may be traced
the remote origin of those windy wars in modern days which
rage in the bowels of the Helderberg, and have well nigh
shaken the great patroonship of the Van Rensellaers to its
foundation; for we are told that the bully boys of the
Helderberg
,
who served under Nicholas Koorn, the wacht-meester,
carried back to their mountains the hieroglyphic sign which
had so sorely puzzled Antony Van Corlear and the sages of the
Manhattoes; so that to the present day the thumb to the nose
and the fingers in the air is apt to be the reply of the
Helderbergers
whenever called upon for long arrears of rent.
THE LEGEND OF SLEEPY HOLLOW.
A pleasing land of drowsy head it was,
Of dreams that wave before the half-shut eye;
And of gay castles in the clouds that pass,
For ever flushing round a summer sky.
Castle of Indolence
.
In
the bosom of one of those spacious coves which indent
the eastern shore of the Hudson, at that broad expansion of
the river denominated by the ancient Dutch navigators the
Tappan Zee, and where they always prudently shortened sail,
and implored the protection of St. Nicholas when they
crossed
,
there lies a small market-town or rural port, which, by
some, is called Greensburgh, but which is more generally and
properly known by the name of Tarry Town. This name
was given, we are told, in former days, by the good
housewives
of the adjacent country, from the inveterate propensity
of their husbands to linger about the village tavern on market
days. Be that as it may, I do not vouch for the fact, but
merely advert to it for the sake of being precise and authentic.
Not far from this village, perhaps about two miles, there is a
little valley, or rather lap of land, among high hills, which is
one of the quietest places in the whole world. A small brook
glides through it, with just murmur enough to lull one to
repose
;
and the occasional whistle of a quail, or tapping of a
woodpecker, is almost the only sound that ever breaks in upon
the uniform tranquillity.
I recollect that, when a stripling, my first exploit in
squirrel-shooting
was in a grove of tall walnut-trees that shades one
side of the valley. I had wandered into it at noontime, when
all nature is peculiarly quiet, and was startled by the roar of
my own gun, as it broke the Sabbath stillness around, and
was prolonged and reverberated by the angry echoes. If ever I
should wish for a retreat whither I might steal from the world
and its distractions, and dream quietly away the remnant of a
troubled life, I know of none more promising than this little
valley.
From the listless repose of the place, and the peculiar
character
of its inhabitants, who are descendants from the original
Dutch settlers, this sequestered glen has long been known by
the name of
Sleepy Hollow
, and its rustic lads are called
the Sleepy Hollow Boys throughout all the neighboring country.
A drowsy, dreamy influence seems to hang over the land, and
to pervade the very atmosphere. Some say that the place was
bewitched by a high German doctor, during the early days of
the settlement; others, that an old Indian chief, the prophet or
wizard of his tribe, held his powwows there before the country
was discovered by Master Hendrick Hudson. Certain it is,
the place still continues under the sway of some witching
power, that holds a spell over the minds of the good people,
causing them to walk in a continual reverie. They are given
to all kinds of marvellous beliefs; are subject to trances and
visions; and frequently see strange sights, and hear music and
voices in the air. The whole neighborhood abounds with
local tales, haunted spots, and twilight superstitions; stars
shoot and meteors glare oftener across the valley than in any
other part of the country, and the night-mare with her whole
nine fold, seems to make it the favorite scene of her gambols.
The dominant spirit, however, that haunts this enchanted
region, and seems to be commander-in-chief of all the powers
of the air, is the apparition of a figure on horseback, without a
head. It is said by some to be the ghost of a Hessian trooper,
whose head had been carried away by a cannon-ball, in some
nameless battle during the revolutionary war, and who is ever
and anon seen by the country folk, hurrying along in the gloom
of night, as if on the wings of the wind. His haunts are not
confined to the valley, but extend at times to the adjacent
roads, and especially to the vicinity of a church at no great
distance. Indeed, certain of the most authentic historians of
those parts, who have been careful in collecting and collating
the floating facts concerning this spectre, allege that the body
of the trooper having been buried in the church-yard, the
ghost rides forth to the scene of battle in nightly quest of his
head; and that the rushing speed with which he sometimes
passes along the Hollow, like a midnight blast, is owing to his
being belated, and in a hurry to get back to the church-yard
before daybreak.
Such is the general purport of this legendary superstition,
which has furnished materials for many a wild story in that
region of shadows, and the spectre is known at all the country
firesides by the name of the Headless Horseman of Sleepy
Hollow.
It is remarkable that the visionary propensity I have
mentioned
is not confined to the native inhabitants of the valley,
but is unconsciously imbibed by every one who resides there
for a time. However wide awake they may have been before
they entered that sleepy region, they are sure, in a little time,
to inhale the witching influence of the air, and begin to grow
imaginativeto dream dreams, and see apparitions.
I mention this peaceful spot with all possible laud; for it is
in such little retired Dutch valleys, found here and there,
embosomed
in the great state of New York, that population,
manners
,
and customs remain fixed, while the great torrent of
migration and improvement, which is making such incessant
changes in other parts of this restless country, sweeps by them
unobserved. They are like those little nooks of still water
which border a rapid stream; where we may see the straw and
bubble riding quietly at anchor, or slowly revolving in their
mimic harbor, undisturbed by the rush of the passing current.
Though many years have elapsed since I trod the drowsy
shades of Sleepy Hollow, yet I question whether I should not
still find the same trees and the same families vegetating in its
sheltered bosom.
In this by-place of nature, there abode, in a remote period of
American history, that is to say, some thirty years since, a
worthy wight, of the name of Ichabod Crane, who sojourned,
or, as he expressed it, tarried, in Sleepy Hollow, for the
purpose of instructing the children of the vicinity. He was a
native of Connecticut, a state which supplies the Union with
pioneers for the mind as well as for the forest, and sends forth
yearly its legions of frontier woodmen and country
schoolmasters
.
The cognomen of Crane was not inapplicable to his
person
.
He was tall, but exceedingly lank, with narrow
shoulders
,
long arms and legs, hands that dangled a mile out of his
sleeves, feet that might have served for shovels, and his whole
frame most loosely hung together. His head was small, and
flat at the top, with huge ears, large green glassy eyes, and a
long snipe nose, so that it looked like a weathercock, perched
upon his spindle neck, to tell which way the wind blew. To
see him striding along the profile of a hill on a windy day,
with his clothes bagging and fluttering about him, one might
have mistaken him for the genius of famine descending upon
the earth, or some scarecrow eloped from a cornfield.
His school-house was a low building of one large room,
rudely constructed of logs, the windows partly glazed and
partly patched with leaves of old copybooks. It was most
ingeniously secured at vacant hours, by a withe twisted in the
handle of the door, and stakes set against the window
shutters
,
so that, though a thief might get in with perfect ease, he
would find some embarrassment in getting out; an idea most
probably borrowed by the architect, Yost Van Houten, from
the mystery of an eel-pot. The school-house stood in a rather
lonely but pleasant situation, just at the foot of a woody hill,
with a brook running close by, and a formidable birch tree
growing at one end of it. From hence the low murmur of his
pupils' voices, conning over their lessons, might be heard in a
drowsy summer's day, like the hum of a bee-hive, interrupted
now and then by the authoritative voice of the master, in the
tone of menace or command, or, peradventure, by the
appalling
sound of the birch, as he urged some tardy loiterer along
the flowery path of knowledge. Truth to say, he was a
conscientious
man, and ever bore in mind the golden maxim,
Spare the rod and spoil the child.Ichabod Crane's scholars
certainly were not spoiled.
I would not have it imagined, however, that he was one of
those cruel potentates of the school, who joy in the smart of
their subjects; on the contrary, he administered justice with
discrimination rather than severity, taking the burden off the
backs of the weak, and laying it on those of the strong. Your
mere puny stripling, that winced at the least flourish of the rod,
was passed by with indulgence, but the claims of justice were
satisfied by inflicting a double portion on some little, tough,
wrong-headed, broad-skirted Dutch urchin, who sulked, and
swelled, and grew dogged and sullen beneath the birch. All
this he called doing his duty by their parents, and he never
inflicted a chastisement without following it by the assurance,
so consolatory to the smarting urchin, that he would
remember
it and thank him for it the longest day he had to live.
When school hours were over, he was even the companion
and playmate of the larger boys, and on holiday afternoons
would convoy some of the smaller ones home, who happened
to have pretty sisters, or good housewives for mothers, noted
for the comforts of the cupboard. Indeed, it behoved him to
keep on good terms with his pupils. The revenue arising
from his school was small, and would have been scarcely
sufficient
to furnish him with daily bread, for he was a huge
feeder, and though lank, had the dilating powers of an
anaconda
;
but to help out his maintenance, he was, according to
country custom in those parts, boarded and lodged at the
houses of the farmers, whose children he instructed. With
these he lived successively a week at a time, thus going the
rounds of the neighborhood, with all his worldly effects tied
up in a cotton handkerchief.
That all this might not be too onerous on the purses of his
rustic patrons, who are apt to consider the costs of schooling a
grievous burden, and schoolmasters as mere drones, he had
various ways of rendering himself both useful and agreeable.
He assisted the farmers occasionally in the lighter labors of
their farms, helped to make hay, mended the fences, took the
horses to water, drove the cows from pasture, and cut wood for
the winter fire. He laid aside, too, all the dominant dignity
and absolute sway with which he lorded it in his little empire,
the school, and became wonderfully gentle and ingratiating.
He found favor in the eyes of the mothers, by petting the
children
,
particularly the youngest, and like the lion bold, which
whilom so magnanimously the lamb did hold, he would sit
with a child on one knee, and rock a cradle with his foot for
whole hours together.
In addition to his other vocations, he was the singing master
of the neighborhood, and picked up many bright shillings by
instructing the young folks in psalmody. It was a matter of
no little vanity to him, on Sundays, to take his station in front
of the church gallery, with a band of chosen singers; where,
in his own mind, he completely carried away the palm from
the parson. Certain it is, his voice resounded far above all the
rest of the congregation; and there are peculiar quavers still
to be heard in that church, and which may even be heard half
a mile off, quite to the opposite side of the mill-pond, on a still
Sunday morning, which are said to be legitimately descended
from the nose of Ichabod Crane. Thus, by divers little
makeshifts
,
in that ingenious way which is commonly denominated
by hook and by crook, the worthy pedagogue got on
tolerably
enough, and was thought, by all who understood nothing
of the labor of headwork, to have a wonderfully easy life of it.
The schoolmaster is generally a man of some importance in
the female circle of a rural neighborhood; being considered a
kind of idle gentleman-like personage, of vastly superior taste
and accomplishments to the rough country swains, and, indeed,
inferior in learning only to the parson. His appearance,
therefore
,
is apt to occasion some little stir at the tea-table of a
farmhouse
,
and the addition of a supernumerary dish of cakes, or
sweetmeats, or, peradventure, the parade of a silver teapot.
3
Our man of letters, therefore, was peculiarly happy in the
smiles of all the country damsels. How he would figure
among them in the church-yard between services on Sundays,
gathering grapes for them from the wild vines that overrun the
surrounding trees; reciting for their amusement all the epitaphs
on the tombstones, or sauntering, with a whole bevy of them,
along the banks of the adjacent mill-pond; while the more
bashful country bumpkins hung sheepishly back, envying his
superior elegance and address.
From his half itinerant life, also, he was a kind of travelling
gazette, carrying the whole budget of local gossip from house
to house, so that his appearance was always greeted with
satisfaction
.
He was, moreover, esteemed by the women as a man
of great erudition, for he had read several books quite through,
and was a perfect master of Cotton Mather's History of New
England Witchcraft, in which, by the way, he most firmly and
potently believed.
He was, in fact, an odd mixture of small shrewdness and
simple credulity. His appetite for the marvellous, and his
powers of digesting it, were equally extraordinary; and both
had been increased by his residence in this spell-bound region.
No tale was too gross or monstrous for his capacious swallow.
It was often his delight, after his school was dismissed in the
afternoon, to stretch himself on the rich bed of clover,
bordering
the little brook that whimpered by his school-house, and
there con over old Mather's direful tales, until the gathering
dusk of the evening made the printed page a mere mist before
his eyes. Then, as he wended his way, by swamp, and stream,
and awful woodland, to the farmhouse where he happened to
be quartered, every sound of nature, at that witching hour,
fluttered his excited imagination; the moan of the
whip-poor-will
*
*
The whip poor-will is a bird which is only heard at night. It
receives
its name from its note, which is thought to resemble those
words.
from the hill side, the boding cry of the tree toad, that
harbinger of storm, the dreary hooting of the screech-owl, or
the sudden rustling in the thicket of birds frightened from their
roost. The fire-flies, too, which sparkled most vividly in the
darkest places, now and then startled him, as one of
uncommon
brightness would stream across his path; and if, by
chance, a huge blockhead of a beetle came winging his
blundering
flight against him, the poor varlet was ready to give up
the ghost, with the idea that he was struck with a witch's
token. His only resource on such occasions, either to drown
thought, or drive away evil spirits, was to sing psalm tunes,
and the good people of Sleepy Hollow, as they sat by their
doors of an evening, were often filled with awe, at hearing
his nasal melody, in linked sweetness long drawn out,
floating
from the distant hill, or along the dusky road.
Another of his sources of fearful pleasure was, to pass long
winter evenings with the old Dutch wives, as they sat spinning
by the fire, with a row of apples roasting and spluttering
along the hearth, and listen to their marvellous tales of ghosts,
and goblins, and haunted fields, and haunted brooks, and
haunted bridges, and haunted houses, and particularly of the
headless horseman, or Galloping Hessian of the Hollow, as
they sometimes called him. He would delight them equally
by his anecdotes of witchcraft, and of the direful omens and
portentous sights and sounds in the air, which prevailed in the
earlier times of Connecticut, and would frighten them wofully
with speculations upon comets and shooting stars, and with the
alarming fact that the world did absolutely turn round, and
that they were half the time topsy-turvy.
But if there was a pleasure in all this, while snugly cuddling
in the chimney corner of a chamber that was all of a ruddy
glow from the crackling wood fire, and where, of course, no
spectre dared to show its face, it was dearly purchased by the
terrors of his subsequent walk homewards. What fearful shapes
and shadows beset his path amidst the dim and ghastly glare of
a snowy night!With what wistful look did he eye every
trembling ray of light streaming across the waste fields from
some distant window. How often was he appalled by some
shrub covered with snow, which, like a sheeted spectre, beset
his very path. How often did he shrink with curdling awe at
the sound of his own steps on the frosty crust beneath his feet,
and dread to look over his shoulder, lest he should behold
some uncouth being tramping close behind him!and how
often was he thrown into complete dismay by some rushing
blast, howling among the trees, in the idea that it was the
Galloping Hessian on one of his nightly scourings.
All these, however, were mere terrors of the night,
phantoms
of the mind that walk in darkness; and though he had
seen many spectres in his time, and been more than once
beset
by Satan in divers shapes, in his lonely perambulations, yet
daylight put an end to all these evils, and he would have
passed
a pleasant life of it, in despite of the devil and all his
works, if his path had not been crossed by a being that causes
more perplexity to mortal man than ghosts, goblins, and the
whole race of witches put together, and that wasa woman.
Among the musical disciples who assembled, one evening in
each week, to receive his instruction in psalmody, was Katrina
Van Tassel, the daughter and only child of a substantial
Dutch farmer. She was a blooming lass of fresh eighteen;
plump as a partridge, ripe and melting and rosy-cheeked as
one of her father's peaches, and universally famed, not
merely
for her beauty, but her vast expectations. She was withal a
little of a coquette, as might be perceived even in her dress,
which was a mixture of ancient and modern fashions, as most
suited to set off her charms. She wore the ornaments of pure
yellow gold, which her great-great-grandmother had brought
over from Saardam; the tempting stomacher of the olden time,
and withal a provokingly short petticoat, to display the
prettiest
foot and ankle in the country round.
Ichabod Crane had a soft and foolish heart towards the sex;
and it is not to be wondered at, that so tempting a morsel
soon found favor in his eyes; more especially after he had
visited her in her paternal mansion. Old Baltus Van Tassel
was a perfect picture of a thriving, contented, liberal-hearted
farmer. He seldom, it is true, sent either his eyes or his
thoughts beyond the boundaries of his own farm; but within
those everything was snug, happy, and well-conditioned. He
was satisfied with his wealth, but not proud of it, and piqued
himself upon the hearty abundance, rather than the style in
which he lived. His stronghold was situated on the banks of
the Hudson, in one of those green, sheltered, fertile nooks, in
which the Dutch farmers are so fond of nestling. A great elm
tree spread its broad branches over it, at the foot of which
bubbled up a spring of the softest and sweetest water, in a
little
well, formed of a barrel; and then stole sparkling away
through the grass, to a neighboring brook, that bubbled
along among alders and dwarf willows. Hard by the
farm-house
was a vast barn, that might have served for a church;
every window and crevice of which seemed bursting forth with
the treasures of the farm; the flail was busily resounding
within
it from morning to night; swallows and martins skimmed
twittering about the eaves, and rows of pigeons, some with one
eye turned up, as if watching the weather, some with their
heads under their wings, or buried in their bosoms, and others
swelling, and cooing, and bowing about their dames, were
enjoying
the sunshine on the roof. Sleek, unwieldy porkers
were grunting in the repose and abundance of their pens,
whence sallied forth, now and then, troops of sucking pigs, as
if to snuff the air. A stately squadron of snowy geese were
riding in an adjoining pond, convoying whole fleets of ducks;
regiments of turkeys were gobbling through the farm-yard, and
guinea fowls fretting about it, like ill-tempered housewives,
with their peevish, discontented cry. Before the barn door
strutted the gallant cock, that pattern of a husband, a
warrior
,
and a fine gentleman, clapping his burnished wings, and
crowing in the pride and gladness of his heartsometimes
tearing up the earth with his feet, and then generously calling
his ever-hungry family of wives and children to enjoy the rich
morsel which he had discovered.
The pedagogue's mouth watered, as he looked upon this
sumptuous promise of luxurious winter fare. In his devouring
mind's eye, he pictured to himself every roasting-pig running
about with a pudding in his belly, and an apple in his mouth;
the pigeons were snugly put to bed in a comfortable pie, and
tucked in with a coverlet of crust; the geese were swimming
in their own gravy, and the ducks pairing cosily in dishes, like
snug married couples, with a decent competency of onion
sance. In the porkers he saw carved out the future sleek side
of bacon, and juicy relishing ham; not a turkey but he beheld
daintily trussed up, with its gizzard under its wing, and,
peradventure
,
a necklace of savory sausages, and even bright
chanticleer
himself lay sprawling on his back, in a side dish, with
uplifted claws, as if craving that quarter which his chivalrous
spirit disdained to ask while living.
As the enraptured Ichabod fancied all this, and as he rolled
his great green eyes over the fat meadow lands, the rich fields
of wheat, of rye, of buckwheat, and Indian corn, and the
orchards
burdened with ruddy fruit, which surrounded the warm
tenement of Van Tassel, his heart yearned after the damsel
who was to inherit these domains, and his imagination
expanded
with the idea, how they might be readily turned into cash,
and the money invested in immense tracts of wild land and
shingle palaces in the wilderness. Nay, his busy fancy already
realized his hopes, and presented to him the blooming Katrina,
with a whole family of children, mounted on the top of a
wagon, loaded with household trumpery, with pots and kettles
dangling beneath; and he beheld himself bestriding a pacing
mare, with a colt at her heels, setting out for Kentucky,
Tennessee
,
or the Lord knows where.
When he entered the house, the conquest of his heart was
complete. It was one of those spacious farmhouses, with high
ridged, but lowly sloping roofs, built in the style handed down
from the first Dutch settlers; the low projecting eaves forming
a piazza along the front, capable of being closed up in bad
weather. Under this were hung flails, harness, various utensils
of husbandry, and nets for fishing in the neighboring river.
Benches were built along the sides for summer use; and a
great spinning-wheel at one end, and a churn at the other,
showed the various uses to which this important porch might
be devoted. From this piazza the wondering Ichabod entered
the hall, which formed the centre of the mansion, and the
place of usual residence. Here, rows of resplendent pewter
ranged on a long dresser, dazzled his eyes. In one corner
stood a huge bag of wool, ready to be spun; in another a
quantity of linsey-woolsey just from the loom; ears of Indian
corn, and strings of dried apples and peaches, hung in gay
festoons
along the walls, mingled with the gaud of red peppers,
and a door left ajar gave him a peep into the best parlor, where
the claw-footed chairs, and dark mahogany tables, shone like
mirrors; andirons, with their accompanying shovel and tongs,
glistened from their covert of asparagus tops; mock oranges
and conch-shells decorated the mantel-piece; strings of
various
colored birds' eggs were suspended above it; a great
ostrich egg was hung from the centre of the room, and a
corner
cupboard, knowingly left open, displayed immense
treasures
of old silver and well mended china.
From the moment Ichabod laid his eyes upon these regions
of delight, the peace of his mind was at an end, and his only
study was how to gain the affections of the peerless daughter
of Van Tassel. In this enterprise, however, he had more real
difficulties than generally fell to the lot of a knight-errant of
yore, who seldom had anything but giants, enchanters, fiery
dragons, and such like easily conquered adversaries to contend
with, and had to make his way merely through gates of iron
and brass, and walls of adamant, to the castle keep where the
lady of his heart was confined, all which he achieved as easily
as a man would carve his way to the centre of a Christmas
pie, and then the lady gave him her hand, as a matter of
course. Ichabod, on the contrary, had to win his way to the
heart of a country coquette, beset with a labyrinth of whims
and caprices, which were for ever presenting new difficulties
and impediments; and he had to encounter a host of fearful
adversaries of real flesh and blood, the numerous rustic
admirers
,
who beset every portal to her heart, keeping a watchful
and angry eye upon each other, but ready to fly out in the
common cause against any new competitor.
Among these the most formidable was a burly, roaring,
roystering
blade, of the name of Abraham, or, according to the Dutch
abbreviation. Brom Van Brunt, the hero of the country round,
which rang with his feats of strength and hardihood. He was
broad shouldered and double jointed, with short curly black
hair, and a bluff, but not unpleasant countenance, having a
mingled air of fun and arrogance. From his Herculean frame
and great powers of limb, he had received the nickname of
Brom Bones
, by which he was universally known. He was
famed for great knowledge and skill in horsemanship, being as
dexterous on horseback as a Tartar. He was foremost in all
races and cock fights, and, with the ascendency which bodily
strength acquires in rustic life, was the umpire in all disputes,
setting his hat on one side, and giving his decisions with an air
and tone admitting of no gainsay or appeal. He was always
ready for either a fight or a frolic, but had more mischief than
ill-will in his composition, and, with all his overbearing
roughness
,
there was a strong dash of waggish good humor at
bottom
.
He had three or four boon companions, who regarded
him as their model, and at the head of whom he scoured the
country, attending every scene of feud or merriment for miles
round. In cold weather, he was distinguished by a fur cap,
surmounted with a flaunting fox's tail, and when the folks at a
country gathering described this well-known crest at a distance,
whisking about among a squad of hard riders, they always stood
by for a squall. Sometimes his crew would be heard dashing
along past the farmhouses at midnight, with whoop and halloo,
like a troop of Don Cossacks, and the old dames, startled out
of their sleep, would listen for a moment, till the hurry-scurry
had clattered by, and then exclaim, Ay, there goes Brom
Bones and his gang! The neighbors looked upon him with
a mixture of awe, admiration, and good will, and when any
madcap prank or rustic brawl occurred in the vicinity, always
shook their heads, and warranted Brom Bones was at the
bottom
of it.
This rantipole hero had for some time singled out the
blooming
Katrina for the object of his uncouth gallantries, and
though his amorous toyings were something like the gentle
caresses and endearments of a bear, yet it was whispered that
she did not altogether discourage his hopes. Certain it is, his
advances were signals for rival candidates to retire, who felt
no inclination to cross a lion in his amours; insomuch, that
when his horse was seen tied to Van Tassel's paling on a
Sunday night, a sure sign that his master was courting, or as it
is termed, sparking, within, all other suitors passed by in
despair, and carried the war into other quarters.
Such was the formidable rival with whom Ichabod Crane
had to contend, and, considering all things, a stouter man than
he would have shrunk from the competition, and a wiser man
would have despaired. He had, however, a happy mixture of
pliability and perseverance in his nature; he was in form and
spirit like a supple-jackyielding, but tough; though he bent,
he never broke, and though he bowed beneath the slightest
pressure, yet the moment it was awayjerk! he was as erect,
and carried his head as high as ever.
To have taken the field openly against his rival would have
been madness, for he was not a man to be thwarted in his
amours, any more than that stormy lover, Achilles. Ichabod,
therefore, made his advances in a quiet and gently-insinuating
manner. Under cover of his character of singing master, he
made frequent visits at the farmhouse; not that he had
anything
to apprehend from the meddlesome interference of
parents
,
which is so often a stumbling-block in the path of lovers.
Balt Van Tassel was an easy, indulgent soul; he loved his
daughter better even than his pipe, and, like a reasonable man
and an excellent father, let her have her way in everything.
His notable little wife, too, had enough to do to attend to her
housekeeping and manage her poultry, for, as she sagely
observed
,
3*
ducks and geese are foolish things, and must be looked
after, but girls can take care of themselves. Thus while
the busy dame bustled about the house, or plied her
spinning-wheel
at one end of the piazza, honest Balt would sit
smoking his evening pipe at the other, watching the
achievements
of a little wooden warrior, who, armed with a sword in
each hand, was most valiantly fighting the wind on the pinnacle
of the barn. In the meantime, Ichabod would carry on his
suit with the daughter, by the side of the spring, under the
great elm, or sauntering along in the twilight, that hour so
favorable
to the lover's eloquence.
I profess not to know how women's hearts are wooed and
won. To me they have always been matters of riddle and
admiration. Some seem to have but one vulnerable point, or
door of access, while others have a thousand avenues, and may
be captured in a thousand different ways. It is a great triumph
of skill to gain the former, but a still greater proof of
generalship
to maintain possession of the latter, for a man must
battle
for his fortress at every door and window. He who wins
a thousand common hearts is therefore entitled to some
renown
,
but he who keeps undisputed sway over the heart of a
coquette, is indeed a hero. Certain it is, this was not the case
with the redoubtable Brom Bones, and from the moment
Ichabod Crane made his advances, the interests of the former
evidently declined; his horse was no longer seen tied to the
palings on Sunday nights, and a deadly feud gradually arose
between him and the preceptor of Sleepy Hollow.
Brom, who had a degree of rough chivalry in his nature,
would fain have carried matters to open warfare, and have
settled
their pretensions to the lady according to the mode of
those most concise and simple reasoners, the knight-errants of
yoreby single combat; but Ichabod was too conscious of
the superior might of his adversary, to enter the lists against
him; he had overheard a boast of Bones, that he would
double the schoolmaster up, and lay him on a shelf of his
own school-house, and he was too wary to give him an
opportunity
.
There was something extremely provoking in this
obstinately pacific system; it left Brom no alternative but to
draw upon the funds of rustic waggery in his disposition, and
to play off boorish practical jokes upon his rival. Ichabod
became the object of whimsical persecution to Bones and his
gang of rough riders. They harried his hitherto peaceful
domains
;
smoked out his singing school, by stopping up the
chimney; broke into the school-house at night, in spite of its
formidable fastenings of withe and window stakes, and turned
everything topsy-turvy, so that the poor schoolmaster began to
think all the witches in the country held their meetings there.
But what was still more annoying, Brom took all
opportunities
of turning him into ridicule in presence of his mistress,
and had a scoundrel dog, whom he taught to whine in the most
ludicrous manner, and introduced as a rival of Ichabod's, to
instruct her in psalmody.
In this way matters went on for some time, without producing
any material effect on the relative situation of the contending
powers. On a fine autumnal afternoon, Ichabod, in pensive
mood, sat enthroned on the lofty stool whence he usually
watched all the concerns of his little literary realm. In his
hand he swayed a ferule, that sceptre of despotic power; the
birch of justice reposed on three nails, behind the throne, a
constant terror to evil doers; while on a desk before him might
be seen sundry contraband articles and prohibited weapons,
detected
upon the persons of idle urchins, such as half-munched
apples, popguns, whirligigs, fly-cages, and whole legions of
rampant little paper game-cocks. Apparently, there had been
some appalling act of justice recently inflicted, for his scholars
were all busily intent upon their books, or slily whispering
behind
them, with one eye kept upon the master, and a kind of
buzzing stillness reigned throughout the school-room. It was
suddenly interrupted by the appearance of a negro, in
tow-cloth
jacket and trowsers, a round crowned fragment of a hat,
like the cap of Mercury, and mounted on the back of a ragged,
wild, half-broken colt, which he managed with a rope, by way
of halter. He came clattering up to the school door with an
invitation
to Ichabod to attend a merry making, or quilting frolic,
to be held that evening at Mynheer Van Tassel's, and having
delivered
his message with that air of importance, and effort at
fine language, which a negro is apt to display on petty
embassies
of the kind, he dashed over the brook, and was seen
scampering away up the hollow, full of the importance and
hurry of his mission.
All was now bustle and hubbub in the late quiet
school-room
.
The scholars were hurried through their lessons,
without
stopping at trifles; those who were nimble, skipped over
half with impunity, and those who were tardy, had a smart
application now and then in the rear, to quicken their speed,
or help them over a tall word. Books were flung aside
without
being put away on the shelves, inkstands were overturned,
benches thrown down, and the whole school was turned loose
an hour before the usual time, bursting forth like a legion of
young imps, yelping and racketing about the green, in joy at
their early emancipation.
The gallant Ichabod now spent at least an extra half hour at
his toilet, brushing and furbishing up his best, and indeed only
suit of rusty black, and arranging his looks by a bit of broken
looking-glass, that hung up in the school house. That he
might make his appearance before his mistress in the true style
of a cavalier, he borrowed a horse from the farmer with whom
he was domiciliated, a choleric old Dutchman, of the name of
Hans Van Ripper, and, thus gallantly mounted, issued forth,
like a knight errant in quest of adventures. But it is meet I
should, in the true spirit of romantic story, give some account
of the looks and equipments of my hero and his steed. The
animal he bestrode was a broken down plough horse, that had
outlived almost everything but his viciousness. He was gaunt
and shagged, with a ewe neck and a head like a hammer; his
rusty mane and tail were tangled and knotted with burrs; one
eye had lost its pupil, and was glaring and spectral, but the
other had the gleam of a genuine devil in it. Still he must
have had fire and mettle in his day, if we may judge from the
name he bore of Gunpowder. He had, in fact, been a favorite
steed of his master's, the choleric Van Ripper, who was a furious
rider, and had infused, very probably, some of his own spirit
into the animal; for, old and broken down as he looked, there
was more of the lurking devil in him than in any young filly
in the country.
Ichabod was a suitable figure for such a steed. He rode
with short stirrups, which brought his knees nearly up to the
pommel of the saddle; his sharp elbows stuck out like
grass-hoppers'
;
he carried his whip perpendicularly in his hand, like
a sceptre, and, as his horse jogged on, the motion of his arms
was not unlike the flapping of a pair of wings. A small wool
hat rested on the top of his nose, for so his seanty strip of
forehead
might be called, and the skirts of his black coat fluttered
out almost to the horse's tail. Such was the appearance of
Ichabod and his steed, as they shambled out of the gate of
Hans Van Ripper, and it was altogether such an apparition
as is seldom to be met with in broad daylight.
It was, as I have said, a fine autumnal day; the sky was
clear and serene, and nature wore that rich and golden livery
which we always associate with the idea of abundance. The
forests had put on their sober brown and yellow, while some
trees of the tenderer kind had been nipped by the frosts into
brilliant dyes of orange, purple, and scarlet. Streaming files
of wild ducks began to make their appearance high in the air;
the bark of the squirrel might be heard from the groves of
beech and hickory nuts, and the pensive whistle of the quail at
intervals from the neighboring stubble field.
The small birds were taking their farewell banquets. In the
fulness of their revelry, they fluttered, chirping and frolicking,
from bush to bush, and tree to tree, capricious from the very
profusion and variety around them. There was the honest
cock-robin, the favorite game of stripling sportsmen, with its
loud querulous note, and the twittering blackbirds flying in
sable clouds, and the golden-winged woodpecker, with his
crimson crest, his broad black gorget, and splendid plumage,
and the cedar bird, with its red-tipt wings and yellow-tipt tail,
and its little monteiro cap of feathers, and the blue jay, that
noisy coxcomb, in his gay light blue coat and white under
clothes, screaming and chattering, nodding, and bobbing, and
bowing, pretending to be on good terms with every songster
of the grove.
As Ichabod jogged slowly on his way, his eye, ever open to
every symptom of culinary abundance, ranged with delight
over the treasures of jolly autumn. On all sides he beheld
vast store of apples, some hanging in oppressive opulence on
the trees, some gathered into baskets and barrels for the
market
,
others heaped up in rich piles for the cider-press. Further
on he beheld great fields of Indian corn, with its golden ears
peeping from their leafy coverts, and holding out the promise of
cakes and hasty pudding, and the yellow pumpkins lying beneath
them, turning up their fair round bellies to the sun, and giving
ample prospects of the most luxurious of pies; and anon he
passed the fragrant buckwheat fields, breathing the odor of the
bee-hive, and as he beheld them, soft anticipations stole over
his mind of dainty slapjacks, well buttered, and garnished with
honey or treacle, by the delicate little dimpled hand of
Katrina Van Tassel.
Thus feeding his mind with many sweet thoughts and
sugared suppositions, he journeyed along the sides of a range
of hills which look out upon some of the goodliest scenes of
the mighty Hudson. The sun gradually wheeled his broad
dise down into the west. The wide bosom of the Tappan
Zee lay motionless and glassy, excepting that here and there a
gentle undulation waved and prolonged the blue shadow of the
distant mountain. A few amber clouds floated in the sky,
without a breath of air to move them. The horizon was of a
fine golden tint, changing gradually into a pure apple green,
and from that into the deep blue of the mid heaven. A
slanting
ray lingered on the woody crests of the precipices that
overhung some parts of the river, giving greater depth to the
dark grcy and purple of their rocky sides. A sloop was
loitering in the distance, dropping slowly down with the tide,
her sail hanging uselessly against the mast; and as the
reflection
of the sky gleamed along the still water, it seemed as if
the vessel was suspended in the air.
It was towards evening that Ichabod arrived at the castle of
the Heer Van Tassel, which he found thronged with the pride
and flower of the adjacent country. Old farmers, a spare
leathern-faced race, in homespun coats and breeches, blue
stockings, huge shoes, and magnificent pewter buckles. Their
brisk withered little dames, in close crimped caps, long-waisted
shortgowns, homespun petticoats, with scissors and pincushions,
and gay calico pockets hanging on the outside. Buxom
lasses, almost as antiquated as their mothers, excepting where
a straw hat, a fine riband, or perhaps a white frock, gave
symptoms of city innovation. The sons, in short
square-skirted
coats with rows of stupendous brass buttons, and
their hair generally queued in the fashion of the times, especially
if they could procure an eel-skin for the purpose, it being
esteemed, throughout the country, as a potent nourisher and
strengthener of the hair.
Brom Bones, however, was the hero of the scene, having
come to the gathering on his favorite steed Daredevil, a
creature
,
like himself, full of mettle and mischief, and which no one
but himself could manage. He was, in fact, noted for
preferring
vicious animals, given to all kinds of tricks, which kept
the rider in constant risk of his neck, for he held a tractable
well-broken horse as unworthy of a lad of spirit.
Fain would I pause to dwell upon the world of charms that
burst upon the enraptured gaze of my hero, as he entered the
state parlor of Van Tassel's mansion. Not those of the bevy
of buxom lesses, with their luxurious display of red and white;
but the ample charms of a genuine Dutch country tea-table, in
the sumptuous time of autumn. Such heaped-up platters of
cakes of various and almost indescribable kinds, known only to
experienced Dutch housewives! There was the doughty
dough-nut, the tenderer oly koek, and the crisp and crumbling
cruller; sweet cakes and short cakes, ginger cakes and honey
cakes, and the whole family of cakes. And then there were
apple pies and peach pies and pumpkin pies; besides slices of
ham and smoked beef; and moreover delectable dishes of
preserved
plums, and peaches, and pears, and quinces; not to
mention broiled shad and roasted chickens; together with
bowls of milk and cream, all mingled higgledy-piggledy, pretty
much as I have enumerated them, with the motherly tea-pot
sending up its clouds of vapor from the midstHeaven bless
the mark! I want breath and time to discuss this banquet as
it deserves, and am too eager to get on with my story.
Happily, Ichabod Crane was not in so great a hurry as his
historian, but did ample justice to every dainty.
He was a kind and thankful creature, whose heart dilated in
proportion as his skin was filled with good cheer; and whose
spirits rose with eating as some men's do with drink. He could
not help, too, rolling his large eyes round him as he ate, and
chuckling with the possibility that he might one day be lord of
all this scene of almost unimaginable luxury and splendor.
Then, he thought, how soon he'd turn his back upon the old
school-house; snap his fingers in the face of Hans Van Ripper,
and every other niggardly patron, and kick any itinerant
pedagogue out of doors that should dare to call him comrade!
Old Baltus Van Tassel moved about among his guests with
a face dilated with content and good humor, round and jolly
as the harvest moon. His hospitable attentions were brief, but
expressive, being confined to a shake of the hand, a slap on the
shoulder, a loud laugh, and a pressing invitation to fall to,
and help themselves.
And now the sound of the music from the common room, or
hall, summoned to the dance. The musician was an old
grey-headed negro, who had been the itinerant orchestra of the
neighborhood for more than half a century. His instrument
was as old and battered as himself. The greater part of the
time he scraped on two or three strings, accompanying every
movement of the bow with a motion of the head; bowing
almost to the ground, and stamping with his foot whenever a
fresh couple were to start.
Ichabod prided himself upon his dancing as much as upon
his vocal powers. Not a limb, not a fibre about him was idle;
and to have seen his loosely hung frame in full motion, and
clattering about the room, you would have thought Saint Vitus
himself, that blessed patron of the dance, was figuring before
you in person. He was the admiration of all the negroes;
who, having gathered, of all ages and sizes, from the farm and
the neighborhood, stood forming a pyramid of shining black
faces at every door and window, gazing with delight at the
scene, rolling their white eyeballs, and showing grinning rows
of ivory from ear to ear. How could the flogger of urchins be
otherwise than animated and joyous? The lady of his heart was
his partner in the dance, and smiling graciously in reply to all
his amorous oglings; while Brom Bones, sorely smitten with
love and jealousy, sat brooding by himself in one corner.
When the dance was at an end, Ichabod was attracted to a
knot of the sager folks, who, with old Van Tassel, sat smoking
at one end of the piazza, gossiping over former times, and
drawing out long stories about the war.
This neighborhood, at the time of which I am speaking, was
one of those highly favored places which abound with chronicle
and great men. The British and American line had run near
it during the war; it had, therefore, been the scene of
marauding
,
and infested with refugees, cow-boys, and all kinds of
border chivalry. Just sufficient time had elapsed to enable
each story-teller to dress up his tale with a little becoming
fiction, and, in the indistinctness of his recollection, to make
himself the hero of every exploit.
There was the story of Duffue Martling, a large
blue-bearded
Dutchman, who had nearly taken a British frigate with
an old iron nine-pounder from a mud breastwork, only that his
gun burst at the sixth discharge. And there was an old
gentleman
who shall be nameless, being too rich a mynheer to be
lightly mentioned, who, in the battle of Whiteplains, being an
excellent master of defence, parried a musket ball with a small
sword, insomuch that he absolutely felt it whiz round the blade,
and glance off at the hilt: in proof of which, he was ready at
any time to show the sword, with the hilt a little bent. There
were several more that had been equally great in the field, not
one of whom but was persuaded that he had a considerable
hand in bringing the war to a happy termination.
But all these were nothing to the tales of ghosts and
apparitions
that succeeded. The neighborhood is rich in legendary
treasures of the kind. Local tales and superstitions thrive best
in these sheltered, long-settled retreats; but are trampled under
foot by the shifting throng that forms the population of most
of our country places. Besides, there is no encouragement for
ghosts in most of our villages, for they have scarcely had time
to finish their first nap, and turn themselves in their graves,
before their surviving friends have travelled away from the
neighborhood; so that when they turn out at night to walk
their rounds, they have no acquaintance left to call upon.
This is, perhaps, the reason why we so seldom hear of ghosts
except in our long-established Dutch communities.
The immediate cause, however, of the prevalence of
supernatural
stories in these parts, was doubtless owing to the
vicinity of Sleepy Hollow. There was a contagion in the
very air that blew from that haunted region; it breathed forth
an atmosphere of dreams and fancies infecting all the land.
Several of the Sleepy Hollow people were present at Van
Tassel's, and, as usual, were doling out their wild and
wonderful
legends. Many dismal tales were told about funeral
trains, and mourning cries and wailings heard and seen about
the great tree where the unfortunate Major Andr was taken,
and which stood in the neighborhood. Some mention was
made also of the woman in white, that haunted the dark glen
at Raven Rock, and was often heard to shriek on winter
nights before a storm, having perished there in the snow. The
chief part of the stories, however, turned upon the favorite
spectre of Sleepy Hollow, the headless horseman, who had
been heard several times of late, patrolling the country; and,
it was said, tethered his horse nightly among the graves in the
church-yard.
The sequestered situation of this church seems always to
have made it a favorite haunt of troubled spirits. It stands on
a knoll, surrounded by locust-trees and lofty elms, from among
which its decent whitewashed walls shine modestly forth, like
Christian purity, beaming through the shades of retirement. A
gentle slope descends from it to a silver sheet of water,
bordered
by high trees, between which peeps may be caught at
the blue hills of the Hudson. To look upon its grass-grown
yard, where the sunbeams seem to sleep so quietly, one would
think that there at least the dead might rest in peace. On one
side of the church extends a wide woody dell, along which
raves a large brook among broken rocks and trunks of fallen
trees. Over a deep black part of the stream, not far from the
church, was formerly thrown a wooden bridge; the road that
led to it, and the bridge itself, were thickly shaded by
overhanging
trees, which cast a gloom about it, even in the
daytime; but occasioned a fearful darkness at night. Such
was one of the favorite haunts of the headless horseman; and
the place where he was most frequently encountered. The
tale was told of old Brouwer, a most heretical disbeliever in
ghosts, how he met the horseman returning from his foray into
Sleepy Hollow, and was obliged to get up behind him; how
they galloped over bush and brake, over hill and swamp, until
they reached the bridge; when the horseman suddenly turned
into a skeleton, threw old Brouwer into the brook, and sprang
away over the tree-tops with a clap of thunder.
This story was immediately matched by a thrice marvellous
adventure of Brom Bones, who made light of the galloping
Hessian as an arrant jockey. He affirmed that, on returning
one night from the neighboring village of Sing-Sing, he had
been overtaken by this midnight trooper; that he had offered
to race with him for a bowl of punch, and should have won it
too, for Daredevil beat the goblin horse all hollow, but, just as
they came to the church bridge, the Hessian bolted, and
vanished in a flash of fire.
All these tales, told in that drowsy undertone with which
men talk in the dark, the countenances of the listeners only
now and then receiving a casual gleam from the glare of a
pipe, sank deep into the mind of Ichabod. He repaid them in
kind with large extracts from his invaluable author, Cotton
Mather, and added many marvellous events that had taken
place in his native state of Connecticut, and fearful sights
which he had seen in his nightly walks about Sleepy Hollow.
The revel now gradually broke up. The old farmers
gathered together their families in their wagons, and were
heard for some time rattling along the hollow roads, and over
the distant hills. Some of the damsels mounted on pillions
behind their favorite swains, and their light-hearted laughter,
mingling with the clatter of hoofs, echoed along the silent
woodlands, sounding fainter and fainter until they gradually
died awayand the late scene of noise and frolic was all
silent and deserted. Ichabod only lingered behind, according
to the custom of country lovers, to have a tte--tte with
the heiress, fully convinced that he was now on the high road
to success. What passed at this interview I will not pretend
to say, for in fact I do not know. Something, however, I fear
me, must have gone wrong, for he certainly sallied forth, after
no very great interval, with an air quite desolate and
chopfallen
Oh
these women! these women! Could that girl
have been playing off any of her coquettish tricks?Was her
encouragement of the poor pedagogue all a mere sham to
secure her conquest of his rival?Heaven only knows, not
I!Let it suffice to say, Ichabod stole forth with the air of
one who had been sacking a hen-roost, rather than a fair lady's
heart. Without looking to the right or left to notice the scene
of rural wealth, on which he had so often gloated, he went
straight to the stable, and with several hearty cuffs and kicks,
roused his steed most uncourteously from the comfortable
quarters in which he was soundly sleeping, dreaming of
mountains of corn and oats, and whole valleys of timothy and
clover.
It was the very witching time of night that Ichabod,
heavy-hearted
and crest-fallen, pursued his travel homewards, along
the sides of the lofty hills which rise above Tarry Town, and
which he had traversed so cheerily in the afternoon. The
hour was as dismal as himself. Far below him, the Tappan
Zee spread its dusky and indistinct waste of waters, with here
and there the tall mast of a sloop, riding quietly at anchor
under the land. In the dead hush of midnight, he could even
hear the barking of the watch-dog from the opposite shore of
the Hudson; but it was so vague and faint as only to give an
idea of his distance from this faithful companion of man.
Now and then, too, the long-drawn crowing of a cock,
accidentally awakened, would sound far, far off, from some
farmhouse away among the hillsbut it was like a dreaming
sound in his ear. No signs of life occurred near him, but
occasionally the melancholy chirp of a cricket, or perhaps the
guttural twang of a bull-frog, from a neighboring marsh, as if
sleeping uncomfortably, and turning suddenly in his bed.
All the stories of ghosts and goblins that he had heard in
the afternoon, now came crowding upon his recollection. The
night grew darker and darker; the stars seemed to sink deeper
in the sky, and driving clouds occasionally hid them from his
sight. He had never felt so lonely and dismal. He was,
moreover, approaching the very place where many of the
scenes of the ghost stories had been laid. In the centre of the
road stood an enormous tulip-tree, which towered like a giant
above all the other trees of the neighborhood, and formed a
kind of landmark. Its limbs were gnarled, and fantastic,
large enough to form trunks for ordinary trees, twisting down
almost to the earth, and rising again into the air. It was
connected with the tragical story of the unfortunate Andr,
who had been taken prisoner hard by; and was universally
known by the name of Major Andr's tree. The common
people regarded it with a mixture of respect and superstition,
partly out of sympathy for the fate of its ill-starred namesake,
and partly from the tales of strange sights and doleful
lamentations
told concerning it.
As Ichabod approached this fearful tree, he began to whistle:
he thought his whistle was answeredit was but a blast
sweeping
sharply through the dry branches. As he approached a
little nearer, he thought he saw something white, hanging in
the midst of the treehe paused and ceased whistling; but on
looking more narrowly, perceived that it was a place where the
tree had been scathed by lightning, and the white wood laid
bare. Suddenly he heard a groanhis teeth chattered and his
knees smote against the saddle: it was but the rubbing of one
huge bough upon another, as they were swayed about by the
breeze. He passed the tree in safety, but new perils lay before
him.
About two hundred yards from the tree a small brook crossed
the road, and ran into a marshy and thickly-wooded glen,
known by the name of Wiley's swamp. A few rough logs,
laid side by side, served for a bridge over this stream. On that
side of the road where the brook entered the wood, a group of
oaks and chestnuts, matted thick with wild grape-vines, threw
a cavernous gloom over it. To pass this bridge was the
severest trial. It was at this identical spot that the unfortunate
Andr was captured, and under the covert of those chestnuts
and vines were the sturdy yeomen concealed who surprised
him. This has ever since been considered a haunted stream,
and fearful are the feelings of the schoolboy who has to pass it
alone after dark.
As he approached the stream, his heart began to thump; he
summoned up, however, all his resolution, gave his horse half a
score of kicks in the ribs, and attempted to dash briskly across
the bridge; but instead of starting forward, the perverse old
animal made a lateral movement, and ran broadside against
the fence. Ichabod, whose fears increased with the delay,
jerked the reins on the other side, and kicked lustily with the
contrary foot: it was all in vain; his steed started, it is true,
but it was only to plunge to the opposite side of the road into
a thicket of brambles and alder bushes. The schoolmaster
now bestowed both whip and heel upon the starveling ribs of
old Gunpowder, who dashed forward, snuffling and snorting,
but came to a stand just by the bridge, with a suddenness that
had nearly sent his rider sprawling over his head. Just at this
moment a plashy tramp by the side of the bridge caught the
sensitive ear of Ichabod. In the dark shadow of the grove, on
the margin of the brook, he beheld something huge, misshapen,
black, and towering. It stirred not, but seemed gathered up in
the gloom, like some gigantic monster ready to spring upon the
traveller.
The hair of the affrighted pedagogue rose upon his head with
terror. What was to be done? To turn and fly was now too
late; and besides, what chance was there of escaping ghost or
goblin, if such it was, which could ride upon the wings of the
wind? Summoning up, therefore, a show of courage, he
demanded in stammering accentsWho are you? He
received no reply. He repeated his demand in a still more
agitated voice. Still there was no answer. Once more he
cudgelled the sides of the inflexible Gunpowder, and, shutting
his eyes, broke forth with involuntary fervor into a psalm tune.
Just then the shadowy object of alarm put itself in motion, and,
with a scramble and a bound, stood at once in the middle of
the road. Though the night was dark and dismal, yet the
form of the unknown might now in some degree be ascertained.
He appeared to be a horseman of large dimensions, and
mounted on a black horse of powerful frame. He made no
offer of molestation or sociability, but kept aloof on one side of
the road, jogging along on the blind side of old Gunpowder,
who had now got over his fright and waywardness.
Ichabod, who had no relish for this strange midnight
companion
,
and bethought himself of the adventure of Brom Bones
with the Galloping Hessian, now quickened his steed, in hopes
of leaving him behind. The stranger, however, quickened his
horse to an equal pace. Ichabod pulled up, and fell into a
walk, thinking to lag behindthe other did the same. His
heart began to sink within him; he endeavored to resume his
psalm tune, but his parched tongue clove to the roof of his
mouth, and he could not utter a stave. There was something
in the moody and dogged silence of this pertinacious
companion
,
that was mysterious and appalling. It was soon
fearfully accounted for. On mounting a rising ground, which
brought the figure of his fellow traveller in relief against the sky,
gigantic in height, and muffled in a cloak, Ichabod was
horror struck, on perceiving that he was headless!but his
horror was still more increased, on observing that the head,
which should have rested on his shoulders, was carried before
him on the pommel of the saddle: his terror rose to
desperation
;
he rained a shower of kicks and blows upon Gunpowder,
hoping, by a sudden movement, to give his companion the slip
but the spectre started full jump with him. Away then they
dashed, through thick and thin; stones flying, and sparks
flashing, at every bound. Ichabod's flimsy garments fluttered
in the air, as he stretched his long lank body away over his
horse's head, in the eagerness of his flight.
They had now reached the road which turns off to Sleepy
Hollow; but Gunpowder, who seemed possessed with a demon,
instead of keeping up it, made an opposite turn, and plunged
headlong down hill to the left. This road leads through a
sandy hollow, shaded by trees for about a quarter of a mile,
where it crosses the bridge famous in goblin story, and just
beyond swells the green knoll on which stands the
whitewashed
church.
As yet the panic of the steed had given his unskilful rider
an apparent advantage in the chase; but just as he had got half
way through the hollow, the girths of the saddle gave way, and
he felt it slipping from under him. He seized it by the pommel,
and endeavored to hold it firm, but in vain; and had just time
to save himself by clasping old Gunpowder round the neck,
when the saddle fell to the earth, and he heard it trampled
under foot by his pursuer. For a moment the terror of Hans
Van Ripper's wrath passed across his mindfor it was his
Sunday saddle; but this was no time for petty fears; the goblin
was hard on his haunches; and (unskilful rider that he was!)
he had much ado to maintain his seat; sometimes slipping on
one side, sometimes on another, and sometimes jolted on the
high ridge of his horse's back bone, with a violence that he
verily feared would cleave him asunder.
An opening in the trees now cheered him with the hopes that
the church bridge was at hand. The wavering reflection of a
silver star in the bosom of the brook told him that he was not
mistaken. He saw the walls of the church dimly glaring
under
the trees beyond. He recollected the place where Brom
Bones' ghostly competitor had disappeared. If I can but
reach that bridge, thought Ichabod, I am safe. Just then
he heard the black steed panting and blowing close behind
him; he even fancied that he felt his hot breath. Another
convulsive kick in the ribs, and old Gunpowder sprang upon
the bridge; he thundered over the resounding planks; he
gained the opposite side, and now Ichabod cast a look behind
to see if his pursuer should vanish, according to rule, in a flash
of fire and brimstone. Just then he saw the goblin rising in
his stirrup, and in the very act of hurling his head at him.
Ichabod endeavored to dodge the horrible missile, but too late.
It encountered his cranium with a tremendous crashhe was
tumbled headlong into the dust, and Gunpowder, the black
steed, and the goblin rider passed by like a whirlwind.
The next morning the old horse was found without his
saddle
,
and with the bridle under his feet, soberly cropping the
grass at his master's gate. Ichabod did not make his
appearance
at breakfastdinner hour came, but no Ichabod. The
boys assembled at the school-house, and strolled idly about the
banks of the brook, but no schoolmaster. Hans Van Ripper
now began to feel some uneasiness about the fate of poor
Ichabod and his saddle. An inquiry was set on foot, and after
diligent investigation they came upon his traces. In one part
4
of the road leading to the church was found the saddle
trampled in the dirt; the tracks of horses' hoofs deeply dented
in the road, and evidently at furious speed, were traced to the
bridge, beyond which, on the bank of a broad part of the
brook, where the water ran deep and black, was found the
hat of the unfortunate Ichabod, and close beside it a shattered
pumpkin.
The brook was searched, but the body of the schoolmaster
was not to be discovered. Hans Van Ripper, as executor of
his estate, examined the bundle which contained all his worldly
effects. They consisted of two shirts and a half, two stocks
for the neck, a pair or two of worsted stockings, an old pair
of corduroy small-clothes, a rusty razor, a book of psalm
tunes, full of dog's ears, and a broken pitch pipe. As to the
books and furniture of the school-house, they belonged to the
community, excepting Cotton Mather's History of Witchcraft,
a New England Almanac, and a book of dreams and
fortune-telling
,
in which last was a sheet of foolscap, much scribbled
and blotted, in several fruitless attempts to make a copy of
verses in honor of the heiress of Van Tassel. These magic
books and the poetic scrawl were forthwith consigned to the
flames by Hans Van Ripper, who, from that time forward,
determined
to send his children no more to school, observing,
that he never knew any good come of this same reading and
writing. Whatever money the schoolmaster possessed, and he
had received his quarter's pay but a day or two before, he must
have had about his person at the time of his disappearance.
The mysterious event caused much speculation at the
church on the following Sunday. Knots of gazers and
gossips
were collected in the churchyard, at the bridge, and at the
spot where the hat and pumpkin had been found. The stories
of Brouwer, of Bones, and a whole budget of others, were
called to mind, and when they had diligently considered them
all, and compared them with the symptoms of the present case,
they shook their heads, and came to the conclusion that Ichabod
has been carried off by the galloping Hessian. As he was a
bachelor, and in nobody's debt, nobody troubled his head any
more about him; the school was removed to a different
quarter
of the hollow, and another pedagogue reigned in his
stead.
It is true, an old farmer, who had been down to New York
on a visit several years after, and from whom this account of
the ghostly adventure was received, brought home the
intelligence
that Ichabod Crane was still alive; that he had left the
neighborhood, partly through fear of the goblin and Hans Van
Ripper, and partly in mortification at having been suddenly
dismissed by the heiress; that he had changed his quarters to a
distant part of the country, had kept school and studied law
at the same time, had been admitted to the bar, turned
politician
,
electioneered, written for the newspapers, and finally had
been made a justice of the Ten Pound Court. Brom Bones,
too, who shortly after his rival's disappearance conducted the
blooming Katrina in triumph to the altar, was observed to look
exceedingly knowing whenever the story of Ichabod was
related
,
and always burst into a hearty laugh at the mention of
the pumpkin, which led some to suspect that he knew more
about the matter than he chose to tell.
The old country wives, however, who are the best judges of
these matters, maintain to this day that Ichabod was spirited
away by supernatural means, and it is a favorite story often
told about the neighborhood round the winter evening fire.
The bridge became more than ever an object of superstitious
awe, and that may be the reason why the road has been altered
of late years, so as to approach the church by the border of
the mill-pond. The school-house being deserted, soon fell to
decay, and was reported to be haunted by the ghost of the
unfortunate
pedagogue, and the ploughboy, loitering homeward
of a still summer evening, has often fancied his voice at a
distance
,
chanting a melancholy psalm tune among the tranquil
solitudes of Sleepy Hollow.
POSTSCRIPT.
FOUND IN THE HANDWRITING OF MR. KNICKERBOCKER.
The
preceding Tale is given almost in the precise words in
which I heard it related at a Corporation meeting at the
ancient
city of Manhattoes, at which were present many of its
sagest and most illustrious burghers. The narrator was a
pleasant, shabby, gentlemanly old fellow, in pepper-and-salt
clothes, with a sadly humorous face, and one whom I strongly
suspected of being poorhe made such efforts to be
entertaining
.
When his story was concluded, there was much
laughter and approbation, particularly from two or three
deputy aldermen, who had been asleep the greater part of the
time. There was, however, one tall, dry looking old
gentleman
,
with beetling eyebrows, who maintained a grave and
rather severe face throughout, now and then folding his arms,
inclining his head, and looking down upon the floor, as if
turning
a doubt over in his mind. He was one of your wary men,
who never laugh but upon good groundswhen they have
reason and law on their side. When the mirth of the rest of
the company had subsided, and silence was restored, he leaned
one arm on the elbow of his chair, and, sticking the other
a-kimbo, demanded, with a slight, but exceedingly sage motion
of the head, and contraction of the brow, what was the
moral of the story, and what it went to prove?
The story teller, who was just putting a glass of wine to his
lips, as a refreshment after his toils, paused for a moment,
looked
at his inquirer with an air of infinite deference, and,
lowering
the glass slowly to the table, observed, that the story was
intended most logically to prove
That there is no situation in life but has its advantages and
pleasuresprovided we will but take a joke as we find it:
That, therefore, he that runs races with goblin troopers is
likely to have rough riding of it.
Ergo, for a country schoolmaster to be refused the hand
of a Dutch heiress, is a certain step to high preferment in the
state.
The cautious old gentleman knit his brows tenfold closer
after this explanation, being sorely puzzled by the ratiocination
of the syllogism, while, methought, the one in pepper-and-salt
eyed him with something of a triumphant leer. At length, he
observed, that all this was very well, but still he thought the
story a little on the extravagantthere were one or two points
on which he had his doubts.
Faith, sir, replied the story teller, as to that matter, I
don't believe one half of it myself.
D. K.
DOLPH HEYLIGER.
I take the town of concord, where I dwell,
All Kilborn be my witness, if I were not
Begot in bashfulness, brought up in shamefacedness:
Let 'unxs bring a dog but to my vace that can
Zay I have beat 'un, and without a vault;
Or but a cat will swear upon a book,
I have as much as zet a vire her tail,
And I'll give him or her a crown for 'mends.
Tale of a Tub
.
In
the early time of the province of New York, while it
groaned under the tyranny of the English governor, Lord
Cornbury, who carried his cruelties towards the Dutch
inhabitants
so far as to allow no Dominie, or schoolmaster, to
officiate in their language, without his special license; about
this time, there lived in the jolly little old city of the
Manhattoes
,
a kind motherly dame, known by the name of Dame
Heyliger. She was the widow of a Dutch sea-captain, who
died suddenly of a fever, in consequence of working too hard,
and eating too heartily, at the time when all the inhabitants
turned out in a panic, to fortify the place against the invasion
of a small French privateer.
*
*
1705.
He left her with very little
money, and one infant son, the only survivor of several
children. The good woman had need of much management
to make both ends meet, and keep up a decent appearance.
However, as her husband had fallen a victim to his zeal for the
public safety, was universally agreed that something ought
to be done for the widow; and on the hopes of this something
she lived tolerably for some years; in the meantime
everybody
pitied and spoke well of her, and that helped along.
She lived in a small house, in a small street, called
Garden-street
,
very probably from a garden which may have flourished
there some time or other. As her necessities every year-grew
greater, and the talk of the public about doing something
for her grew less, she had to cast about for some mode of
doing something for herself, by way of helping out her slender
means, and maintaining her independence, of which she was
somewhat tenacious.
Living in a mercantile town, she had caught something of
the spirit, and determined to venture a little in the great lottery
of commerce. On a sudden, therefore, to the great surprise of
the street, there appeared at her window a grand array of
gingerbread kings and queens, with their arms stuck a-kimbo,
after the invariable royal manner. There were also several
broken tumblers, some filled with sugar-plums, some with
marbles; there were, moreover, cakes of various kinds, and
barley-sugar, and Holland dolls, and wooden horses, with
here and there gilt-covered picture-books, and now and then
a skein of thread, or a dangling pound of candles. At the
door of the house sat the good old dame's cat, a decent
demure-looking personage, who seemed to scan everybody
that passed, to criticise their dress, and now and then to
stretch her neck, and to look out with sudden curiosity, to
see what was going on at the other end of the street; but if
by chance any idle vagabond dog came by, and offered to be
uncivilhoity-toity!how she would bristle up, and growl,
and spit, and strike out her paws! she was as indignant as
ever was an ancient and ugly spinster on the approach of some
graceless profligate.
But though the good woman had to come down to those
humble means of subsistence, yet she still kept up a feeling of
family pride, being descended from the Vanderspiegels, of
Amsterdam; and she had the family arms painted and framed,
and hung over her mantel-piece. She was, in truth, much
respected
by all the poorer people of the place; her house was
quite a resort of the old wives of the neighborhood; they
would drop in there of a winter's afternoon, as she sat knitting
on one side of her fireplace, her cat purring on the other, and
the tea-kettle singing before it, and they would gossip with her
until late in the evening. There was always an arm chair for
Peter de Groodt, sometimes called Long Peter, and sometimes
Peter Longlegs, the clerk and sexton of the little Lutheran
church, who was her great crony, and, indeed, the oracle of her
fireside. Nay, the Dominie himself did not disdain, now and
then, to step in, converse about the state of her mind, and take
a glass of her special good cherry brandy. Indeed, he never
failed to call on new year's day, and wish her a happy new
year; and the good dame, who was a little vain on some
points, always piqued herself on giving him as large a cake as
any one in town.
I have said that she had one son. He was the child of her
old age; but could hardly be called the comfort, for, of all
unlucky
urchins, Dolph Heyliger was the most mischievous. Not
that the whipster was really vicious, he was only full of fun and
frolic, and had that daring, gamesome spirit, which is extolled in
a rich man's child, but execrated in a poor man's. He was
continually
getting into scrapes; his mother was incessantly
harassed with complaints of some waggish pranks which he
had played off; bills were sent in for windows that he had
broken; in a word, he had not reached his fourteenth year
before
he was pronounced, by all the neighborhood, to be a
wicked dog, the wickedest dog in the street! Nay, one old
gentleman, in a claret-colored coat, with a thin red face, and
ferret eyes, went so far as to assure Dame Heyliger that her
son would, one day or other, come to the gallows.
Yet, notwithstanding all this, the poor soul loved her boy.
It seemed as though she loved him the better the worse he
behaved
,
and that he grew more in her favor, the more he grew
out of favor with the world. Mothers are foolish, fond-hearted
beings; there's no reasoning them out of their dotage; and,
indeed, this poor woman's child was all that was left to love
her in this world, so we must not think it hard that she turned
a deaf ear to her good friends, who sought to prove to her that
Dolph would come to a halter.
To do the varlet justice, too, he was strongly attached to his
parent. He would not willingly have given her pain on any
account, and when he had been doing wrong, it was but for
him to catch his poor mother's eye fixed wistfully and
sorrowfully
upon him, to fill his heart with bitterness and contrition.
But he was a heedless youngster, and could not, for the life of
him, resist any new temptation to fun and mischief. Though
quick at his learning, whenever he could be brought to apply
himself, he was always prone to be led away by idle company,
and would play truant to hunt after birds' nests, to rob orchards,
or to swim in the Hudson.
In this way he grew up a tall, lubberly boy, and his mother
began to be greatly perplexed what to do with him, or how to
put him in a way to do for himself; for he had acquired such
an unlucky reputation, that no one seemed willing to employ
him.
Many were the consultations that she held with Peter de
Groodt, the clerk and sexton, who was her prime counsellor.
Peter was as much perplexed as herself, for he had no great
opinion of the boy, and thought he would never come to good.
He at one time advised her to send him to seaa piece of
advice only given in the most desperate cases; but Dame
Heyliger would not listen to such an idea; she could not think
of letting Dolph go out of her sight. She was sitting one day
knitting by the fireside, in great perplexity, when the sexton
entered with an air of unusual vivacity and briskness. He had
just come from a funeral. It had been that of a boy of Dolph's
years, who had been apprentice to a famous German doctor,
and had died of a consumption. It is true, there had been a
whisper that the deceased had been brought to his end by being
made the subject of the doctor's experinents, on which he was
apt to try the effects of a new compound, or a quieting draught.
This, however, it is likely was a mere scandal; at any rate,
Peter de Groodt did not think it worth mentioning, though,
4*
had we time to philosophize, it would be a curious matter for
speculation, why a doctor's family is apt to be so lean and
cadaverous, and a butcher's so jolly and rubicund.
Peter de Groodt, as I said before, entered the house of
Dame Heyliger with unusual alacrity. A bright idea had
popped into his head at the funeral, over which he had
chuckled as he shovelled the earth into the grave of the
doctor's disciple. It had occurred to him, that, as the situation
of the deceased was vacant at the doctor's, it would be the very
place for Dolph. The boy had parts, and could pound a
pestle, and run an errand with any boy in the town, and what
more was wanted in a student?
The suggestion of the sage Peter was a vision of glory to the
mother. She had already seen Dolph, in her mind's eye, with
a cane at his nose, a knocker at his door, and an M.D. at the
end of his nameone of the established dignitaries of the town.
The matter once undertaken, was soon effected: the sexton
had some influence with the doctor, they having had much
dealing together in the way of their separate professions; and
the very next morning he called and conducted the urchin, clad
in his Sunday clothes, to undergo the inspection of Dr. Karl
Lodovick Knipperhausen.
They found the doctor seated in an elbow-chair, in one
corner of his study, or laboratory, with a large volume, in
German print, before him. He was a short fat man, with a
dark square face, rendered more dark by a black velvet cap.
He had a little knobbed nose, not unlike the ace of spades, with
a pair of spectacles gleaming on each side of his dusky
countenance, like a couple of bow-windows.
Dolph felt struck with awe on entering into the presence
of this learned man; and gazed about him with boyish wonder
at the furniture of this chamber of knowledge, which appeared
to him almost as the den of a magician. In the centre stood a
claw-footed table, with pestle and mortar, phials and gallipots,
and a pair of small burnished scales. At one end was a heavy
clothes-press, turned into a receptacle for drugs and
compounds
;
against which hung the doctor's hat and cloak, and
gold-headed cane, and on the top grinned a human skull.
Along the mantel-piece were glass vessels, in which were
snakes and lizards, and a human ftus preserved in spirits. A
closet, the doors of which were taken off, contained three
whole shelves of books, and some too of mighty folio
dimensions
;
a collection, the like of which Dolph had never before
beheld. As, however, the library did not take up the whole of
the closet, the doctor's thrifty housekeeper had occupied the
rest with pots of pickles and preserves; and had hung about the
room, among awful implements of the healing art, strings of
red pepper and corpulent cucumbers, carefully preserved for
seed.
Peter de Groodt and his proteg were received with great
gravity and stateliness by the doctor, who was a very wise,
dignified little man, and never smiled. He surveyed Dolph
from head to foot, above, and under, and through his spectacles,
and the poor lad's heart quailed as these great glasses glared
on him like two full moons. The doctor heard all that Peter
de Groodt had to say in favor of the youthful candidate; and
then wetting his thumb with the end of his tongue, he began
deliberately to turn over page after page of the great black
volume before him. At length, after many hums and haws,
and strokings of the chin, and all that hesitation and
deliberation
with which a wise man proceeds to do what he intended
to do from the very first, the doctor agreed to take the lad as a
disciple; to give him bed, board, and clothing, and to instruct
him in the healing art; in return for which he was to have his
services until his twenty-first year.
Behold, then, our hero, all at once transformed from an
unlucky
urchin, running wild about the streets, to a student of
medicine, diligently pounding a pestle, under the auspices of the
learned Doctor Karl Lodovick Knipperhausen. It was a
happy transition for his fond old mother. She was delighted
with the idea of her boy's being brought up worthy of his
ancestors; and anticipated the day when he would be able to
hold up his head with the lawyer, that lived in the large house
opposite; or, peradventure, with the Dominie himself.
Doctor Knipperhausen was a native of the Palatinate in
Germany
;
whence, in company with many of his countrymen, he
had taken refuge in England, on account of religious
persecution
.
He was one of nearly three thousand Palatines, who
came over from England in 1710, under the protection of
Governor Hunter. Where the doctor had studied, how he had
acquired his medical knowledge, and where he had received
his diploma, it is hard at present to say, for nobody knew at
the time; yet it is certain that his profound skill and abstruse
knowledge were the talk and wonder of the common people,
far and near.
His practice was totally different from that of any other
physician; consisting in mysterious compounds, known only to
himself, in the preparing and administering of which, it was
said, he always consulted the stars. So high an opinion was
entertained of his skill, particularly by the German and Dutch
inhabitants, that they always resorted to him in desperate
cases. He was one of those infallible doctors, that are always
effecting sudden and surprising cures, when the patient has
been given up by all the regular physicians; unless, as is
shrewdly observed, the case has been left too long before it was
put into their hands. The doctor's library was the talk and
marvel of the neighborhood, I might almost say of the entire
burgh. The good people looked with reverence at a man who
had read three whole shelves full of books, and some of them
too as large as a family Bible. There were many disputes
among the members of the little Lutheran Church, as to which
was the wisest man, the doctor or the Dominie. Some of his
admirers even went so far as to say, that he knew more than
the governor himselfin a word, it was thought that there was
no end to his knowledge!
No sooner was Dolph received into the doctor's family, than
he was put in possession of the lodging of his predecessor. It
was a garret-room of a steep-roofed Dutch house, where the
rain pattered on the shingles, and the lightning gleamed, and
the wind piped through the crannies in stormy weather; and
where whole troops of hungry rats, like Don Cossacks, galloped
about, in defiance of traps and ratsbane.
He was soon up to his ears in medical studies, being
employed
,
morning, noon, and night, in rolling pills, filtering
tinctures, or pounding the pestle and mortar in one corner of
the laboratory; while the doctor would take his seat in
another corner, when he had nothing else to do, or expected
visitors, and arrayed in his morning-gown and velvet cap,
would pore over the contents of some folio volume. It is true,
that the regular thumping of Dolph's pestle, or, perhaps, the
drowsy buzzing of the summer flies, would now and then lull
the little man into a slumber; but then his spectacles were
always wide awake, and studiously regarding the book.
There was another personage in the house, however, to
whom Dolph was obliged to pay allegiance. Though a
bachelor, and a man of such great dignity and importance, the
doctor was, like many other wise men, subject to petticoat
government. He was completely under the sway of his
housekeeper; a spare, busy, fretting housewife, in a little,
round, quilted German cap, with a huge bunch of keys
jingling at the girdle of an exceedingly long waist. Frau Ils
(or Frow Ilsy as it was pronounced) had accompanied him in
his various migrations from Germany to England, and from
England to the province; managing his establishment and
himself too: ruling him, it is true, with a gentle hand, but
carrying a high hand with all the world besides. How she
had acquired such ascendency I do not pretend to say.
People, it is true, did talkbut have not people been prone
to talk ever since the world began? Who can tell how
women generally contrive to get the upper hand? A husband,
it is true, may now and then be master in his own house;
but who ever knew a bachelor that was not managed by his
housekeeper?
Indeed, Frau Ilsy's power was not confined to the doctor's
household. She was one of those prying gossips who know
every one's business better than they do themselves; and
whose all-seeing eyes, and all-telling tongues, are terrors
throughout a neighborhood.
Nothing of any moment transpired in the world of scandal
of this little burgh, but it was known to Frau Ilsy. She had
her crew of cronies, that were perpetually hurrying to her
little parlor with some precious bit of news; nay, she would
sometimes discuss a whole volume of secret history, as she
held the street door ajar, and gossiped with one of these
garrulous
cronies in the very teeth of a December blast.
Between the doctor and the housekeeper it may easily be
supposed that Dolph had a busy life of it. As Frau Ilsy kept
the keys, and literally ruled the roast, it was starvation to
offend her, though he found the study of her temper more
perplexing even than that of medicine. When not busy in the
laboratory, she kept him running hither and thither on her
errands; and on Sundays he was obliged to accompany her
to and from church, and carry her Bible. Many a time has
the poor varlet stood shivering and blowing his fingers, or
holding his frost-bitten nose, in the church-yard, while Ilsy
and her cronies were huddled together, wagging their heads,
and tearing some unlucky character to pieces.
With all his advantages, however, Dolph made very slow
progress in his art. This was no fault of the doctor's,
certainly
,
for he took unwearied pains with the lad, keeping him
close to the pestle and mortar, or on the trot about town with
phials and pill-boxes; and if he ever flagged in his industry,
which he was rather apt to do, the doctor would fly into a
passion, and ask him if he ever expected to learn his profession,
unless he applied himself closer to the study. The fact is, he
still retained the fondness for sport and mischief that had
marked his childhood; the habit, indeed, had strengthened
with his years, and gained force from being thwarted and
constrained
.
He daily grew more and more untractable, and lost
favor in the eyes both of the doctor and the housekeeper.
In the meantime the doctor went on, waxing wealthy and
renowned. He was famous for his skill in managing cases
not laid down in the books. He had cured several old
women and young girls of witchcraft; a terrible complaint,
and nearly as prevalent in the province in those days as
hydrophobia
is at present. He had even restored one strapping
country girl to perfect health, who had gone so far as to vomit
crooked pins and needles; which is considered a desperate
stage of the malady. It was whispered, also, that he was
possessed
of the art of preparing love-powders; and many
applications
had he in consequence from love-sick patients of both
sexes. But all these cases formed the mysterious part of his
practice, in which, according to the cant phrase, secresy and
honor might be depended on. Dolph, therefore, was obliged
to turn out of the study whenever such consultations occurred,
though it is said he learnt more of the secrets of the art at the
key-hole, than by all the rest of his studies put together.
As the doctor increased in wealth, he began to extend his
possessions, and to look forward, like other great men, to the
time when he should retire to the repose of a country seat.
For this purpose he had purchased a farm, or, as the Dutch
settlers called it, a
bowerie
, a few miles from town. It had
been the residence of a wealthy family, that had returned some
time since to Holland. A large mansion-house stood in the
centre of it, very much out of repair, and which, in
consequence
of certain reports, had received the appellation of the
Haunted House. Either from these reports, or from its actual
dreariness, the doctor found it impossible to get a tenant; and,
that the place might not fall to ruin before he could reside in
it himself, he placed a country boor, with his family, in one
wing, with the privilege of cultivating the farm on shares.
The doctor now felt all the dignity of a landholder rising
within him. He had a little of the German pride of territory
in his composition, and almost looked upon himself as owner
of a principality. He began to complain of the fatigue of
business; and was fond of riding out to look at his estate.
His little expeditions to his lands were attended with a bustle
and parade that created a sensation throughout the
neighborhood
.
His wall-eyed horse stood, stamping and whisking off
the flies, for a full hour before the house. Then the doctor's
saddle-bags would be brought out and adjusted; then, after a
little while, his cloak would be rolled up and strapped to the
saddle; then his umbrella would be buckled to the cloak;
while, in the meantime, a group of ragged boys, that observant
class of beings, would gather before the door. At length the
doctor would issue forth, in a pair of jack-boots that reached
above his knees, and a cocked-hat flapped down in front. As
he was a short, fat man, he took some time to mount into the
saddle; and when there, he took some time to have the saddle
and stirrups properly adjusted, enjoying the wonder and
admiration
of the urchin crowd. Even after he had set off, he
would pause in the middle of the street, or trot back two or
three times to give some parting orders; which were answered
by the housekeeper from the door, or Dolph from the study, or
the black cook from the cellar, or the chambermaid from the
garret window; and there were generally some last words
bawled after him, just as he was turning the corner.
The whole neighborhood would be aroused by this pomp
and circumstance. The cobbler would leave his last; the
barber would thrust out his frizzed head, with a comb sticking
in it; a knot would collect at the grocer's door, and the word
would be buzzed from one end of the street to the other, The
doctor's riding out to his country seat.
These were golden moments for Dolph. No sooner was the
doctor out of sight, than pestle and mortar were abandoned;
the laboratory was left to take care of itself, and the student
was off on some mad-cap frolie.
Indeed, it must be confessed, the youngster, as he grew up,
seemed in a fair way to fulfil the prediction of the old
claret-colored
gentleman. He was the ringleader of all holiday
sports and midnight gambols; ready for all kinds of
mischievous
pranks and harebrained adventures.
There is nothing so troublesome as a hero on a small scale,
or, rather, a hero in a small town. Dolph soon became the
abhorrence of all drowsy, housekeeping old citizens, who
hated noise, and had no relish for waggery. The good dames,
too, considered him as little better than a reprobate, gathered their
daughters under their wings whenever he approached, and
pointed him out as a warning to their sons. No one seemed
to hold him in much regard, excepting the wild striplings of
the place, who were captivated by his open-hearted, daring
manners, and the negroes, who always look upon every idle,
do-nothing
youngster as a kind of gentleman. Even the good
Peter de Groodt, who had considered himself a kind of patron
of the lad, began to despair of him,
and would shake his head
dubiously, as he listened to a long complaint from the
housekeeper
,
and sipped a glass of her raspberry brandy.
Still his mother was not to be wearied out of her affection
by all the waywardness of her boy, nor disheartened by the
stories of his misdeeds, with which her good friends were
continually
regaling her. She had, it is true, very little of the
pleasure which rich people enjoy, in always hearing their
children
praised; but she considered all this ill-will as a kind of
persecution which he suffered, and she liked him better on that
account. She saw him growing up a fine, tall, good looking
youngster, and she looked at him with the secret pride of a
mother's heart. It was her great desire that Dolph should
appear
like a gentleman, and all the money she could save went
towards helping out his pocket and his wardrobe. She would
look out of the window after him, as he sallied forth in his
best array, and her heart would yearn with delight, and once,
when Peter de Groodt, struck with the youngster's gallant
appearance
on a bright Sunday morning, observed, Well, after
all, Dolph does grow a comely fellow! the tear of pride
started
into the mother's eye; Ah, neighbor, neighbor!
exclaimed
she, they may say what they please, poor Dolph will yet
hold up his head with the best of them.
Dolph Heyliger had now nearly attained his one-and-twentieth
year, and the term of his medical studies was just expiring;
yet it must be confessed that he knew little more of the
profession
than when he first entered the doctor's door. This,
however, could not be from any want of quickness of parts,
for he showed amazing aptness in mastering other branches of
knowledge, which he could only have studied at intervals. He
was, for instance, a sure marksman, and won all the geese and
turkeys at Christmas holidays. He was a bold rider; he was
famous for leaping and wrestling; he played tolerably on the
fiddle; could swim like a fish, and was the best hand in the
whole place at fives or ninepins.
All these accomplishments, however, procured him no favor
in the eyes of the doctor, who grew more and more crabbed
and intolerant the nearer the term of apprenticeship
approached
.
Fran Ilsy, too, was for ever finding some occasion to
raise a windy tempest about his ears; and seldom encountered
him about the house, without a clatter of the tongue; so that
at length the jingling of her keys, as she approached, was to
Dolph like the ringing of the prompter's bell, that gives notice
of a theatrical thunder-storm. Nothing but the infinite good
humor of the heedless youngster enabled him to bear all this
domestic tyranny without open rebellion. It was evident that
the doctor and his housekeeper were preparing to beat the poor
youth out of the nest, the moment his term should have
expired
,
a short-hand mode which the doctor had of providing
for useless disciples.
Indeed the little man had been rendered more than usually
irritable lately, in consequence of various cares and vexations
which his country estate had brought upon him. The doctor
had been repeatedly annoyed by the rumors and tales which
prevailed concerning the old mansion, and found it difficult to
prevail even upon the countryman and his family to remain
there rent-free. Every time he rode out to the farm he was
teased by some fresh complaint of strange noises and fearful
sights, with which the tenants were disturbed at night; and the
doctor would come home fretting and fuming, and vent his
spleen upon the whole household. It was indeed a sore
grievance, that affected him both in pride and purse. He was
threatened with an absolute loss of the profits of his property,
and then, what a blow to his territorial consequence, to be the
landlord of a haunted house.
It was observed, however, that with all his vexation, the
doctor never proposed to sleep in the house himself; nay, he
could never be prevailed upon to remain on the premises after
dark, but made the best of his way for town as soon as the bats
began to flit about in the twilight. The fact was, the doctor
had a secret belief in ghosts, having passed the early part of
his life in a country where they particularly abound; and,
indeed
,
the story went that, when a boy, he had once seen the
devil upon the Hartz mountains in Germany.
At length the doctor's vexations on this head were brought
to a crisis. One morning, as he sat dozing over a volume in
his study, he was suddenly startled from his slumbers by the
bustling in of the housekeeper.
Here's a fine to-do! cried she, as she entered the room.
Here's Claus Hopper come in, bag and baggage, from the
farm, and swears he'll have nothing more to do with it. The
whole family have been frightened out of their wits, for there's
such racketing and rummaging about the old house, that they
can't sleep quiet in their beds!
Donner und blitzen! cried the doctor, impatiently. Will
they never have done chattering about that house? What a
pack of fools, to let a few rats and mice frighten them out of
good quarters.
Nay, nay, said the housekeeper, wagging her head
knowingly
,
and piqued at having a good ghost-story doubted,
there's more in it than rats and mice. All the neighborhood
talks about the house; and then such sights as have been seen
in it. Peter de Groodt tells me that the family that sold you
the house, and went to Holland, dropped several strange hints
about it, and said, `they wished you joy of your bargain;' and
you know yourself there's no getting any family to live in it.
Peter De Groodt's a ninnyan old woman, said the
doctor, peevishly; I'll warrant he's been filling these people's
heads full of stories. It's just like his nonsense about the ghost
that haunted the church belfry, as an excuse for not ringing the
bell that cold night when Harmanus Brinkerhoff's house was
on fire. Send Claus to me.
Claus Hopper now made his appearance: a simple country
lout, full of awe at finding himself in the very study of Dr.
Knipperhausen, and too much embarrassed to enter in much
detail of the matters that had caused his alarm. He stood
twirling his hat in one hand, resting sometimes on one leg,
sometimes on the other, looking occasionally at the doctor,
and now and then stealing a fearful glance at the death's head
that seemed ogling him from the top of the clothes-press.
The doctor tried every means to persuade him to return to
the farm, but all in vain; he maintained a dogged determination
on the subject; and at the close of every argument or
solicitation
would make the same brief, inflexible reply, Ich kan
nicht, mynheer. The doctor was a little pot, and soon
hot; his patience was exhausted by these continual vexations
about his estate. The stubborn refusal of Claus Hopper
seemed to him like flat rebellion; his temper suddenly boiled
over, and Claus was glad to make a rapid retreat to escape
scalding.
When the bumpkin got to the housekeeper's room, he found
Peter de Groodt, and several other true believers, ready to
receive
him. Here he indemnified himself for the restraint he had
suffered in the study, and opened a budget of stories about the
haunted house that astonished all his hearers. The
housekeeper
believed them all, if it was only to spite the doctor for
having received her intelligence so uncourteously. Peter de
Groodt matched them with many a wonderful legend of the
times of the Dutch dynasty, and of the Devil's Stepping-stones;
and of the pirate hanged at Gibbet Island, that continued to
swing there at night long after the gallows was taken down;
and of the ghost of the unfortunate Governor Leisler, hanged
for treason, which haunted the old fort and the
governmenthouse
.
The gossiping knot dispersed, each charged with
direful intelligence. The sexton disburdened himself at a
vestry meeting that was held that very day, and the black cook
forsook her kitchen, and spent half the day at the street pump,
that gossiping-place of servants, dealing forth the news to all
that came for water. In a little time the whole town was in a
buzz with tales about the haunted house. Some said that
Claus Hopper had seen the devil, while others hinted that the
house was haunted by the ghosts of some of the patients whom
the doctor had physicked out of the world, and that was the
reason why he did not venture to live in it himself.
All this put the little doctor in a terrible fume. He
threatened
vengeance on any one who should affect the value of his
property by exciting popular prejudices. He complained
loudly of thus being in a manner dispossessed of his territories
by mere bugbears; but he secretly determined to have the house
exorcised by the Dominie. Great was his relief, therefore,
when, in the midst of his perplexities, Dolph stepped forward
and undertook to garrison the haunted house. The youngster
had been listening to all the stories of Claus Hopper and Peter
de Groodt: he was fond of adventure, he loved the marvellous,
and his imagination had become quite excited by these tales of
wonder. Besides, he had led such an uncomfortable life at the
doctor's, being subjected to the intolerable thraldom of early
hours, that he was delighted at the prospect of having a house
to himself, even though it should be a haunted one. His offer
was eagerly accepted, and it was determined he should mount
guard that very night. His only stipulation was, that the
enterprise should be kept secret from his mother; for he knew
the poor soul would not sleep a wink if she knew her son was
waging war with the powers of darkness.
When night came on he set out on this perilous expedition.
The old black cook, his only friend in the household, had
provided him with a little mess for supper, and a rushlight;
and she tied round his neck an amulet, given her by an African
conjurer, as a charm against evil spirits. Dolph was escorted
on his way by the doctor and Peter de Groodt, who had agreed
to accompany him to the house, and see him safe lodged. The
night was overcast, and it was very dark when they arrived at
the grounds which surrounded the mansion. The sexton led
the way with a lantern. As they walked along the avenue of
acacias, the fitful light, catching from bush to bush, and tree to
tree, often startled the doughty Peter, and made him fall back
upon his followers; and the doctor grappled still closer hold of
Dolph's arm, observing that the ground was very slippery and
uneven. At one time they were nearly put to total rout by a
bat, which came flitting about the lantern; and the notes of the
insects from the trees, and the frogs from a neighboring pond,
formed a most drowsy and doleful concert.
The front door of the mansion opened with a grating sound,
that made the doctor turn pale. They entered a tolerably
large hall, such as is common in American country-houses, and
which serves for a sitting-room in warm weather. From this
they went up a wide staircase, that groaned and creaked as
they trod, every step making its particular note, like the key of
a harpsichord. This led to another hall on the second story,
whence they entered the room where Dolph was to sleep. It
was large, and scantily furnished; the shutters were closed;
but as they were much broken, there was no want of a
circulation
of air. It appeared to have been that sacred chamber,
known among Dutch housewives by the name of the best
bedroom
;
which is the best furnished room in the house, but in
which scarce anybody is ever permitted to sleep. Its splendor,
however, was all at an end. There were a few broken
articles of furniture about the room, and in the centre stood a
heavy deal-table and a large arm-chair, both of which had the
look of being coeval with the mansion. The fireplace was
wide, and had been faced with Dutch tiles, representing
Scripture
stories; but some of them had fallen out of their places,
and lay shattered about the hearth. The sexton lit the
rushlight
;
and the doctor, looking fearfully about the room, was
just exhorting Dolph to be of good cheer, and to pluck up a
stout heart, when a noise in the chimney, like voices and
struggling
,
struck a sudden panic into the sexton. He took to his
heels with the lantern; the doctor followed hard after him; the
stairs groaned and creaked as they hurried down, increasing
their agitation and speed by its noises. The front door
slammed
after them; and Dolph heard them scrabbling down the
avenue, till the sound of their feet was lost in the distance.
That he did not join in this precipitate retreat might have been
owing to his possessing a little more courage than his
companions
,
or perhaps that he had caught a glimpse of the cause
of their dismay, in a nest of chimney swallows, that came
tumbling down into the fireplace.
Being now left to himself, he secured the front door by a
strong bolt and bar; and having seen that the other entrances
were fastened, returned to his desolate chamber. Having
made his supper from the basket which the good old cook had
provided, he locked the chamber door, and retired to rest on a
mattress in one corner. The night was calm and still; and
nothing broke upon the profound quiet, but the lonely chirping
of a cricket from the chimney of a distant chamber. The
rushlight, which stood in the centre of the deal table, shed
a feeble yellow ray, dimly illuminating the chamber, and
making uncouth shapes and shadows on the walls, from the
clothes which Dolph had thrown over a chair.
With all his boldness of heart, there was something subduing
in this desolate scene; and he felt his spirits flag within him,
as he lay on his hard bed and gazed about the room. He was
turning over in his mind his idle habits, his doubtful prospects,
and now and then heaving a heavy sigh, as he thought on his
poor old mother; for there is nothing like the silence and
loneliness of night to bring dark shadows over the brightest
mind. By-and-by he thought he heard a sound as of some one
walking below stairs. He listened, and distinctly heard a step
on the great staircase. It approached solemnly and slowly,
tramptramptramp! It was evidently the tread of some
heavy personage; and yet how could he have got into the
house without making a noise? He had examined all the
fastenings, and was certain that every entrance was secure.
Still the steps advanced, tramptramptramp! It was
evident that the person approaching could not be a robber, the
step was too loud and deliberate; a robber would either be
stealthy or precipitate. And now the footsteps had ascended
the staircase; they were slowly advancing along the passage,
resounding through the silent and empty apartments. The
very cricket had ceased its melancholy note, and nothing
interrupted
their awful distinctness. The door, which had been
locked on the inside, slowly sprang open, as if self-moved.
The footsteps entered the room; but no one was to be seen.
They passed slowly and audibly across it, tramptramp
tramp! but whatever made the sound was invisible. Dolph
rubbed his eyes, and stared about him; he could see to every
part of the dimly-lighted chamber; all was vacant; yet still
he heard those mysterious footsteps, solemnly walking about
the chamber. They ceased, and all was dead silence. There
was something more appalling in this invisible visitation, than
there would have been in anything that addressed itself to the
eyesight. It was awfully vague and indefinite. He felt his
heart beat against his ribs; a cold sweat broke out upon his
forehead; he lay for some time in a state of violent agitation;
nothing, however, occurred to increase his alarm. His light
gradually burnt down into the socket, and he fell asleep.
When he awoke it was broad daylight; the sun was peering
through the cracks of the window-shutters, and the birds were
merrily singing about the house. The bright cheery day soon
put to flight all the terrors of the preceding night. Dolph
laughed, or rather tried to laugh, at all that had passed, and
endeavored to persuade himself that it was a mere freak of the
imagination, conjured up by the stories he had heard; but he
was a little puzzled to find the door of his room locked on the
inside, notwithstanding that he had positively seen it swing
open as the footsteps had entered. He returned to town in a
state of considerable perplexity; but he determined to say
nothing on the subject, until his doubts were either confirmed
or removed by another night's watching. His silence was a
grievous disappointment to the gossips who had gathered at the
doctor's mansion. They had prepared their minds to hear
direful tales, and were almost in a rage at being assured he had
nothing to relate.
The next night, then, Dolph repeated his vigil. He now
entered the house with some trepidation. He was particular
in examining the fastenings of all the doors, and securing them
well. He locked the door of his chamber, and placed a chair
against it; then having dispatched his supper, he threw
himself
on his mattress and endeavored to sleep. It was all in
vain; a thousand crowding fancies kept him waking. The time
slowly dragged on, as if minutes were spinning themselves out
into hours. As the night advanced, he grew more and more
nervous; and he almost started from his couch when he heard
the mysterious footstep again on the staircase. Up it came, as
before, solemnly and slowly, tramptramptramp! It
approached
along the passage; the door again swung open, as if
there had been neither lock nor impediment, and a strange
looking figure stalked into the room. It was an elderly man,
large and robust, clothed in the old Flemish fashion. He
had on a kind of short cloak, with a garment under it, belted
round the waist; trunk hose, with great bunches or bows at
the knees; and a pair of russet boots, very large at top, and
standing widely from his legs. His hat was broad and slouched,
with a feather trailing over one side. His iron-grey hair hung
in thick masses on his neck; and he had a short grizzled
beard. He walked slowly round the room, as if examining
that all was safe: then, hanging his hat on a peg beside the
door, he sat down in the elbow-chair, and, leaning his elbow
on the table, fixed his eyes on Dolph with an unmoving and
deadened stare.
Dolph was not naturally a coward; but he had been
brought up in an implicit belief in ghosts and goblins. A
5
thousand stories came swarming to his mind that he had
heard about this building; and as he looked at this strange
personage, with his uncouth garb, his pale visage, his grizzly
beard, and his fixed, staring, fish-like eye, his teeth began to
chatter, his hair to rise on his head, and a cold sweat to break
out all over his body. How long he remained in this situation
he could not tell, for he was like one fascinated. He could
not take his gaze off from the spectre; but lay staring at him,
with his whole intellect absorbed in the contemplation. The
old man remained seated behind the table, without stirring, or
turning an eye, always keeping a dead, steady glare upon
Dolph. At length the household cock, from a neighboring
farm, clapped his wings, and gave a loud cheerful crow that
rang over the fields. At the sound the old man slowly rose,
and took down his hat from the peg; the door opened, and
closed after him; he was heard to go slowly down the
staircase
,
tramptramptramp!and when he had got to the
bottom, all was again silent. Dolph lay and listened earnestly;
counted every footfall; listened, and listened, if the steps
should return, until, exhausted by watching and agitation, he
fell into a troubled sleep.
Daylight again brought fresh courage and assurance. He
would fain have considered all that had passed as a mere
dream; yet there stood the chair in which the unknown had
seated himself; there was the table on which he had leaned;
there was the peg on which he had hung his hat; and there
was the door, locked precisely as he himself had locked it,
with the chair placed against it. He hastened down stairs, and
examined the doors and windows; all were exactly in the
same state in which he had left them, and there was no
apparent
way by which any being could have entered and left the
house, without leaving some trace behind. Pooh! said
Dolph to himself, it was all a dream:but it would not
do; the more he endeavored to shake the scene off from his
mind, the more it haunted him.
Though he persisted in a strict silence as to all that he had
seen or heard, yet his looks betrayed the uncomfortable night
that he had passed. It was evident that there was something
wonderful hidden under this mysterious reserve. The doctor
took him into the study, locked the door, and sought to have
a full and confidential communication; but he could get
nothing
out of him. Frau Ilsy took him aside into the pantry, but
to as little purpose; and Peter de Groodt held him by the
button
for a full hour, in the church-yard, the very place to get at
the bottom of a ghost story, but came off not a whit wiser
than the rest. It is always the case, however, that one truth
concealed makes a dozen current lies. It is like a guinea
locked up in a bank, that has a dozen paper representatives.
Before the day was over, the neighborhood was full of reports.
Some said that Dolph Heyliger watched in the haunted house,
with pistols loaded with silver bullets; others, that he had a
long talk with a spectre without a head; others that Doctor
Knipperhausen and the sexton had been hunted down the
Bowery lane, and quite into town by a legion of the ghosts of
their customers. Some shook their heads, and thought it a
shame the doctor should put Dolph to pass the night alone in
that dismal house, where he might be spirited away, no one
knew whither, while others observed, with a shrug, that if the
devil did carry off the youngster, it would be but taking his own.
These rumors at length reached the ears of the good Dame
Heyliger, and, as may be supposed, threw her into a terrible
alarm. For her son to have opposed himself to danger from
living foes, would have been nothing so dreadful in her eyes, as
to dare alone the terrors of the haunted house. She hastened
to the doctor's, and passed a great part of the day in
attempting
to dissuade Dolph from repeating his vigil; she told him
a score of tales, which her gossiping friends had just related to
her, of persons who had been carried off, when watching alone
in old ruinous houses. It was all to no effect. Dolph's pride, as
well as curiosity, was piqued. He endeavored to calm the
apprehensions
of his mother, and to assure her that there was no
truth in all the rumors she had heard; she looked at him
dubiously, and shook her head; but finding his determination
was not to be shaken, she brought him a little thick Dutch
Bible, with brass clasps, to take with him as a sword
where-with
to fight the powers of darkness; and, lest that might not
be sufficient, the housekeeper gave him the Heidelberg catechism
by way of dagger.
The next night, therefore, Dolph took up his quarters for the
third time in the old mansion. Whether dream or not, the
same thing was repeated. Towards midnight, when
everything
was still, the same sound echoed through the empty
hallstramptramptramp! The stairs were again ascended
the door again swung openthe old man entered, walked
round the room, hung up his hat, and seated himself by the
table. The same fear and trembling came over poor Dolph,
though not in so violent a degree. He lay in the same way,
motionless and fascinated, staring at the figure, which regarded
him as before, with a dead, fixed, chilling gaze. In this way
they remained for a long time, till, by degrees, Dolph's courage
began gradually to revive. Whether alive or dead, this being
had certainly some object in his visitation, and he recollected
to have heard it said, spirits have no power to speak until
spoken to. Summoning up resolution, therefore, and making
two or three attempts, before he could get his parched tongue
in motion, he addressed the unknown in the most solemn form
of adjuration, and demanded to know what was the motive of
his visit.
No sooner had he finished, than the old man rose, took
down his hat, the door opened, and he went out, looking back
upon Dolph just as he crossed the threshold, as if expecting
him to follow. The youngster did not hesitate an instant.
He took the candle in his hand, and the Bible under his arm,
and obeyed the tacit invitation. The candle emitted a feeble,
uncertain ray, but still he could see the figure before him,
slowly descend the stairs. He followed, trembling. When it
had reached the bottom of the stairs, it turned through the
hall towards the back door of the mansion. Dolph held the
light over the balustrades, but, in his eagerness to catch a sight
of the unknown, he flared his feeble taper so suddenly, that it
went out. Still there was sufficient light from the pale
moonbeams
,
that fell through a narrow window, to give him an
indistinct
view of the figure, near the door. He followed,
therefore
,
down stairs, and turned towards the place; but when he
arrived there, the unknown had disappeared. The door
remained
fast barred and bolted; there was no other mode of
exit, yet the being, whatever he might be, was gone. He
unfastened
the door, and looked out into the fields. It was a
hazy, moonlight night, so that the eye could distinguish objects
at some distance. He thought he saw the unknown in a
footpath
which led from the door. He was not mistaken; but
how had he got out of the house? He did not pause to think,
but followed on. The old man proceeded at a measured pace,
without looking about him, his footsteps sounding on the hard
ground. He passed through the orchard of apple-trees, always
keeping the footpath. It led to a well, situated in a little
hollow
,
which had supplied the farm with water. Just at this well
Dolph lost sight of him. He rubbed his eyes and looked
again, but nothing was to be seen of the unknown. He
reached the well, but nobody was there. All the surrounding
ground was open and clear; there was no bush or
hiding-place
.
He looked down the well, and saw, at a great depth,
the reflection of the sky in the still water. After remaining
here for some time, without seeing or hearing anything more
of his mysterious conductor, he returned to the house, full of
awe and wonder. He bolted the door, groped his way back to
bed, and it was long before he could compose himself to
sleep.
His dreams were strange and troubled. He thought he was
following the old man along the side of a great river, until
they came to a vessel on the point of sailing, and that his
conductor
led him on board and vanished. He remembered the
commander of the vessel, a short swarthy man, with crisped
black hair, blind of one eye, and lame of one leg; but the
rest of his dream was very confused. Sometimes he was
sailing, sometimes on shore; now amidst storms and tempests,
and now wandering quietly in unknown streets. The figure
of the old man was strangely mingled up with the incidents of
the dream; and the whole distinctly wound up by his finding
himself on board of the vessel again, returning home, with a
great bag of money.
When he awoke, the grey, cool light of dawn was streaking
the horizon, and the cocks passing the reveille from farm to
farm, throughout the country. He rose more harassed and
perplexed than ever. He was singularly confounded by all
that he had seen and dreamt, and began to doubt whether his
mind was not affected, and whether all that was passing in his
thoughts might not be mere feverish fantasy. In his present
state of mind, he did not feel disposed to return immediately to
the doctor's, and undergo the cross-questioning of the
household
.
He made a scanty breakfast, therefore, on the remains
of the last night's provisions, and then wandered out into the
fields to meditate on all that had befallen him. Lost in
thought, he rambled about, gradually approaching the town,
until the morning was far advanced, when he was roused by a
hurry and bustle around him. He found himself near the
water's edge, in a throng of people, hurrying to a pier, where
was a vessel ready to make sail. He was unconsciously
carried
along by the impulse of the crowd, and found that it was
a sloop, on the point of sailing up the Hudson to Albany.
There was much leave-taking and kissing of old women and
children, and great activity in carrying on board baskets of bread
and cakes, and provisions of all kinds, notwithstanding the
mighty joints of meat that dangled over the stern; for a
voyage to Albany was an expedition of great moment in those
days. The commander of the sloop was hurrying about, and
giving a world of orders, which were not very strictly attended
to, one man being busy in lighting his pipe, and another in
sharpening his snicker-snee.
The appearance of the commander suddenly caught Dolph's
attention. He was short and swarthy, with crisped black
hair; blind of one eye and lame of one legthe very
commander
that he had seen in his dream! Surprised and aroused,
he considered the scene more attentively, and recalled still
further traces of his dream: the appearance of the vessel, of the
river, and of a variety of other objects, accorded with the
imperfect
images vaguely rising to recollection.
As he stood musing on these circumstances, the captain
suddenly called out to him in Dutch, Step on board, young
man, or you'll be left behind! He was startled by the
summons
;
he saw that the sloop was cast loose, and was actually
moving from the pier; it seemed as if he was actuated by some
irresistible impulse; he sprang upon the deck, and the next
moment the sloop was hurried off by the wind and tide.
Dolph's thoughts and feelings were all in tumult and confusion.
He had been strongly worked upon by the events which had
recently befallen him, and could not but think there was some
connexion between his present situation and his last night's
dream. He felt as if under supernatural influence; and tried to
assure himself with an old and favorite maxim of his, that
one way or the other, all would turn out for the best. For
a moment, the indignation of the doctor at his departure,
without
leave, passed across his mind, but that was matter of little
moment; then he thought of the distress of his mother at his
strange disappearance, and the idea gave him a sudden pang;
he would have entreated to be put on shore; but he knew
with such wind and tide the entreaty would have been in vain.
Then the inspiring love of novelty and adventure came rushing
in full tide through his bosom; he felt himself launched
strangely and suddenly on the world, and under full way to
explore
the regions of wonder that lay up this mighty river, and
beyond those blue mountains which had bounded his horizon
since childhood. While he was lost in this whirl of thought,
the sails strained to the breeze; the shores seemed to hurry
away behind him; and, before he perfectly recovered his
self-possession
,
the sloop was ploughing her way past Spiking-devil
and Yonkers, and the tallest chimney of the Manhattoes had
faded from his sight.
I have said that a voyage up the Hudson in those days was
an undertaking of some moment; indeed, it was as much
thought of as a voyage to Europe is at present. The sloops
were often many days on the way; the cautious navigators
taking in sail when it blew fresh, and coming to anchor at
night; and stopping to send the boat ashore for milk for tea;
without which it was impossible for the worthy old lady
passengers
to subsist. And there were the much-talked-of perils
of the Tappaan Zee, and the highlands. In short, a prudent
Dutch burgher would talk of such a voyage for months, and
even years, beforehand; and never undertook it without putting
his affairs in order, making his will, and having prayers said for
him in the Low Dutch Churches.
In the course of such a voyage, therefore, Dolph was
satisfied he would have time enough to reflect, and to make up
his mind as to what he should do when he arrived at Albany.
The captain, with his blind eye and lame leg, would, it is true,
bring his strange dream to mind, and perplex him sadly for a
few moments; but of late his life had been made up so much
of dreams and realities, his nights and days had been so jumbled
together, that he seemed to be moving continually in a
delusion
.
There is always, however, a kind of vagabond
consolation
in a man's having nothing in this world to lose; with this
Dolph comforted his heart, and determined to make the most
of the present enjoyment.
In the second day of the voyage they came to the highlands.
It was the latter part of a calm, sultry day, that they floated
gently with the tide between these stern mountains. There
was that perfect quiet which prevails over nature in the languor
of summer heat; the turning of a plank, or the accidental
falling of an oar on deck, was echoed from the mountain side,
and reverberated along the shores; and if by chance the captain
gave a shout of command, there were airy tongues which
mocked it from every cliff.
Dolph gazed about him in mute delight and wonder at these
scenes of nature's magnificence. To the left the Dunderberg
reared its woody precipices, height over height, forest over
forest, away into the deep summer sky. To the right strutted
forth the bold promontory of Anthony's Nose, with a solitary
eagle wheeling about it; while beyond, mountain succeeded to
mountain, until they seemed to lock their arms together, and
confine this mighty river in their embraces. There was a
feeling
of quiet luxury in gazing at the broad, green bosoms here
and there scooped out among the precipices; or at woodlands
high in air, nodding over the edge of some beetling bluff, and
their foliage all transparent in the yellow sunshine.
In the midst of his admiration, Dolph remarked a pile of
bright, snowy clouds peering above the western heights. It
was succeeded by another, and another, each seemingly
pushing
onwards its predecessor, and towering, with dazzling
brilliancy
,
in the deep blue atmosphere: and now muttering peals
of thunder were faintly heard rolling behind the mountains.
The river, hitherto still and glassy, reflecting pictures of the
sky and land, now showing a dark ripple at a distance, as the
breeze came creeping up it. The fish-hawks wheeled and
screamed, and sought their nests on the high dry trees; the
crows flew clamorously to the crevices of the rocks, and all
nature seemed conscious of the approaching thunder-gust.
The clouds now rolled in volumes over the mountain-tops;
their summits still bright and snowy, but the lower parts of an
inky blackness. The rain began to patter down in broad and
scattered drops; the wind freshened, and curled up the waves;
at length it seemed as if the bellying clouds were torn open by
the mountain-tops, and complete torrents of rain came rattling
down. The lightning leaped from cloud to cloud, and
streamed
quivering against the rocks, splitting and rending the
stoutest forest-trees. The thunder burst in tremendous
explosions
;
the peals were echoed from mountain to mountain;
they crashed upon Dunderberg, and rolled up the long defile
5*
of the highlands, each headland making a new echo, until old
Bull Hill seemed to bellow back the storm.
For a time the scudding rack and mist, and the sheeted rain
almost hid the landscape from the sight. There was a
fearful
gloom, illuminated still more fearfully by the streams of
lightning which glittered among the rain-drops. Never had
Dolph beheld such an absolute warring of the elements; it
seemed as if the storm was tearing and rending its way through
this mountain defile, and had brought all the artillery of heaven
into action.
The vessel was hurried on by the increasing wind, until she
came to where the river makes a sudden bend, the only one in
the whole course of its majestic career.
*
*
This must have been the bend at West Point.
Just as they turned
the point, a violent flaw of wind came sweeping down a
mountain
gully, bending the forest before it, and, in a moment,
lashing
up the river into white froth and foam. The captain saw
the danger, and cried out to lower the sail. Before the order
could be obeyed, the flaw struck the sloop, and threw her on
her beam-ends. Everything now was fright and confusion; the
flapping of the sails, the whistling and rushing of the wind,
the bawling of the captain and crew, the shrieking of the
passengers
,
all mingled with the rolling and bellowing of the
thunder. In the midst of the uproar the sloop righted; at the
same time the mainsail shifted, the boom came sweeping the
quarter-deck, and Dolph, who was gazing unguardedly at the
clouds, found himself, in a moment, floundering in the river.
For once in his life one of his idle accomplishments was of
use to him. The many truant hours he had devoted to
sporting
in the Hudson had made him an expert swimmer; yet with
all his strength and skill, he found great difficulty in reaching
the shore. His disappearance from the deck had not been
noticed by the crew, who were all occupied by their own
danger
.
The sloop was driven along with inconceivable rapidity.
She had hard work to weather a long promontory on the
eastern shore, round which the river turned, and which
completely
shut her from Dolph's view.
It was on a point of the western shore that he landed, and,
scrambling up the rocks, threw himself, faint and exhausted, at
the foot of a tree. By degrees the thunder-gust passed over.
The clouds rolled away to the east, where they lay piled in
feathery masses, tinted with the last rosy rays of the sun. The
distant play of the lightning might be seen about the dark
bases, and now and then might be heard the faint muttering of
the thunder. Dolph rose, and sought about to see if any path
led from the shore, but all was savage and trackless. The
rocks were piled upon each other; great trunks of trees lay
shattered about, as they had been blown down by the strong
winds which draw through these mountains, or had fallen
through age. The rocks, too, were overhung with wild vines
and briers, which completely matted themselves together, and
opposed a barrier to all ingress; every movement that he made
shook down a shower from the dripping foliage. He
attempted
to scale one of these almost perpendicular heights; but,
though strong and agile, he found it an Herculean undertaking.
Often he was supported merely by crumbling projections of the
rock, and sometimes he clung to roots and branches of trees,
and hung almost suspended in the air. The wood-pigeon
came cleaving his whistling flight by him, and the eagle
screamed from the brow of the impending cliff. As he was
thus clambering, he was on the point of seizing hold of a shrub
to aid his ascent, when something rustled among the leaves,
and he saw a snake quivering along like lightning, almost from
under his hand. It coiled itself up immediately, in an attitude
of defiance, with flattened head, distended jaws, and quickly
vibrating tongue, that played like a little flame about its
mouth. Dolph's heart turned faint within him, and he had
well nigh let go his hold, and tumbled down the precipice.
The serpent stood on the defensive but for an instant; and,
finding there was no attack, glided away into a cleft of the
rock. Dolph's eye followed it with fearful intensity, and saw
a nest of adders, knotted, and writhing, and hissing in the
chasm. He hastened with all speed from so frightful a
neighborhood
.
His imagination, full of this new horror, saw an
adder in every curling vine, and heard the tail of a rattlesnake in
every dry leaf that rustled.
At length he succeeded in scrambling to the summit of a
precipice, but it was covered by a dense forest. Wherever he
could gain a look out between the trees, he beheld heights and
cliffs, one rising beyond another, until huge mountains
overtopped
the whole. There were no signs of cultivation; no smoke
curling among the trees, to indicate a human residence.
Everything was wild and solitary. As he was standing on
the edge of a precipice overlooking a deep ravine fringed with
trees, his feet detached a great fragment of rock; it fell,
crashing
its way through the tree tops, down into the chasm. A
loud whoop, or rather yell, issued from the bottom of the glen;
the moment after there was the report of a gun; and a ball
came whistling over his head, cutting the twigs and leaves, and
burying itself deep in the bark of a chestnut tree.
Dolph did not wait for a second shot, but made a precipitate
retreat, fearing every moment to hear the enemy in pursuit.
He succeeded, however, in returning unmolested to the shore,
and determined to penetrate no further into a country so beset
with savage perils.
He sat himself down, dripping, disconsolately, on a wet
stone. What was to be done? Where was he to shelter
himself
?
The hour of repose was approaching; the birds were
seeking their nests, the bat began to flit about in the twilight,
and the night-hawk, soaring high in the heaven, seemed to be
calling out the stars. Night gradually closed in, and
wrapped
everything in gloom; and though it was the latter part of
summer, the breeze stealing along the river, and among these
dripping forests, was chilly and penetrating, especially to a
half-drowned
man.
As he sat drooping and despondent in this comfortless
condition
,
he perceived a light gleaming through the trees near the
shore, where the winding of the river made a deep bay. It
cheered him with the hope of a human habitation, where he
might get something to appease the clamorous cravings of his
stomach, and what was equally necessary in his shipwrecked
condition, a comfortable shelter for the night. With extreme
difficulty he made his way towards the light, along ledges of
rocks, down which he was in danger of sliding into the river,
and over great trunks of fallen trees, some of which had been
blown down in the late storm, and lay so thickly together, that
he had to struggle through their branches. At length he
came to the brow of a rock overhanging a small dell, whence
the light proceeded. It was from a fire at the foot of a great
tree in the midst of a grassy interval or plat among the rocks.
The fire cast up a red glare among the grey crags and
impending
trees; leaving chasms of deep gloom, that resembled
entrances to caverns. A small brook rippled close by,
betrayed
by the quivering reflection of the flame. There were
two figures moving about the fire, and others squatted before
it. As they were between him and the light, they were in
complete shadow, but one of them happening to move round
to the opposite side, Dolph was startled at perceiving, by the
glare falling on painted features, and glittering on silver
ornaments
,
that he was an Indian. He now looked more
narrowly
,
and saw guns leaning against a tree, and a dead body lying
on the ground. Here was the very foe that had fired at him
from the glen. He endeavored to retreat quietly, not caring to
intrust himself to these half-human beings, in so savage and
lonely a place. It was too late; the Indian, with that eagle
quickness of eye so remarkable in his race, perceived
something
stirring among the bushes on the rock; he seized one of
the guns that leaned against the tree; one moment more, and
Dolph might have had his passion for adventure cured by a
bullet. He hallooed loudly, with the Indian salutation of
friendship; the whole party sprang upon their feet; the
salutation
was returned, and the straggler was invited to join them
at the fire.
On approaching, he found, to his consolation, the party was
composed of white men, as well as Indians. One, evidently
the principal personage, or commander, was seated on a trunk
of a tree before the fire. He was a large stout man, somewhat
advanced in life, but hale and hearty. His face was bronzed
almost to the color of an Indian's; he had strong but rather
jovial features, an aquiline nose, and a mouth shaped like a
mastiff's. His face was half thrown in shade by a broad hat,
with a buck's tail in it. His grey hair hung short in his neck.
He wore a hunting-frock, with Indian leggins and moccasins,
and a tomahawk in the broad wampum-belt round his waist.
As Dolph caught a distinct view of his person and features,
something reminded him of the old man of the haunted house.
The man before him, however, was different in dress and age;
he was more cheery too in aspect, and it was hard to define
where the vague resemblance lay; but a resemblance there
certainly was. Dolph felt some degree of awe in approaching
him; but was assured by a frank, hearty welcome. He was
still further encouraged, by perceiving that the dead body,
which had caused him some alarm, was that of a deer; and
his satisfaction was complete in discerning, by savory steams
from a kettle, suspended by a hooked stick over the fire, that
there was a part cooking for the evening's repast.
He had, in fact, fallen in with a rambling hunting party;
such as often took place in those days among the settlers along
the river. The hunter is always hospitable; and nothing
makes men more social and unceremonious than meeting in
the wilderness. The commander of the party poured out a
dram of cheering liquor, which he gave him with a merry leer,
to warm his heart; and ordered one of his followers to fetch
some garments from a pinnace, moored in a cove close by,
while those in which our hero was dripping might be dried
before the fire.
Dolph found, as he had suspected, that the shot from the
glen, which had come so near giving him his quietus when on
the precipice, was from the party before him. He had nearly
crushed one of them by the fragments of rock which he had
detached; and the jovial old hunter, in the broad hat and
buck-tail, had fired at the place where he saw the bushes
move, supposing it to be some wild animal. He laughed
heartily at the blunder; it being what is considered an
exceeding
good joke among hunters; but faith, my lad, said he,
if I had but caught a glimpse of you to take sight at, you
would have followed the rock. Antony Vander Heyden is
seldom known to miss his aim. These last words were at
once a clue to Dolph's curiosity; and a few questions let him
completely into the character of the man before him, and of his
band of woodland rangers. The commander in the broad hat
and hunting-frock was no less a personage than the Heer
Antony Vander Heyden, of Albany, of whom Dolph had many
a time heard. He was, in fact, the hero of many a story; his
singular humors and whimsical habits being matters of wonder
to his quiet Dutch neighbors. As he was a man of property,
having had a father before him, from whom he inherited large
tracts of wild land, and whole barrels full of wampum, he
could indulge his humors without control. Instead of staying
quietly at home, eating and drinking at regular meal times,
amusing himself by smoking his pipe on the bench before the
door, and then turning into a comfortable bed at night, he
delighted in all kinds of rough, wild expeditions. Never so
happy as when on a hunting party in the wilderness, sleeping
under trees or bark sheds, or cruising down the river, or on
some woodland lake, fishing and fowling, and living the Lord
knows how.
He was a great friend to Indians, and to an Indian mode of
life; which he considered true natural liberty and manly
enjoyment. When at home he had always several Indian
hangers-on, who loitered about his house, sleeping like hounds
in the sunshine; or preparing hunting and fishing-tackle for
some new expedition; or shooting at marks with bows and
arrows.
Over these vagrant beings Heer Antony had as perfect
command as a huntsman over his pack; though they were
great nuisances to the regular people of his neighborhood. As
he was a rich man, no one ventured to thwart his humors;
indeed, his hearty, joyous manner made him universally
popular. He would troll a Dutch song as he tramped along
the street; hail every one a mile off, and when he entered a
house, would slap the good man familiarly on the back, shake
him by the hand till he roared, and kiss his wife and daughter
before his facein short, there was no pride nor ill humor
about Heer Antony.
Besides his Indian hangers-on, he had three or four humble
friends among the white men, who looked up to him as a
patron, and had the run of his kitchen, and the favor of being
taken with him occasionally on his expeditions. With a
medley of such retainers he was at present on a cruise along
the shores of the Hudson, in a pinnace kept for his own
recreation
.
There were two white men with him, dressed partly
in the Indian style, with moccasins and hunting-shirts; the
rest of his crew consisted of four favorite Indians. They had
been prowling about the river, without any definite object,
until they found themselves in the Highlands; where they had
passed two or three days, hunting the deer which still lingered
among these mountains.
It is lucky for you, young man, said Antony Vander
Heyden, that you happened to be knocked overboard to-day;
as to-morrow morning we start early on our return
homewards
;
and you might then have looked in vain for a meal
among the mountainsbut come, lads, stir about! stir about!
Let's see what prog we have for supper; the kettle has boiled
long enough; my stomach cries cupboard; and I'll warrant
our guest is in no mood to dally with his trencher.
There was a bustle now in the little encampment; one took
off the kettle and turned a part of the contents into a huge
wooden bowl. Another prepared a flat rock for a table;
while a third brought various utensils from the pinnace; Heer
Antony himself brought a flask or two of precious liquor from
his own private locker; knowing his boon companions too
well to trust any of them with the key.
A rude but hearty repast was soon spread; consisting of
venison smoking from the kettle, with cold bacon, boiled
Indian corn, and mighty loaves of good brown household
bread. Never had Dolph made a more delicious repast; and
when he had washed it down with two or three draughts from
the Heer Antony's flask, and felt the jolly liquor sending its
warmth through his veins, and glowing round his very heart,
he would not have changed his situation, no, not with the
governor of the province.
The Heer Antony, too, grew chirping and joyous; told half
a dozen fat stories, at which his white followers laughed
immoderately, though the Indians, as usual, maintained an
invincible gravity.
This is your true life, my boy! said he, slapping Dolph on
the shoulder; a man is never a man till he can defy wind and
weather, range woods and wilds, sleep under a tree, and live
on bass-wood leaves!
And then would he sing a stave or two of a Dutch drinking
song, swaying a short squab Dutch bottle in his hand, while his
myrmidons would join in the chorus, until the woods echoed
again;as the good old song has it,
They all with a shout made the elements ring,
So soon as the office was o'er;
To feasting they went, with true merriment,
And tippled strong liquor galore.
In the midst of his joviality, however, Heer Antony did not
lose sight of discretion. Though he pushed the bottle without
reserve to Dolph, he always took care to help his followers
himself, knowing the beings he had to deal with; and was
particular in granting but a moderate allowance to the Indians.
The repast being ended, the Indians having drunk their liquor and
smoked their pipes, now wrapped themselves in their blankets,
stretched themselves on the ground, with their feet to the fire,
and soon fell asleep, like so many tired hounds. The rest of
the party remained chattering before the fire, which the gloom
of the forest, and the dampness of the air from the late storm,
rendered extremely grateful and comforting. The conversation
gradually moderated from the hilarity of supper-time, and
turned upon hunting adventures, and exploits and perils in the
wilderness; many of which were so strange and improbable,
that I will not venture to repeat them, lest the veracity of
Antony Vander Heyden and his comrades should be brought
into question. There were many legendary tales told, also,
about the river, and the settlements on its borders; in which
valuable kind of lore the Heer Antony seemed deeply versed.
As the sturdy bush-beater sat in a twisted root of a tree, that
served him for an arm-chair, dealing forth these wild stories,
with the fire gleaming on his strongly-marked visage, Dolph
was again repeatedly perplexed by something that reminded him
of the phantom of the haunted house; some vague resemblance
not to be fixed upon any precise feature or lineament, but
pervading the general air of his countenance and figure.
The circumstance of Dolph's falling overboard led to the
relation of divers disasters and singular mishaps that had
befallen voyagers on this great river, particularly in the earlier
periods of colonial history; most of which the Heer deliberately
attributed to supernatural causes. Dolph stared at this
suggestion
;
but the old gentleman assured him it was very currently
believed by the settlers along the river, that these highlands
were under the dominion of supernatural and mischievous
beings, which seemed to have taken some pique against the
Dutch colonists in the early time of the settlement. In
consequence
of this, they have ever taken particular delight in
venting their spleen, and indulging their humors, upon the
Dutch skippers; bothering them with flaws, head-winds,
counter-currents, and all kinds of impediments; insomuch, that
a Dutch navigator was always obliged to be exceedingly wary
and deliberate in his proceedings; to come to anchor at dusk;
to drop his peak, or take in sail, whenever he saw a
swag-bellied
cloud rolling over the mountains; in short, to take so
many precautions, that he was often apt to be an incredible
time in toiling up the river.
Some, he said, believed these mischievous powers of the air
to be evil spirits conjured up by the Indian wizards, in the early
times of the province, to revenge themselves on the strangers
who had dispossessed them of their country. They even
attributed to their incantations the misadventure which befell
the renowned Hendrick Hudson, when he sailed so gallantly
up this river in quest of a northwest passage, and, as he
thought, ran his ship aground; which they affirm was nothing
more nor less than a spell of these same wizards, to prevent his
getting to China in this direction.
The greater part, however, Heer Antony observed, accounted
for all the extraordinary circumstances attending this river, and
the perplexities of the skippers who navigated it, by the old
legend of the Storm-ship which haunted Point-no-point. On
finding Dolph to be utterly ignorant of this tradition, the Heer
stared at him for a moment with surprise, and wondered where
he had passed his life, to be uninformed on so important a point
of history. To pass away the remainder of the evening,
therefore
,
he undertook the tale, as far as his memory would serve,
in the very words in which it had been written out by Mynheer
Selyne, an early poet of the New Nederlandts. Giving, then,
a stir to the fire, that sent up its sparks among the trees like a
little volcano, he adjusted himself comfortably in his root of a
tree; and throwing back his head, and closing his eyes for a
few moments, to summon up his recollection, he related the
following legend.
THE STORM-SHIP.
In
the golden age of the province of the New Netherlands,
when under the sway of Wouter Van Twiller, otherwise called
the Doubter, the people of the Manhattoes were alarmed one
sultry afternoon, just about the time of the summer solstice, by
a tremendous storm of thunder and lightning. The rain fell
in such torrents as absolutely to spatter up and smoke along
the ground. It seemed as if the thunder rattled and rolled
over the very roofs of the houses; the lightning was seen to
play about the church of St. Nicholas, and to strive three
times, in vain, to strike its weathercock. Garret Van Horne's
new chimney was split almost from top to bottom; and
Doffue Mildeberger was struck speechless from his bald-faced
mare, just as he was riding into town. In a word, it was one
of those unparalleled storms which only happen once within
the memory of that venerable personage, known in all towns
by the appellation of the oldest inhabitant.
Great was the terror of the good old women of the
Manhattoes
.
They gathered their children together, and took
refuge in the cellars, after having hung a shoe on the iron
point of every bed-post, lest it should attract the lightning.
At length the storm abated; the thunder sank into a growl;
and the setting sun, breaking from under the fringed borders of
the clouds, made the broad bosom of the bay to gleam like a
sea of molten gold.
The word was given from the fort that a ship was standing
up the bay. It passed from mouth to mouth, and street to
street, and soon put the little capital in a bustle. The arrival
of a ship, in those early times of the settlement, was an event
of vast importance to the inhabitants. It brought them news
from the old world, from the land of their birth, from which
they were so completely severed: to the yearly ship, too, they
looked for their supply of luxuries, of finery, of comforts, and
almost of necessaries. The good vrouw could not have her
new cap nor new gown until the arrival of the ship; the artist
waited for it for his tools, the burgomaster for his pipe and his
supply of Hollands, the schoolboy for his top and marbles, and
the lordly landholder for the bricks with which he was to
build his new mansion. Thus every one, rich and poor, great
and small, looked out for the arrival of the ship. It was the
great yearly event of the town of New Amsterdam; and from
one end of the year to the other, the shipthe shipthe ship
was the continual topic of conversation.
The news from the fort, therefore, brought all the populace
down to the battery, to behold the wished-for sight. It was
not exactly the time when she had been expected to arrive,
and the circumstance was a matter of some speculation.
Many were the groups collected about the battery. Here and
there might be seen a burgomaster, of slow and pompous
gravity, giving his opinion with great confidence to a crowd of
old women and idle boys. At another place was a knot of
old weather-beaten fellows who had been seamen or fishermen
in their times, and were great authorities on such occasions;
these gave different opinions, and caused great disputes among
their several adherents: but the man most looked up to, and
followed and watched by the crowd, was Hans Van Pelt, an
old Dutch sea-captain retired from service, the nautical oracle
of the place. He reconnoitred the ship through an ancient
telescope, covered with tarry canvas, hummed a Dutch tune to
himself, and said nothing. A hum, however, from Hans Van
Pelt, had always more weight with the public than a speech
from another man.
In the meantime the ship became more distinct to the naked
eye: she was a stout, round, Dutch-built vessel, with high bow
and poop, and bearing Dutch colors. The evening sun gilded
her bellying canvas, as she came riding over the long waving
billows. The sentinel who had given notice of her approach,
declared, that he first got sight of her when she was in the
centre of the bay; and that she broke suddenly on his sight,
just as if she had come out of the bosom of the black
thunder-cloud
.
The bystanders looked at Hans Van Pelt, to see what
he would say to this report: Hans Van Pelt screwed his
mouth closer together, and said nothing; upon which some
shook their heads, and others shrugged their shoulders.
The ship was now repeatedly hailed, but made no reply, and
passing by the fort, stood on up the Hudson. A gun was
brought to bear on her, and with some difficulty, loaded and
fired by Hans Van Pelt, the garrison not being expert in
artillery. The shot seemed absolutely to pass through the
ship, and to skip along the water on the other side, but no
notice was taken of it! What was strange, she had all her
sails set, and sailed right against wind and tide, which were
both down the river. Upon this Hans Van Pelt, who was
likewise harbor-master, ordered his boat, and set off to board
her; but after rowing two or three hours, he returned without
success. Sometimes he would get within one or two hundred
yards of her, and then, in a twinkling, she would be half a
mile off. Some said it was because his oarsmen, who were
rather pursy and short-winded, stopped every now and then to
take breath, and spit on their hands; but this it is probable
was a mere scandal. He got near enough, however, to see the
crew; who were all dressed in the Dutch style, the officers in
doublets and high hats and feathers; not a word was spoken
by any one on board; they stood as motionless as so many
statues, and the ship seemed as if left to her own government.
Thus she kept on, away up the river, lessening and lessening
in the evening sunshine, until she faded from sight, like a little
white cloud melting away in the summer sky.
The appearance of this ship threw the governor into one of
the deepest doubts that ever beset him in the whole course of
his administration. Fears were entertained for the security of
the infant settlements on the river, lest this might be an enemy's
ship in disguise, sent to take possession. The governor called
together his council repeatedly to assist him with their
conjectures
.
He sat in his chair of state, built of timber from the
sacred forest of the Hague, smoking his long jasmin pipe, and
listening to all that his counsellors had to say on a subject
about which they knew nothing; but in spite of all the
conjecturing
of the sagest and oldest heads, the governor still
continued
to doubt.
Messengers were dispatched to different places on the river;
but they returned without any tidingsthe ship had made no
port. Day after day, and week after week, elapsed, but she
never returned down the Hudson. As, however, the council
seemed solicitous for intelligence, they had it in abundance.
The captains of the sloops seldom arrived without bringing
some report of having seen the strange ship at different parts
of the river; sometimes near the Palisadoes, sometimes off
Croton Point, and sometimes in the Highlands; but she never
was reported as having been seen above the Highlands. The
crews of the sloops, it is true, generally differed among
themselves
in their accounts of these apparitions; but that may
have arisen from the uncertain situations in which they saw
her. Sometimes it was by the flashes of the thunder-storm
lighting up a pitchy night, and giving glimpses of her careering
across Tappaan Zee, or the wide waste of Haverstraw Bay.
At one moment she would appear close upon them, as if likely
to run them down, and would throw them into great bustle
and alarm; but the next flash would show her far off, always
sailing against the wind. Sometimes, in quiet moonlight
nights, she would be seen under some high bluff of the
Highlands
,
all in deep shadow, excepting her topsails glittering in
the moonbeams; by the time, however, that the voyagers
reached the place, no ship was to be seen; and when they had
passed on for some distance, and looked back, behold! there
she was again, with her top-sails in the moonshine! Her
appearance was always just after, or just before, or just in the
midst of unruly weather; and she was known among the
skippers and voyagers of the Hudson by the name of the
storm-ship.
These reports perplexed the governor and his council more
than ever, and it would be endless to repeat the conjectures and
opinions uttered on the subject. Some quoted cases in point,
of ships seen off the coast of New England, navigated by
witches and goblins. Old Hans Van Pelt, who had been more
than once to the Dutch colony at the Cape of Good Hope,
insisted
that this must be the Flying Dutchman, which had so
long haunted Table Bay, but being unable to make port, had
now sought another harbor. Others suggested, that if it really
was a supernatural apparition, as there was every natural
reason
to believe, it might be Hendrick Hudson, and his crew of
the Halfmoon, who, it was well known, had once run aground
in the upper part of the river, in seeking a north-west passage
to China. This opinion had very little weight with the
governor, but it passed current out of doors, for, indeed, it had
already been reported that Hendrick Hudson and his crew
haunted the Kaatskill Mountain; and it appeared very
reasonable
to suppose, that his ship might infest the river where the
enterprise was baffled, or that it might bear the shadowy crew
to their periodical revels in the mountain.
Other events occurred to occupy the thoughts and doubts of
the sage Wouter and his council, and the storm-ship ceased to
be a subject of deliberation at the board. It continued,
however
,
a matter of popular belief and marvellous anecdote
through the whole time of the Dutch government, and
particularly
just before the capture of New Amsterdam, and the
subjugation
of the province by the English squadron. About that
time the storm-ship was repeatedly seen in the Tappaan Zee,
and about Weehawk, and even down as far as Hoboken, and her
appearance was supposed to be ominous of the approaching
squall in public affairs, and the downfall of Dutch domination.
Since that time we have no authentic accounts of her, though
it is said she still haunts the Highlands, and cruises about
Point-no-point
.
People who live along the river, insist that they
sometimes see her in summer moonlight, and that in a deep,
still midnight, they have heard the chant of her crew, as if
heaving the lead; but sights and sounds are so deceptive along
the mountainous shores, and about the wide bays and long
reaches of this great river, that I confess I have very strong
doubts upon the subject.
It is certain, nevertheless, that strange things have been seen
in these highlands in storms, which are considered as
connected
with the old story of the ship. The captains of the river
craft talk of a little bulbous-bottomed Dutch goblin, in trunk
hose and sugar-loafed hat, with a speaking trumpet in his
hand, which they say keeps the Dunderberg.
*
*
i. e.
the Thunder-Mountain, so called from its echoes.
They declare
that they have heard him, in stormy weather, in the midst of
the turmoil, giving orders in low Dutch, for the piping up of a
fresh gust of wind, or the rattling off of another thunder-clap.
That sometimes he has been seen surrounded by a crew of
little
imps, in broad breeches and short doublets, tumbling head
over heels in the rack and mist, and playing a thousand
gambols
in the air, or buzzing like a swarm of flies about Antony's
nose; and that, at such times, the hurry-scurry of the storm
was always greatest. One time a sloop, in passing by the
Dunderberg, was overtaken by a thunder-gust, that came
scouring round the mountain, and seemed to burst just over the
vessel. Though tight and well ballasted, she labored
dreadfully
,
and the water came over the gunwale. All the crew
were amazed, when it was discovered that there was a little
white sugar-loaf hat on the mast-head, known at once to be
the hat of the Heer of the Dunderberg. Nobody, however,
dared to climb to the mast-head, and get rid of this terrible
hat. The sloop continued laboring and rocking, as if she
would have rolled her mast overboard, and seemed in continual
danger either of upsetting, or of running on shore. In this
way she drove quite through the Highlands, until she had
passed Pollopol's Island, where, it is said, the jurisdiction of the
Dunderberg potentate ceases. No sooner had she passed this
bourne, than the little hat spun up into the air, like a top,
6
whirled up all the clouds into a vortex, and hurried them back
to the summit of the Dunderberg, while the sloop righted
herself
,
and sailed on as quietly as if in a mill-pond. Nothing
saved her from utter wreck but the fortunate circumstance of
having a horse-shoe nailed against the mast, a wise precaution
against evil spirits, since adopted by all the Dutch captains that
navigate this haunted river.
There is another story told of this foul-weather urchin, by
Skipper Daniel Ouslesticker, of Fishkill, who was never known
to tell a lie. He declared that, in a severe squall, he saw him
seated astride of his bowsprit, riding the sloop ashore, full butt
against Antony's nose, and that he was exorcised by Dominie
Van Gieson, of Esopus, who happened to be on board, and who
sang the hymn of St. Nicholas, whereupon the goblin threw
himself up in the air like a ball, and went off in a whirlwind,
carrying away with him the nighteap of the Dominie's wife,
which was discovered the next Sunday morning hanging on
the weathercock of Esopus church steeple, at least forty miles
off. Several events of this kind having taken place, the
regular
skippers of the river, for a long time, did not venture to
pass the Dunderberg without lowering their peaks, out of
homage to the Heer of the mountain, and it was observed that
all such as paid this tribute of respect were suffered to pass
unmolested.
*
*
Among the superstitions which prevailed in the colonies during the
early times of the settlements, there seems to have been a singular one
about phantom ships. The superstitious fancies of men are always apt
to turn upon those objects which concern their daily occupations. The
solitary ship, which, from year to year, came like a raven in the
wilderness
,
bringing to the inhabitants of a settlement the comforts of life
from the world from which they were cut off, was apt to be present to
their dreams, whether sleeping or waking. The accidental sight from
shore of a sail gliding along the horizon in those, as yet, lonely seas,
was apt to be a matter of much talk and speculation. There is mention
made in one of the early New England writers, of a ship navigated by
witches, with a great horse that stood by the mainmast. I have met
another story, somewhere, of a ship that drove on shore, in fair, sunny,
tranquil weather, with sails all set, and a table spread in the cabin, as if
to regale a number of guests, yet not a living being on board. These
phantom ships always sailed in the eye of the wind, or ploughed their
way with great velocity, making the smooth sea foam before their bows,
when not a breath of air was stirring.
Moore has finely wrought up one of these legends of the sea into a
little tale, which, within a small compass, contains the very essence
of this species of supernatural fiction. I allude to his Spectre-Ship,
bound to Deadman's Isle.
Such, said Antony Vander Heyden, are a few of the
stories written down by Selyne the poet, concerning this
storm-ship
;
which he affirms to have brought a crew of mischievous
imps into the province, from some old ghost-ridden country of
Europe. I could give you a host more, if necessary; for all
the accidents that so often befall the river craft in the Highlands
are said to be tricks played off by these imps of the
Dunderberg
;
but I see that you are nodding, so let us turn in for the
night.
The moon had just raised her silver horns above the round
back of Old Bull Hill, and lit up the grey rocks and shagged
forests, and glittered on the waving bosom of the river. The
night dew was falling, and the late gloomy mountains began to
soften and put on a grey aerial tint in the dewy light. The
hunters stirred the fire, and threw on fresh fuel to qualify the
damp of the night air. They then prepared a bed of branches
and dry leaves under a ledge of rocks for Dolph; while
Antony Vander Heyden, wrapping himself in a huge coat of
skins, stretched himself before the fire. It was some time,
however, before Dolph could close his eyes. He lay
contemplating
the strange scene before him: the wild woods and
rocks around; the fire throwing fitful gleams on the faces of
the sleeping savages; and the Heer Antony, too, who so
singularly, yet vaguely, reminded him of the nightly visitant
to the haunted house. Now and then he heard the cry of
some animal from the forest; or the hooting of the owl; or
the notes of the whip-poor-will, which seemed to abound
among these solitudes; or the splash of a sturgeon, leaping out
of the river, and falling back full length on its placid surface.
He contrasted all this with his accustomed nest in the garret
room of the doctor's mansion; where the only sounds at night
were the church clock telling the hour; the drowsy voice of
the watchman, drawling out all was well; the deep snoring
of the doctor's clubbed nose from below stairs; or the cautious
labors of some carpenter rat gnawing in the wainscot. His
thoughts then wandered to his poor old mother: what would
she think of his mysterious disappearancewhat anxiety and
distress would she not suffer? This thought would continually
intrude itself to mar his present enjoyment. It brought with it
a feeling of pain and compunction, and he fell asleep with the
tears yet standing in his eyes.
Were this a mere tale of fancy, here would be a fine
opportunity
for weaving in strange adventures among these wild
mountains, and roving hunters; and, after involving my hero in
a variety of perils and difficulties, rescuing him from them all
by some miraculous contrivance; but as this is absolutely a
true story, I must content myself with simple facts, and keep
to probabilities.
At an early hour of the next day, therefore, after a hearty
morning's meal, the encampment broke up, and our adventurers
embarked in the pinnace of Antony Vander Heyden. There
being no wind for the sails, the Indians rowed her gently along,
keeping time to a kind of chant of one of the white men.
The day was serene and beautiful; the river without a wave;
and as the vessel cleft the glassy water, it left a long,
undulating
track behind. The crows, who had scented the hunter's
banquet, were already gathering and hovering in the air, just
where a column of thin, blue smoke, rising from among the
trees, showed the place of their last night's quarters. As they
coasted along the basis of the mountains, the Heer Antony
pointed out to Dolph a bald eagle, the sovereign of these
regions, who sat perched on a dry tree that projected over the
river; and, with eye turned upwards, seemed to be drinking in
the splendor of the morning sun. Their approach disturbed
the monarch's meditations. He first spread one wing, and
then the other; balanced himself for a moment; and then,
quitting his perch with dignified composure, wheeled slowly
over their heads. Dolph snatched up a gun, and sent a
whistling ball after him, that cut some of the feathers from his
wing; the report of the gun leaped sharply from rock to rock,
and awakened a thousand echoes; but the monarch of the air
sailed calmly on, ascending higher and higher, and wheeling
widely as he ascended, soaring up the green bosom of the
woody mountain, until he disappeared over the brow of a
beetling precipice. Dolph felt in a manner rebuked by this
proud tranquillity, and almost reproached himself for having so
wantonly insulted this majestic bird. Heer Antony told him,
laughing, to remember that he was not yet out of the territories
of the lord of the Dunderberg; and an old Indian shook his
head, and observed, that there was bad luck in killing an eagle;
the hunter, on the contrary, should always leave him a portion
of his spoils.
Nothing, however, occurred to molest them on their voyage.
They passed pleasantly through magnificent and lonely scenes,
until they came to where Pollopol's Island lay, like a floating
bower, at the extremity of the Highlands. Here they landed,
until the heat of the day should abate, or a breeze spring up,
that might supersede the labor of the oar. Some prepared the
mid-day meal, while others reposed under the shade of the
trees in luxurious summer indolence, looking drowsily forth
upon the beauty of the scene. On the one side were the
Highlands
,
vast and cragged, feathered to the top with forests, and
throwing their shadows on the glassy water that dimpled at
their feet. On the other side was a wide expanse of the river,
like a broad lake, with long sunny reaches, and green
headlands
;
and the distant line of Shawungunk mountains waving
along a clear horizon, or checkered by a fleecy cloud.
But I forbear to dwell on the particulars of their cruise along
the river; this vagrant, amphibious life, careering across silver
sheets of water; coasting wild woodland shores; banqueting on
shady promontories, with the spreading tree over head, the
river curling its light foam on one's feet, the distant mountain,
and rock, and tree, and snowy cloud, and deep blue sky, all
mingling in summer beauty before one; all this, though never
cloying in the enjoyment, would be but tedious in narration.
When encamped by the water-side, some of the party would
go into the woods and hunt; others would fish: sometimes
they would amuse themselves by shooting at a mark, by
leaping
,
by running, by wrestling; and Dolph gained great favor in
the eyes of Antony Vander Heyden, by his skill and adroitness
in all these exercises; which the Heer considered as the highest
of manly accomplishments.
Thus did they coast jollily on, choosing only the pleasant
hours for voyaging; sometimes in the cool morning dawn,
sometimes in the sober evening twilight, and sometimes when
the moonshine spangled the crisp curling waves that whispered
along the sides of their little bark. Never had Dolph felt so
completely in his element; never had he met with anything so
completely to his taste as this wild, hap-hazard life. He was
the very man to second Antony Vander Heyden in his rambling
humors, and gained continually on his affections. The heart
of the old bush-whacker yearned towards the young man, who
seemed thus growing up in his own likeness; and as they
approached to the end of their voyage, he could not help
inquiring a little into his history. Dolph frankly told him his
course of life, his severe medical studies, his little proficiency,
and his very dubious prospects. The Heer was shocked to
find that such amazing talents and accomplishments were to be
cramped and buried under a doctor's wig. He had a sovereign
contempt for the healing art, having never had any other
physician than the butcher. He bore a mortal grudge to all
kinds of study also, ever since he had been flogged about an
unintelligible book when he was a boy. But to think that a
young fellow like Dolph, of such wonderful abilities, who
could shoot, fish, run, jump, ride, and wrestle, should be
obliged to roll pills, and administer juleps for a living'twas
monstrous! He told Dolph never to despair, but to throw
physic to the dogs; for a young fellow of his prodigious
talents could never fail to make his way. As you seem to
have no acquaintance in Albany, said Heer Antony, you
shall go home with me, and remain under my roof until you
can look about you; and in the meantime we can take an
occasional bout at shooting and fishing, for it is a pity that such
talents should lie idle.
Dolph, who was at the mercy of chance, was not hard to
be persuaded. Indeed, on turning over matters in his mind,
which he did very sagely and deliberately, he could not but
think that Antony Vander Heyden was, somehow or other,
connected with the story of the Haunted House; that the
misadventure
in the Highlands, which had thrown them so strangely
together, was, somehow or other, to work out something
good: in short, there is nothing so convenient as this
somehow
or other way of accommodating one's self to
circumstances
;
it is the main stay of a heedless actor and tardy
reasoner
,
like Dolph Heyliger; and he who can, in this loose,
easy way, link foregone evil to anticipated good, possesses a
secret of happiness almost equal to the philosopher's stone.
On their arrival at Albany, the sight of Dolph's companion
seemed to cause universal satisfaction. Many were the
greetings
at the river-side, and the salutations in the streets; the
dogs bounded before him; the boys whooped as he passed;
everybody seemed to know Antony Vander Heyden. Dolph
followed on in silence, admiring the neatness of this worthy
burgh; for in those days Albany was in all its glory, and
inhabited
almost exclusively by the descendants of the original
Dutch settlers, not having as yet been discovered and colonized
by the restless people of New England. Everything was
quiet and orderly; everything was conducted calmly and
leisurely
;
no hurry, no bustle, no struggling and scrambling for
existence. The grass grew about the unpaved streets, and
relieved the eye by its refreshing verdure. Tall sycamores or
pendent willows shaded the houses, with caterpillars swinging,
in long silken strings, from their fine branches; or moths
fluttering about like coxcombs, in joy at their gay
transformation
.
The houses were built in the old Dutch style, with the
gable ends towards the street. The thrifty housewife was
seated on a bench before her door, in close-crimped cap,
bright flowered gown, and white apron, busily employed in
knitting. The husband smoked his pipe on the opposite
bench, and the little pet negro girl, seated on the step at her
mistress's feet, was industriously plying her needle. The
swallows sported about the eaves, or skimmed along the
streets, and brought back some rich booty for their clamorous
young; and the little housekeeping wren flew in and out of a
Lilliputian house, or an old hat nailed against the wall. The
cows were coming home, lowing through the streets, to be
milked at their owner's door; and if, perchance, there were
any loiterers, some negro urchin, with a long goad, was gently
urging them homewards.
As Dolph's companion passed on, he received a tranquil nod
from the burghers, and a friendly word from their wives; all
calling him familiarly by the name of Antony; for it was the
custom in this stronghold of the patriarchs, where they had all
grown up together from childhood, to call each other by the
Christian name. The Heer did not pause to have his usual
jokes with them, for he was impatient to reach his home. At
length they arrived at his mansion. It was of some
magnitude
,
in the Dutch style, with large iron figures on the gables,
that gave the date of its erection, and showed that it had been
built in the earliest times of the settlement.
The news of Heer Antony's arrival had preceded him, and
the whole household was on the look-out. A crew of negroes,
large and small, had collected in front of the house to receive
him. The old, white-headed ones, who had grown grey in
his service, grinned for joy, and made many awkward bows
and grimaces, and the little ones capered about his knees. But
the most happy being in the household was a little, plump,
blooming lass, his only child, and the darling of his heart. She
came bounding out of the house; but the sight of a strange
young man with her father called up, for a moment, all the
bashfulness of a homebred damsel. Dolph gazed at her with
wonder and delight; never had he seen, as he thought,
anything
so comely in the shape of woman. She was dressed in
the good old Dutch taste, with long stays, and full, short
petticoats
,
so admirably adapted to show and set off the female
form. Her hair, turned up under a small round cap, displayed
the fairness of her forehead; she had fine, blue, laughing eyes;
a trim, slender waist, and soft swellbut, in a word, she was
a little Dutch divinity; and Dolph, who never stopped half-way
in a new impulse, fell desperately in love with her.
Dolph was now ushered into the house with a hearty
welcome
.
In the interior was a mingled display of Heer Antony's
taste and habits, and of the opulence of his predecessors. The
chambers were furnished with good old mahogany; the
beaufets and cupboards glittered with embossed silver and
painted china. Over the parlor fireplace was, as usual, the
family coat of arms, painted and framed: above which was a
long duck fowling-piece, flanked by an Indian pouch, and a
powder-horn. The room was decorated with many Indian
articles, such as pipes of peace, tomahawks, scalping-knives,
hunting-pouches, and belts of wampum; and there were
various kinds of fishing-tackle, and two or three
fowling-pieces
in the corners. The household affairs seemed to be
conducted, in some measure, after the master's humors;
corrected
,
perhaps, by a little quiet management of the daughter's.
There was a great degree of patriarchal simplicity and
good-humored
indulgence. The negroes came into the room
without
being called, merely to look at their master, and hear of
his adventures; they would stand listening at the door until he
had finished a story, and then go off on a broad grin, to
repeat it in the kitchen. A couple of pet negro children were
playing about the floor with the dogs, and sharing with them
their bread and butter. All the domestics looked hearty and
happy; and when the table was set for the evening repast, the
variety and abundance of good household luxuries bore
testimony
to the open-handed liberality of the Heer, and the
notable
housewifery of his daughter.
In the evening there dropped in several of the worthies of
the place, the Van Rennsellaers, and the Gansevoorts, and the
Rosebooms, and others of Antony Vander Heyden's intimates, to
hear an account of his expedition, for he was the Sindbad of
Albany, and his exploits and adventures were favorite topics of
conversation among the inhabitants. While these sat
gossiping
together about the door of the hall, and telling long twilight
stories, Dolph was cosily seated, entertaining the daughter, on
a window bench. He had already got on intimate terms, for
those were not times of false reserve and idle ceremony; and,
besides, there is something wonderfully propitious to a lover's
suit, in the delightful dusk of a long summer evening, it
gives courage to the most timid tongue, and hides the blushes
of the bashful. The stars above twinkled brightly, and now
and then a firefly streamed his transient light before the
window
,
or, wandering into the room, flew gleaming about the
ceiling.
What Dolph whispered in her ear that long summer
evening
it is impossible to say; his words were so low and
indistinct, that they never reached the ear of the historian.
It is probable, however, that they were to the purpose, for he
had a natural talent at pleasing the sex, and was never long in
company with a petticoat, without paying proper court to
it.
In the meantime the visitors, one by one, departed; Antony
Vander Heyden, who had fairly talked himself silent, sat nodding
alone in his chair by the door, when he was suddenly aroused
by a hearty salute with which Dolph Heyliger had
unguardedly
rounded off one of his periods, and which echoed through
the still chamber like the report of a pistol. The Heer
started
up, rubbed his eyes, called for lights, and observed that it
was high time to go to bed, though, on parting for the night,
he squeezed Dolph heartily by the hand, looked kindly in his
face, and shook his head knowingly, for the Heer well
remembered
what he himself had been at the youngster's age.
The chamber in which our hero was lodged was spacious,
and panelled with oak. It was furnished with clothes-presses,
and mighty chests of drawers, well waxed, and glittering with
brass ornaments. These contained ample stock of family
linen, for the Dutch housewives had always a laudable pride
in showing off their household treasures to strangers.
Dolph's mind, however, was too full to take particular notice
of the objects around him; yet he could not help continually
comparing the free, open-hearted cheeriness of this
establishment
,
with the starveling, sordid, joyless housekeeping at
Doctor
Knipperhausen's. Still something marred the enjoyment;
the idea that he must take leave of his hearty host and pretty
hostess, and cast himself once more adrift upon the world.
To linger here would be folly; he should only get deeper in
love, and for a poor varlet, like himself, to aspire to the
daughter
of the great Heer Vander Heydenit was madness to think
of such a thing. The very kindness that the girl had shown
towards him, prompted him, on reflection, to hasten his
departure
;
it would be a poor return for the frank hospitality of
his host, to entangle his daughter's heart in an injudicious
attachment
.
In a word, Dolph was like many other young
reasoners, of exceeding good hearts, and giddy heads, who
think after they act, and act differently from what they think;
who make excellent determinations over night, and forget to
keep them the next morning.
This is a fine conclusion, truly, of my voyage, said he, as
he almost buried himself in a sumptuous feather-bed, and drew
the fresh white sheets up to his chin. Here am I, instead of
finding a bag of money to carry home, launched in a strange
place, with scarcely a stiver in my pocket, and, what is worse,
have jumped ashore up to my very ears in love into the bargain.
However, added he, after some pause, stretching himself, and
turning himself in bed, I'm in good quarters for the present,
at least, so I'll e'en enjoy the present moment, and let the next
take care of itself; I dare say all will work out, `somehow of
other,' for the best.
As he said these words, he reached out his hand to
extinguish
the candle, when he was suddenly struck with
astonishment
and dismay, for he thought he beheld the phantom of the
haunted house staring on him from a dusky part of the
chamber
.
A second look reassured him, as he perceived that what he
had taken for a spectre was, in fact, nothing but a Flemish
portrait, hanging in a shadowy corner, just behind a
clothes-press
.
It was, however, the precise representation of his
nightly
visitor. The same cloak and belted jerkin, the same
grizzled beard and fixed eye, the same broad slouched hat,
with a feather hanging over one side. Dolph now called to
mind the resemblance he had frequently remarked between his
host and the old man of the haunted house, and was fully
convinced they were in some way connected, and that some
especial destiny had governed his voyage. He lay gazing on
the portrait with almost as much awe as he had gazed on the
ghostly original, until the shrill house-clock warned him of
the lateness of the hour. He put out the light, but remained
for a long time turning over these curious circumstances and
coincidences in his mind, until he fell asleep. His dreams
partook
of the nature of his waking thoughts. He fancied that
he still lay gazing on the picture, until, by degrees, it became
animated; that the figure descended from the wall, and
walked
out of the room, that he followed it, and found himself by
the well, to which the old man pointed, smiled on him, and
disappeared.
In the morning, when he waked, he found his host standing
by his bedside, who gave him a hearty morning's salutation, and
asked him how he had slept. Dolph answered cheerily, but
took occasion to inquire about the portrait that hung against
the wall. Ah, said Heer Antony, that's a portrait of old
Killian Vander Spiegel, once a burgomaster of Amsterdam,
who, on some popular troubles, abandoned Holland, and came
over to the province during the government of Peter Stuyvesant.
He was my ancestor by the mother's side, and an old miserly
curmudgeon he was. When the English took possession of
New Amsterdam, in 1664, he retired into the country. He
fell into a melancholy, apprehending that his wealth would be
taken from him, and he come to beggary. He turned all his
property into cash, and used to hide it away. He was for a
year or two concealed in various places, fancying himself
sought after by the English, to strip him of his wealth; and
finally was found dead in his bed one morning, without any one
being able to discover where he had concealed the greater part
of his money.
When his host had left the room, Dolph remained for some
time lost in thought. His whole mind was occupied by what
he had heard. Vander Spiegel was his mother's family name;
and he recollected to have heard her speak of this very Killian
Vander Spiegel as one of her ancestors. He had heard her
say, too, that her father was Killian's rightful heir, only that
the old man died without leaving anything to be inherited. It
now appeared that Heer Antony was likewise a descendant,
and perhaps an heir, also, of this poor rich man, and that thus
the Heyligers and the Vander Heydens were remotely
connected
.
What, thought he, if, after all, this is the
interpretation
of my dream, that this is the way I am to make my
fortune by this voyage to Albany, and that I am to find the
old man's hidden wealth in the bottom of that well? But
what an odd round-about mode of communicating the matter!
Why the plague could not the old goblin have told me about
the well at once, without sending me all the way to Albany,
to hear a story that was to send me all the way back again?
These thoughts passed through his mind while he was
dressing. He descended the stairs, full of perplexity, when
the bright face of Marie Vander Heyden suddenly beamed in
smiles upon him, and seemed to give him a clue to the whole
mystery. After all, thought he, the old goblin is in the
right. If I am to get his wealth, he means that I shall marry
his pretty descendant; thus both branches of the family will be
again united, and the property go on in the proper
channel
.
No sooner did this idea enter his head, than it carried
conviction
with it. He was now all impatience to hurry back and
secure the treasure, which, he did not doubt, lay at the bottom
of the well, and which he feared every moment might be
discovered by some other person. Who knows, thought he,
but this night-walking old fellow of the haunted house may
be in the habit of haunting every visitor, and may give a hint
to some shrewder fellow than myself, who will take a shorter
cut to the well than by the way of Albany? He wished a
thousand times that the babbling old ghost was laid in the Red
Sea, and his rambling portrait with him. He was in a perfect
fever to depart. Two or three days elapsed before any
opportunity presented for returning down the river. They
were ages to Dolph, notwithstanding that he was basking in
the smiles of the pretty Marie, and daily getting more and
more enamored.
At length the very sloop from which he had been knocked
overboard prepared to make sail. Dolph made an awkward
apology to his host for his sudden departure. Antony Vander
Heyden was sorely astonished. He had concerted half a dozen
excursions into the wilderness; and his Indians were actually
preparing for a grand expedition to one of the lakes. He took
Dolph aside, and exerted his eloquence to get him to abandon
all thoughts of business and to remain with him, but in vain;
and he at length gave up the attempt, observing, that it was a
thousand pities so fine a young man should throw himself
away. Heer Antony, however, gave him a hearty shake by
the hand at parting, with a favorite fowling-piece, and an
invitation to come to his house whenever he revisited Albany.
The pretty little Marie said nothing; but as he gave her a
farewell kiss, her dimpled cheek turned pale, and a tear stood
in her eye.
Dolph sprang lightly on board of the vessel. They hoisted
sail; the wind was fair; they soon lost sight of Albany, its
green hills, and embowered islands. They were wafted gaily
past the Kaatskill mountains, whose fairy heights were bright
and cloudless. They passed prosperously through the
Highlands
,
without any molestation from the Dunderberg goblin and
his crew; they swept on across Haverstraw Bay, and by
Croton Point, and through the Tappaan Zee, and under the
Palisadoes, until, in the afternoon of the third day, they saw
the promontory of Hoboken, hanging like a cloud in the air;
and, shortly after, the roofs of the Manhattoes rising out of the
water.
Dolph's first care was to repair to his mother's house; for he
was continually goaded by the idea of the uneasiness she must
experience on his account. He was puzzling his brains, as he
went along, to think how he should account for his absence,
without betraying the secrets of the haunted house. In the
midst of these cogitations, he entered the street in which his
mother's house was situated, when he was thunderstruck at
beholding it a heap of ruins.
There had evidently been a great fire, which had destroyed
several large houses, and the humble dwelling of poor Dame
Heyliger had been involved in the conflagration. The walls
were not so completely destroyed, but that Dolph could
distinguish some traces of the scene of his childhood. The
fireplace, about which he had often played, still remained,
ornamented with Dutch tiles, illustrating passages in Bible
history, on which he had many a time gazed with admiration.
Among the rubbish lay the wreck of the good dame's
elbow-chair
,
from which she had given him so many a wholesome
precept; and hard by it was the family Bible, with brass clasps;
now, alas! reduced almost to a cinder.
For a moment Dolph was overcome by this dismal sight, for
he was seized with the fear that his mother had perished in
the flames. He was relieved, however, from this horrible
apprehension, by one of the neighbors, who happened to come
by and informed him that his mother was yet alive.
The good woman had, indeed, lost everything by this
unlooked for calamity; for the populace had been so intent
upon saving the fine furniture of her rich neighbors, that the
little tenement, and the little all of poor Dame Heyliger, had
been suffered to consume without interruption; nay, had it not
been for the gallant assistance of her old crony, Peter de
Groodt, the worthy dame and her cat might have shared the
fate of their habitation.
As it was, she had been overcome with fright and affliction,
and lay ill in body and sick at heart. The public, however,
had showed her its wonted kindness. The furniture of her rich
neighbors being, as far as possible, rescued from the flames;
themselves duly and ceremoniously visited and condoled with
on the injury of their property, and their ladies commiserated
on the agitation of their nerves; the public, at length, began to
recollect something about poor Dame Heyliger. She forthwith
became again a subject of universal sympathy; everybody
pitied her more than ever; and if pity could but have been
coined into cashgood Lord! how rich she would have been!
It was now determined, in good earnest, that something
ought to be done for her without delay. The Dominie,
therefore
,
put up prayers for her on Sunday, in which all the
congregation joined most heartily. Even Cobus Groesbeek,
the alderman, and Mynheer Milledollar, the great Dutch
merchant, stood up in their pews, and did not spare their voices
on the occasion; and it was thought the prayers of such great
men could not but have their due weight. Doctor
Knipperhausen
,
too, visited her professionally, and gave her abundance
of advice gratis, and was universally lauded for his charity.
As to her old friend, Peter de Groodt, he was a poor man,
whose pity, and prayers, and advice, could be of but little
avail, so he gave her all that was in his powerhe gave her
shelter.
To the humble dwelling of Peter de Groodt, then, did Dolph
turn his steps. On his way thither, he recalled all the
tenderness
and kindness of his simple-hearted parent, her indulgence
of his errors, her blindness to his faults; and then he bethought
himself of his own idle, harum-scarum life. I've been a sad
scapegrace, said Dolph, shaking his head sorrowfully. I've
been a complete sink-pocket, that's the truth of it!But,
added he briskly, and clasping his hands, only let her live
only let her liveand I'll show myself indeed a son!
As Dolph approached the house he met Peter de Groodt
coming out of it. The old man started back aghast, doubting
whether it was not a ghost that stood before him. It being
bright daylight, however, Peter soon plucked up heart, satisfied
that no ghost dare show his face in such clear sunshine. Dolph
now learned from the worthy sexton the consternation and
rumor to which his mysterious disappearance had given rise.
It had been universally believed that he had been spirited away
by those hobgoblin gentry that infested the haunted house; and
old Abraham Vandozer, who lived by the great buttonwood
trees, near the three-mile stone, affirmed, that he had heard a
terrible noise in the air, as he was going home late at night,
which seemed just as if a flock of wild-geese were overhead,
passing off towards the northward. The haunted house was,
in consequence, looked upon with ten times more awe than
ever; nobody would venture to pass a night in it for the
world, and even the doctor had ceased to make his expeditions
to it in the daytime.
It required some preparation before Dolph's return could be
made known to his mother, the poor soul having bewailed him
as lost; and her spirits having been sorely broken down by a
number of comforters, who daily cheered her with stories of
ghosts, and of people carried away by the devil. He found her
confined to her bed, with the other member of the Heyliger
family, the good dame's cat, purring beside her, but sadly
singed, and utterly despoiled of those whiskers which were the
glory of her physiognomy. The poor woman threw her arms
about Dolph's neck: My boy! my boy! art thou still
alive? For a time she seemed to have forgotten all her
losses and troubles in her joy at his return. Even the sage
grimalkin showed indubitable signs of joy at the return of the
youngster. She saw, perhaps, that they were a forlorn and
undone family, and felt a touch of that kindliness which
fellow-sufferers
only know. But, in truth, cats are a slandered
people; they have more affection in them than the world
commonly
gives them credit for.
The good dame's eyes glistened as she saw one being, at
least, beside herself, rejoiced at her son's return. Tib knows
thee! poor dumb beast! said she, smoothing down the
mottled coat of her favorite; then recollecting herself, with a
melancholy shake of the head, Ah, my poor Dolph!
exclaimed
she, thy mother can help thee no longer! She can
no longer help herself! What will become of thee, my poor
boy!
Mother, said Dolph, don't talk in that strain; I've been
too long a charge upon you; it's now my part to take care
of you in your old days. Come! be of good heart! you, and
I, and Tib will all see better days. I'm here, you see, young,
and sound, and hearty; then don't let us despair; I dare say
things will all, somehow or other, turn out for the best.
While this scene was going on with the Heyliger family, the
news was carried to Doctor Knipperhausen, of the safe return
of his disciple. The little doctor scarce knew whether to
rejoice or be sorry at the tidings. He was happy at having the
foul reports which had prevailed concerning his country
mansion thus disproved; but he grieved at having his disciple,
of whom he had supposed himself fairly disencumbered, thus
drifting back, a heavy charge upon his hands. While balancing
between these two feelings, he was determined by the counsels
of Frau Ilsy, who advised him to take advantage of the truant
absence of the youngster, and shut the door upon him for
ever.
At the hour of bed-time, therefore, when it was supposed the
recreant disciple would seek his old quarters, everything was
prepared for his reception. Dolph, having talked his mother
into a state of tranquillity, sought the mansion of his quondam
master, and raised the knocker with a faltering hand. Scarcely,
however, had it given a dubious rap, when the doctor's head,
in a red night-cap, popped out of one window, and the
housekeeper's, in a white night-cap, out of another. He was
now greeted with a tremendous volley of hard names and hard
language
, mingled with invaluable pieces of advice, such as
are seldom ventured to be given excepting to a friend in
distress
,
or a culprit at the bar. In a few moments, not a window
in the street but had its particular night-cap, listening to the
shrill treble of Frau Ilsy, and the guttural croaking of Dr.
Knipperhausen; and the word went from window to window,
Ah! here's Dolph Heyliger come back, and at his old pranks
again. In short, poor Dolph found he was likely to get
nothing from the doctor but good advice, a commodity so
abundant as even to be thrown out of the window; so he was
fain to beat a retreat, and take up his quarters for the night
under the lowly roof of honest Peter de Groodt.
The next morning, bright and early, Dolph was out at the
haunted house. Everything looked just as he had left it. The
fields were grass-grown and matted, and appeared as if nobody
had traversed them since his departure. With palpitating heart
he hastened to the well. He looked down into it, and saw
that it was of great depth, with water at the bottom. He had
provided himself with a strong line, such as the fishermen use
on the banks of Newfoundland. At the end was a heavy
plummet and a large fish-hook. With this he began to sound
the bottom of the well, and to angle about in the water. The
water was of some depth; there was also much rubbish, stones
from the top having fallen in. Several times his hook got
entangled
,
and he came near breaking his line. Now and then,
too, he hauled up mere trash, such as the skull of a horse, an
iron hoop, and a shattered iron-bound bucket. He had now
been several hours employed without finding anything to repay
his trouble, or to encourage him to proceed. He began to
think himself a great fool, to be thus decoyed into a
wild-goosechase
by mere dreams, and was on the point of throwing line
and all into the well, and giving up all further angling.
One more cast of the line, said he, and that shall be
the last. As he sounded, he felt the plummet slip, as it were
through the interstices of loose stones; and as he drew back
the line, he felt that the hook had taken hold of something
heavy. He had to manage his line with great caution, lest it
should be broken by the strain upon it. By degrees the rubbish
which lay upon the article he had hooked gave way; he drew
it to the surface of the water, and what was his rapture at seeing
something like silver glittering at the end of his line! Almost
breathless with anxiety, he drew it up to the mouth of the well,
surprised at its great weight, and fearing every instant that his
hook would slip from its hold, and his prize tumble again to
the bottom. At length he landed it safe beside the well. It
was a great silver porringer, of an ancient form, richly
embossed
,
and with armorial bearings engraved on its side,
similar
to those over his mother's mantel-piece. The lid was
fastened
down by several twists of wire; Dolph loosened them
with a trembling hand, and, on lifting the lid, behold! the vessel
was filled with broad golden pieces, of a coinage which he had
never seen before. It was evident he had lit on the place
where Killian Vander Spiegel had concealed his treasure.
Fearful of being seen by some straggler, he cautiously
retired
,
and buried his pot of money in a secret place. He now
spread terrible stories about the haunted house, and deterred
every one from approaching it, while he made frequent visits to
it in stormy days, when no one was stirring in the neighboring
fields; though, to tell the truth, he did not care to venture there
in the dark. For once in his life he was diligent and
industrious
,
and followed up his new trade of angling with such
perseverance
and success, that in a little while he had hooked up
wealth enough to make him, in those moderate days, a rich
burgher for life.
It would be tedious to detail minutely the rest of this story.
To tell how he gradually managed to bring his property into
use without exciting surprise and inquiryhow he satisfied all
scruples with regard to retaining the property, and at the same
time gratified his own feelings, by marrying the pretty Marie
Vander Heydenand how he and Heer Antony had many a
merry and roving expedition together.
I must not omit to say, however, that Dolph took his mother
home to live with him, and cherished her in her old days. The
good dame, too, had the satisfaction of no longer hearing
her son made the theme of censure; on the contrary, he grew
daily in public esteem; everybody spoke well of him and
his wines; and the lordliest burgomaster was never known to
decline his invitation to dinner. Dolph often related, at his
own table, the wicked pranks which had once been the
abhorrence
of the town; but they were now considered excellent
jokes, and the gravest dignitary was fain to hold his sides when
listening to them. No one was more struck with Dolph's
increasing
merit than his old master the doctor; and so
forgiving
was Dolph, that he absolutely employed the doctor as his
family physician, only taking care that his prescriptions should
be always thrown out of the window. His mother had often
her junto of old cronies to take a snug cup of tea with her in
her comfortable little parlor; and Peter de Groodt, as he sat by
the fireside, with one of her grandchildren on his knee, would
many a time congratulate her upon her son turning out so great
a man; upon which the good old soul would wag her head
with exultation, and exclaim, Ah, neighbor, neighbor! did I
not say that Dolph would one day or other hold up his head
with the best of them?
Thus did Dolph Heyliger go on, cheerily and prosperously,
growing merrier as he grew older and wiser, and completely
falsifying the old proverb about money got over the devil's
back; for he made good use of his wealth, and became a
distinguished
citizen, and a valuable member of the community.
He was a great promoter of public institutions, such as
beef-steak
societies and catch-clubs. He presided at all public
dinners
,
and was the first that introduced turtle from the West
Indies. He improved the breed of race-horses and game-cocks,
and was so great a patron of modest merit, that any one who
could sing a good song, or tell a good story, was sure to find
a place at his table.
He was a member, too, of the corporation, made several laws
for the protection of game and oysters, and bequeathed to the
board a large silver punch-bowl, made out of the identical
porringer
before mentioned, and which is in the possession of the
corporation to this very day.
Finally, he died, in a florid old age, of an apoplexy at a
corporation
feast, and was buried with great honors in the yard of
the little Dutch church in Garden-street, where his tombstone
may still be seen, with a modest epitaph in Dutch, by his friend
Mynheer Justus Benson, an ancient and excellent poet of the
province.
The foregoing tale rests on better authority than most tales
of the kind, as I have it at second hand from the lips of Dolph
Heyliger himself. He never related it till towards the latter
part of his life, and then in great confidence (for he was very
discreet), to a few of his particular cronies at his own table,
over a supernumerary bowl of punch; and strange as the
hobgoblin
parts of the story may seem, there never was a single
doubt expressed on the subject by any of his guests. It may
not be amiss, before concluding, to observe that, in addition to
his other accomplishments, Dolph Heyliger was noted for being
the ablest drawer of the long-bow in the whole province.
RIP VAN WINKLE.
By Woden, God of Saxons,
From whence comes Wensday, that is Wodensday.
Truth is a thing that ever I will keep
Unto thylke day in which I creep into
My sepulchre
Cartwright
.
Whoever
has made a voyage up the Hudson must remember
the Kaatskill mountains. They are a dismembered branch of
the great Appalachian family, and are seen away to the west
of the river, swelling up to a noble height, and lording it over
the surrounding country. Every change of season, every
change of weather, indeed every hour of the day, produces
some change in the magical hues and shapes of these mountains,
and they are regarded by all the good wives, far and near, as
perfect barometers. When the weather is fair and settled,
they are clothed in blue and purple, and print their bold
outlines on the clear evening sky; but sometimes, when the
rest of the landscape is cloudless, they will gather a hood of
grey vapors about their summits, which, in the last rays of the
setting sun, will glow and light up like a crown of glory.
At the foot of these fairy mountains, the voyager may have
descried the light smoke curling up from a village, whose
shingle-roofs gleam among the trees, just where the blue tints
of the upland melt away into the fresh green of the nearer
landscape. It is a little village of great antiquity, having been
founded by some of the Dutch colonists in the early times of
the province, just about the beginning of the government of the
good Peter Stuyvesant (may he rest in peace!), and there were
some of the houses of the original settlers standing within a
few years, built of small yellow bricks brought from Holland,
having latticed windows and gable fronts, surmounted with
weathercocks.
In that same village, and in one of these very houses
(which, to tell the precise truth, was sadly time-worn and
weather-beaten), there lived many years since, while the
country was yet a province of Great Britain, a simple,
good-natured
fellow, of the name of Rip Van Winkle. He was a
descendant of the Van Winkles who figured so gallantly in the
chivalrous days of Peter Stuyvesant, and accompanied him to
the siege of Fort Christina. He inherited, however, but little
of the martial character of his ancestors. I have observed that
he was a simple, good-natured man; he was, moreover, a kind
neighbor, and an obedient, hen-pecked husband. Indeed, to
the latter circumstance might be owing that meekness of spirit
which gained him such universal popularity; for those men are
most apt to be obsequious and conciliating abroad, who are
under the discipline of shrews at home. Their tempers,
doubtless, are rendered pliant and malleable in the fiery furnace
of domestic tribulation, and a curtain lecture is worth all the
sermons in the world for teaching the virtues of patience and
long-suffering. A termagant wife may, therefore, in some
respects, be considered a tolerable blessing; and if so, Rip Van
Winkle was thrice blessed.
Certain it is, that he was a great favorite among all the good
wives of the village, who, as usual with the amiable sex, took
his part in all family squabbles; and never failed, whenever
they talked those matters over in their evening gossipings, to
lay all the blame on Dame Van Winkle. The children of the
village, too, would shout with joy whenever he approached.
He assisted at their sports, made their playthings, taught them
to fly kites and shoot marbles, and told them long stories of
ghosts, witches, and Indians. Whenever he went dodging
about the village, he was surrounded by a troop of them,
hanging
on his skirts, clambering on his back, and playing a thousand
tricks on him with impunity; and not a dog would bark at him
throughout the neighborhood.
The great error in Rip's composition was an insuperable
aversion to all kinds of profitable labor. It could not be from
the want of assiduity or perseverance; for he would sit on a
wet rock, with a rod as long and heavy as a Tartar's lance,
and fish all day without a murmur, even though he should not
be encouraged by a single nibble. He would carry a
fowling-piece
on his shoulder for hours together, trudging through
woods and swamps, and up hill and down dale, to shoot a few
squirrels or wild pigeons. He would never refuse to assist a
neighbor even in the roughest toil, and was a foremost man at
all country frolics for husking Indian corn, or building
stone-fences
;
the women of the village, too, used to employ him to
run their errands, and to do such little odd jobs as their less
obliging husbands would not do for them. In a word Rip was
ready to attend to anybody's business but his own; but as to
doing family duty, and keeping his farm in order, he found it
impossible.
In fact, he declared it was of no use to work on his farm; it
was the most pestilent little piece of ground in the whole
country; everything about it went wrong, and would go
wrong, in spite of him. His fences were continually falling to
pieces; his cow would either go astray, or get among the
cabbages
;
weeds were sure to grow quicker in his fields than
anywhere
else; the rain always made a point of setting in just as
he had some out-door work to do; so that though his
patrimonial
estate had dwindled away under his management, acre by
acre, until there was little more left than a mere patch of Indian
corn and potatoes, yet it was the worst conditioned farm in the
neighborhood.
His children, too, were as ragged and wild as if they
belonged
to nobody. His son Rip, an urchin begotten in his own
likeness, promised to inherit the habits, with the old clothes of
his father. He was generally seen trooping like a colt at his
mother's heels, equipped in a pair of his father's cast-off
galligaskins
,
which he had much ado to hold up with one hand, as a fine
lady does her train in bad weather.
7
Rip Van Winkle, however, was one of those happy mortals,
of foolish, well-oiled dispositions, who take the world easy, eat
white bread or brown, whichever can be got with least thought
or trouble, and would rather starve on a penny than work for
a pound. If left to himself, he would have whistled life away
in perfect contentment; but his wife kept continually dinning
in his ears about his idleness, his carelessness, and the ruin he
was bringing on his family. Morning, noon, and night, her
tongue was incessantly going, and everything he said or did
was sure to produce a torrent of household eloquence. Rip
had but one way of replying to all lectures of the kind, and
that, by frequent use, had grown into a habit. He shrugged his
shoulders, shook his head, cast up his eyes, but said nothing.
This, however, always provoked a fresh volley from his wife;
so that he was fain to draw off his forces, and take to the
outside
of the housethe only side which, in truth, belongs to a
hen-pecked husband.
Rip's sole domestic adherent was his dog Wolf, who was as
much hen-pecked as his master; for dame Van Winkle
regarded
them as companions in idleness, and even looked upon
Wolf with an evil eye, as the cause of his master's going so
often astray. True it is, in all points of spirit befitting an
honorable dog, he was as courageous an animal as ever scoured
the woodsbut what courage can withstand the ever-during
and all-besetting terrors of a woman's tongue? The moment
Wolf entered the house his crest fell, his tail drooped to the
ground or curled between his legs, he sneaked about with a
gallows air, casting many a sidelong glance at Dame Van
Winkle, and at the least flourish of a broomstick or ladle, he
would fly to the door with yelping precipitation.
Times grew worse and worse with Rip Van Winkle as years
of matrimony rolled on; a tart temper never mellows with age,
and a sharp tongue is the only edged tool that grows keener
with constant use. For a long while he used to console
himself
,
when driven from home, by frequenting a kind of perpetual
club of the sages, philosophers, and other idle personages of the
village; which held its sessions on a bench before a small inn,
designated by a rubicund portrait of His Majesty George the
Third. Here they used to sit in the shade through a long lazy
summer's day, talking listlessly over village gossip, or telling
endless sleepy stories about nothing. But it would have been
worth any statesman's money to have heard the profound
discussions
that sometimes took place, when by chance an old
newspaper fell into their hands from some passing traveller.
How solemnly they would listen to the contents, as drawled
out by Derrick Van Bummel, the schoolmaster, a dapper learned
little man, who was not to be daunted by the most gigantic
word in the dictionary; and how sagely they would deliberate
upon public events some months after they had taken place.
The opinions of this junto were completely controlled by
Nicholas Vedder, a patriarch of the village, and landlord of the
inn, at the door of which he took his seat from morning till
night, just moving sufficiently to avoid the sun and keep in the
shade of a large tree; so that the neighbors could tell the hour
by his movements as accurately as by a sun-dial. It is true he
was rarely heard to speak, but smoked his pipe incessantly.
His adherents, however (for every great man has his adherents),
perfectly understood him, and knew how to gather his opinions.
When anything that was read or related displeased him, he
was observed to smoke his pipe vehemently, and to send forth
short, frequent, and angry puffs; but when pleased, he would
inhale the smoke slowly and tranquilly, and emit it in light and
placid clouds; and sometimes, taking the pipe from his mouth,
and letting the fragrant vapor curl about his nose, would gravely
nod his head in token of perfect approbation.
From even this stronghold the unlucky Rip was at length
routed by his termagant wife, who would suddenly break in
upon the tranquillity of the assemblage and call the members
all to naught; nor was that august personage, Nicholas Vedder
himself, sacred from the daring tongue of this terrible virago,
who charged him outright with encouraging her husband in
habits of idleness.
Poor Rip was at last reduced almost to despair; and his only
alternative, to escape from the labor of the farm and clamor of his
wife, was to take gun in hand and stroll away into the woods.
Here he would sometimes seat himself at the foot of a tree, and
share the contents of his wallet with Wolf, with whom he
sympathized as a fellow-sufferer in persecution. Poor Wolf,
he would say, thy mistress leads thee a dog's life of it; but
never mind, my lad, whilst I live thou shalt never want a friend
to stand by thee! Wolf would wag his tail, look wistfully in
his master's face, and if dogs can feel pity, I verily believe he
reciprocated the sentiment with all his heart.
In a long ramble of the kind on a fine autumnal day, Rip
had unconsciously scrambled to one of the highest parts of the
Kaatskill mountains. He was after his favorite sport of
squirrel
shooting, and the still solitudes had echoed and re-echoed
with the reports of his gun. Panting and fatigued, he threw
himself, late in the afternoon, on a green knoll, covered with
mountain herbage, that crowned the brow of a precipice. From
an opening between the trees he could overlook all the lower
country for many a mile of rich woodland. He saw at a
distance
the lordly Hudson, far, far below him, moving on its
silent but majestic course, with the reflection of a purple
cloud, or the sail of a lagging bark, here and there sleeping
on its glassy bosom, and at last losing itself in the blue
highlands.
On the other side he looked down into a deep mountain glen,
wild, lonely, and shagged, the bottom filled with fragments
from the impending cliffs, and scarcely lighted by the reflected
rays of the setting sun. For some time Rip lay musing on
this scene; evening was gradually advancing; the mountains
began to throw their long blue shadows over the valleys; he
saw that it would be dark long before he could reach the
village
,
and he heaved a heavy sigh when he thought of
encountering
the terrors of Dame Van Winkle.
As he was about to descend, he heard a voice from a
distance
,
hallooing, Rip Van Winkle! Rip Van Winkle! He
looked round, but could see nothing but a crow winging its
solitary flight across the mountain. He thought his fancy
must have deceived him, and turned again to descend, when he
heard the same cry ring through the still evening air; Rip
Van Winkle! Rip Van Winkle!at the same time Wolf
bristled up his back, and, giving a low growl, skulked to his
master's side, looking fearfully down into the glen. Rip now
felt a vague apprehension stealing over him; he looked
anxiously in the same direction, and perceived a strange figure
slowly toiling up the rocks, and bending under the weight of
something he carried on his back. He was surprised to see any
human being in this lonely and unfrequented place, but
supposing
it to be some one of the neighborhood in need of his
assistance, he hastened down to yield it.
On nearer approach he was still more surprised at the
singularity
of the stranger's appearance. He was a short square
built old fellow, with thick bushy hair, and a grizzled beard.
His dress was of the antique Dutch fashiona cloth jerkin
strapped round the waistseveral pair of breeches, the outer
one of ample volume, decorated with rows of buttons down
the sides, and bunches at the knees. He bore on his shoulder
a stout keg, that seemed full of liquor, and made signs for Rip
to approach and assist him with the load. Though rather shy
and distrustful of this new acquaintance, Rip complied with his
usual alacrity, and mutually relieving each other, they
clambered
up a narrow gully, apparently the dry bed of a mountain
torrent. As they ascended, Rip every now and then heard
long rolling peals, like distant thunder, that seemed to issue out
of a deep ravine, or rather cleft, between lofty rocks, towards
which their rugged path conducted. He paused for an instant,
but supposing it to be the muttering of one of those transient
thunder-showers which often take place in mountain heights,
he proceeded. Passing through the ravine, they came to a
hollow, like a small amphitheatre, surrounded by perpendicular
precipices, over the brinks of which impending trees shot their
branches, so that you only caught glimpses of the azure sky
and the bright evening cloud. During the whole time Rip and
his companion had labored on in silence, for though the former
marvelled greatly what could be the object of carrying a keg
of liquor up this wild mountain, yet there was something
strange and incomprehensible about the unknown, that inspired
awe and checked familiarity.
On entering the amphitheatre, new objects of wonder
presented
themselves. On a level spot in the centre was a
company
of odd-looking personages playing at ninepins. They
were dressed in a quaint outlandish fashion; some wore short
doublets, others jerkins, with long knives in their belts, and
most of them had enormous breeches, of similar style with
that of the guide's. Their visages, too, were peculiar; one
had a large head, broad face, and small piggish eyes; the face
of another seemed to consist entirely of nose, and was
surmounted
by a white sugar-loaf hat, set off with a little red
cock's tail. They all had beards, of various shapes and
colors. There was one who seemed to be the commander.
He was a stout old gentleman, with a weather-beaten
countenance
;
he wore a laced doublet, broad belt and hanger, high
crowned hat and feather, red stockings, and high-heeled shoes,
with roses in them. The whole group reminded Rip of the
figures in an old Flemish painting, in the parlor of Dominie
Van Shaick, the village parson, and which had been brought
over from Holland at the time of the settlement.
What seemed particularly odd to Rip was, that though
these folks were evidently amusing themselves, yet they
maintained
the gravest faces, the most mysterious silence, and were,
withal, the most melancholy party of pleasure he had ever
witnessed. Nothing interrupted the stillness of the scene but
the noise of the balls, which, whenever they were rolled,
echoed along the mountains like rumbling peals of thunder.
As Rip and his companion approached them, they
suddenly
desisted from their play, and gazed at him with such fixed
statue-like gaze, and such strange, uncouth, lack-lustre
countenances
,
that his heart turned within him, and his knees smote
together. His companion now emptied the contents of the keg
into large flagons, and made signs to him to wait upon the
company. He obeyed with fear and trembling; they quaffed
the liquor in profound silence, and then returned to their
game.
By degrees Rip's awe and apprehension subsided. He even
ventured, when no eye was fixed upon him, to taste the beverage,
which he found had much of the flavor of excellent Hollands.
He was naturally a thirsty soul, and was soon tempted to
repeat
the draught. One taste provoked another, and he
reiterated
his visits to the flagon so often that at length his senses
were overpowed, his eyes swam in his head, his head gradually
declined, and he fell into a deep sleep.
On waking, he found himself on the green knoll whence he
had first seen the old man of the glen. He rubbed his eyes
it was a bright sunny morning. The birds were hopping and
twittering among the bushes, and the eagle was wheeling aloft,
and breasting the pure mountain breeze. Surely, thought
Rip, I have not slept here all night. He recalled the
occurrences
before he fell asleep. The strange man with a keg
of liquorthe mountain ravinethe wild retreat among the
rocksthe wo-begone party at ninepinsthe flagonOh!
that flagon! that wicked flagon! thought Ripwhat excuse
shall I make to Dame Van Winkle?
He looked round for his gun, but in place of the clean
well-oiled
fowling-piece, he found an old firelock lying by him, the
barrel incrusted with rust, the lock falling off, and the stock
worm-eaten. He now suspected that the grave roisterers of the
mountain had put a trick upon him, and, having dosed him
with liquor, had robbed him of his gun. Wolf, too, had
disappeared, but he might have strayed away after a squirrel or
partridge. He whistled after him and shouted his name, but all
in vain; the echoes repeated his whistle and shout, but no dog
was to be seen.
He determined to revisit the scene of the last evening's
gambol, and if he met with any of the party, to demand his
dog and gun. As he rose to walk, he found himself stiff in the
joints, and wanting in his usual activity. These mountain
beds do not agree with me, thought Rip, and if this frolic
should lay me up with a fit of the rheumatism, I shall have a
blessed time with Dame Van Winkle. With some difficulty
he got down into the glen: he found the gully up which he and
his companion had ascended the preceding evening; but to his
astonishment a mountain stream was now foaming down it,
leaping from rock to rock, and filling the glen with babbling
murmurs. He, however, made shift to scramble up its sides,
working his toilsome way through thickets of birch, sassafras,
and witch-hazel, and sometimes tripped up or entangled by the
wild grapevines that twisted their coils or tendrils from tree to
tree, and spread a kind of net-work in his path.
At length he reached to where the ravine had opened
through the cliffs to the amphitheatre; but no traces of such
opening remained. The rocks presented a high impenetrable
wall, over which the torrent came tumbling in a sheet of
feathery foam, and fell into a broad deep basin, black from the
shadows of the surrounding forest. Here, then, poor Rip was
brought to a stand. He again called and whistled after his
dog; he was only answered by the cawing of a flock of idle
crows, sporting high in air about a dry tree that overhung a
sunny precipice; and who, secure in their elevation, seemed to
look down and scoff at the poor man's perplexities. What
was to be done? the morning was passing away, and Rip felt
famished for want of his breakfast. He grieved to give up his
dog and gun; he dreaded to meet his wife; but it would not do
to starve among the mountains. He shook his head,
shouldered
the rusty firelock, and, with a heart full of trouble and
anxiety, turned his steps homeward.
As he approached the village he met a number of people, but
none whom he knew, which somewhat surprised him, for he
had thought himself acquainted with every one in the country
round. Their dress, too, was of a different fashion from that
to which he was accustomed. They all stared at him with
equal marks of surprise, and whenever they cast their eyes upon
him, invariably stroked their chins. The constant recurrence
of this gesture induced Rip, involuntarily, to do the same,
when, to his astonishment, he found his beard had grown a foot
long!
He had now entered the skirts of the village. A troop of
strange children ran at his heels, hooting after him, and
pointing
at his grey beard. The dogs, too, not one of which he
recognised for an old acquaintance, barked at him as he passed.
The very village was altered; it was larger and more populous.
There were rows of houses which he had never seen before,
and those which had been his familiar haunts had disappeared.
Strange names were over the doorsstrange faces at the
windowseverything was strange. His mind now misgave
him; he began to doubt whether both he and the world around
him were not bewitched. Surely this was his native village,
which he had left but the day before. There stood the
Kaatskill
mountainsthere ran the silver Hudson at a distance
there was every hill and dale precisely as it had always been
Rip was sorely perplexedThat flagon last night, thought
he, has addled my poor head sadly!
It was with some difficulty that he found his way to his own
house, which he approached with silent awe, expecting every
moment to hear the shrill voice of Dame Van Winkle. He
found the house gone to decaythe roof fallen in, the
windows
shattered, and the doors off the hinges. A half-starved
dog that looked like Wolf was skulking about it. Rip called
him by name, but the cur snarled, showed his teeth, and passed
on. This was an unkind cut indeedMy very dog, sighed
poor Rip, has forgotten me!
He entered the house, which, to tell the truth, Dame Van
Winkle had always kept in neat order. It was empty, forlorn,
and apparently abandoned. This desolateness overcame all his
connubial fearshe called loudly for his wife and children
the lonely chambers rang for a moment with his voice, and
then all again was silence.
He now hurried forth, and hastened to his old resort, the
village innbut it too was gone. A large rickety wooden
building stood in its place, with great gaping windows, some
of them broken and mended with old hats and petticoats, and
over the door was painted, The Union Hotel, by Jonathan
Doolittle. Instead of the great tree that used to shelter the
quiet little Dutch inn of yore, there now was reared a tall
naked pole, with something on the top that looked like a red
night-cap, and from it was fluttering a flag, on which was a
singular assemblage of stars and stripesall this was strange
and incomprehensible. He recognised on the sign, however,
the ruby face of King George, under which he had smoked so
many a peaceful pipe; but even this was singularly
metamorphosed
.
The red coat was changed for one of blue and buff,
a sword was held in the hand instead of a sceptre, the head
was decorated with a cocked hat, and underneath was painted
in large characters,
General Washington
.
There was, as usual, a crowd of folk about the door, but
none that Rip recollected. The very character of the people
seemed changed. There was a busy, bustling, disputatious tone
about it, instead of the accustomed phlegm and drowsy
tranquillity
.
He looked in vain for the sage Nicholas Vedder, with
his broad face, double chin, and fair long pipe, uttering clouds
of tobacco-smoke instead of idle speeches, or Van Bummel,
the schoolmaster, doling forth the contents of an ancient
newspaper
.
In place of these, a lean, bilious-looking fellow, with
his pockets full of handbills, was haranguing vehemently
about rights of citizenselectionsmembers of congress
libertyBunker's Hillheroes of seventy-sixand other
words, which were a perfect Babylonish jargon to the
bewildered
Van Winkle.
The appearance of Rip, with his long grizzled beard, his
rusty fowling-piece, his uncouth dress, and an army of women
and children at his heels, soon attracted the attention of the
tavern politicians. They crowded round him, eyeing him from
head to foot with great curiosity. The orator bustled up to
him, and, drawing him partly aside, inquired on which side
he voted? Rip stared in vacant stupidity. Another short
but busy little fellow pulled him by the arm, and, rising on
tiptoe
,
inquired in his ear, Whether he was Federal or
Democrat
?
Rip was equally at a loss to comprehend the question,
when a knowing, self-important old gentleman, in a sharp
cocked hat, made his way through the crowd, putting them to
right and left with his elbows as he passed, aud planting
himself
before Van Winkle, with one arm a-kimbo, the other
resting on his cane, his keen eyes and sharp hat penetrating, as
it were, into his very soul, demanded in an austere tone,
what brought him to the election with a gun on his shoulder,
and a mob at his heels, and whether he meant to breed a riot
in the village? Alas! gentlemen, cried Rip, somewhat
dismayed, I am a poor, quiet man, a native of the place, and
a loyal subject of the king, God bless him!
Here a general shout burst from the bystandersA tory!
a tory! a spy! a refugee! hustle him! away with him! It
was with great difficulty that the self-important man in the
cocked hat restored order; and, having assumed a tenfold
austerity of brow, demanded again of the unknown culprit,
what he came there for, and whom he was seeking? The
poor man humbly assured him that he meant no harm, but
merely came there in search of some of his neighbors, who
used to keep about the tavern.
Wellwho are they?name them.
Rip bethought himself a moment, and inquired, Where's
Nicholas Vedder?
There was a silence for a little while, when an old man
replied, in a thin piping voice, Nicholas Vedder! why, he is
dead and gone these eighteen years! There was a wooden
tombstone in the church-yard that used to tell all about him,
but that's rotten and gone too.
Where's Brom Dutcher?
Oh, he went off to the army in the beginning of the war;
some say he was killed at the storming of Stony Pointothers
say he was drowned in a squall at the foot of Antony's Nose.
I don't knowhe never came back again.
Where's Van Bummel, the schoolmaster?
He went off to the wars too, was a great militia general,
and is now in congress.
Rip's heart died away at hearing of these sad changes in his
home and friends, and finding himself thus alone in the world.
Every answer puzzled him too, by treating of such enormous
lapses of time, and of matters which he could not understand;
warcongressStony Point;he had no courage to ask after
any more friends, but cried out in despair, Does nobody here
know Rip Van Winkle?
Oh, Rip Van Winkle! exclaimed two or three, Oh, to
be sure! that's Rip Van Winkle yonder, leaning against the
tree.
Rip looked, and beheld a precise counterpart of himself, as
he went up the mountain: apparently as lazy, and certainly as
ragged. The poor fellow was now completely confounded.
He doubted his own identity, and whether he was himself or
another man. In the midst of his bewilderment, the man in
the cocked hat demanded who he was, and what was his
name?
God knows, exclaimed he, at his wits' end; I'm not
myselfI'm somebody elsethat's me yonderno that's
somebody else got into my shoesI was myself last night, but
I fell asleep on the mountain, and they've changed my gun,
and everything's changed, and I'm changed, and I can't tell
what's my name, or who I am!
The bystanders began now to look at each other, nod, wink
significantly, and tap their fingers against their foreheads.
There was a whisper, also, about securing the gun, and keeping
the old fellow from doing mischief, at the very suggestion of
which the self-important man in the cocked hat retired with
some precipitation. At this critical moment a fresh comely
woman pressed through the throng to get a peep at the
greybearded
man. She had a chubby child in her arms, which,
frightened at his looks, began to cry. Hush, Rip, cried she,
hush, you little fool; the old man won't hurt you. The
name of the child, the air of the mother, the tone of her voice,
all awakened a train of recollections in his mind. What is
your name, my good woman? asked he.
Judith Gardenier.
And your father's name?
Ah, poor man, Rip Van Winkle was his name, but it's
twenty years since he went away from home with his gun, and
never has been heard of sincehis dog came home without
him, but whether he shot himself, or was carried away by the
Indians, nobody can tell. I was then but a little girl.
Rip had but one question more to ask; but he put it with a
faltering voice:
Where's your mother?
Oh, she too had died but a short time since; she broke a
blood-vessel in a fit of passion at a New England pedler.
There was a drop of comfort, at least, in this intelligence.
The honest man could contain himself no longer. He caught
his daughter and her child in his arms. I am your father!
cried heYoung Rip Van Winkle onceold Rip Van
Winkle
now!Does nobody know poor Rip Van Winkle?
All stood amazed, until an old woman, tottering out from
among the crowd, put her hand to her brow, and peering under
it in his face for a moment, exclaimed, Sure enough! it is
Rip Van Winkleit is himself! Welcome home again,
old neighborWhy, where have you been these twenty long
years?
Rip's story was soon told, for the whole twenty years had
been to him but as one night. The neighbors stared when
they heard it; some were seen to wink at each other, and put
their tongues in their cheeks: and the self-important man in
the cocked hat, who, when the alarm was over, had returned
to the field, screwed down the corners of his mouth, and shook
his headupon which there was a general shaking throughout
the assemblage.
It was determined, however, to take the opinion of old Peter
Vanderdonk, who was seen slowly advancing up the road.
He was a descendant of the historian of that name, who wrote
one of the earliest accounts of the province. Peter was the
most ancient inhabitant of the village, and well versed in all
the wonderful events and traditions of the neighborhood. He
recollected Rip at once, and corroborated his story in the most
satisfactory manner. He assured the company that it was a
fact, handed down from his ancestor the historian, that the
Kaatskill mountains had always been haunted by strange
beings. That it was affirmed that the great Hendrick Hudson,
the first discoverer of the river and country, kept a kind of vigil
there every twenty years, with his crew of the Half-Moon;
being permitted in this way to revisit the scenes of his enterprise,
and keep a guardian eye upon the river, and the great city
called by his name. That his father had once seen them in
their old Dutch dresses playing at ninepins in a hollow of the
mountain; and that he himself had heard, one summer
afternoon
,
the sound of their balls, like distant peals of thunder.
To make a long story short, the company broke up, and
returned
to the more important concerns of the election. Rip's
daughter took him home to live with her; she had a snug,
well-furnished
house, and a stout cheery farmer for a husband, whom
Rip recollected for one of the urchins that used to climb upon
his back. As to Rip's son and heir, who was the ditto of
himself
,
seen leaning against the tree, he was employed to work on
the farm; but evinced an hereditary disposition to attend to
anything else but his business.
Rip now resumed his old walks and habits; he soon found
many of his former cronies, though all rather the worse for the
wear and tear of time; and preferred making friends among the
rising generation, with whom he soon grew into great favor.
Having nothing to do at home, and being arrived at that
happy age when a man can be idle with impunity, he took his
place once more on the bench at the inn door, and was
reverenced
as one of the patriarchs of the village, and a chronicle
of the old times before the war. It was some time before
he could get into the regular track of gossip, or could be made
to comprehend the strange events that had taken place during
his torpor. How that there had been a revolutionary war
that the country had thrown off the yoke of old Englandand
that, instead of being a subject of his Majesty George the Third,
he was now a free citizen of the United States. Rip, in fact,
was no politician; the changes of states and empires made but
little impression on him; but there was one species of despotism
under which he had long groaned, and that waspetticoat
government. Happily that was at an end; he had got his neck
out of the yoke of matrimony, and could go in and out
whenever
he pleased, without dreading the tyranny of Dame Van
Winkle. Whenever her name was mentioned, however, he
shook his head, shrugged his shoulders, and cast up his eyes;
which might pass either for an expression of resignation to his
fate, or joy at his deliverance.
He used to tell his story to every stranger that arrived at Mr.
Doolittle's hotel. He was observed, at first, to vary on some
points every time he told it, which was, doubtless, owing to his
having so recently awaked. It at last settled down precisely
to the tale I have related, and not a man, woman, or child in
the neighborhood, but knew it by heart. Some always
pretended
to doubt the reality of it, and insisted that Rip had been
out of his head, and that this was one point on which he always
remained flighty. The old Dutch inhabitants, however, almost
universally gave it full credit. Even to this day they never
hear a thunder-storm of a summer afternoon about the
Kaatskills
,
but they say Hendrick Hudson and his crew are at their
game of ninepins; and it is a common wish of all henpecked
husbands in the neighborhood, when life hangs heavy on their
hands, that they might have a quieting draught out of Rip Van
Winkle's flagon.
NOTE.
The foregoing Tale, one would suspect, had been suggested to Mr.
Knickerbocker by a little German superstition about the Emperor
Frederick
der Rothbart
, and the Khypphaser mountain; the subjoined
note, however, which he had appended to the tale, shows that it is an
absolute fact, narrated with his usual fidelity.
The story of Rip Van Winkle may seem incredible to many, but
nevertheless I give it my full belief, for I know the vicinity of our old
Dutch settlements to have been very subject to marvellous events and
appearances. Indeed, I have heard many stranger stories than this, in
the villages along the Hudson, all of which were too well authenticated
to admit of a doubt. I have even talked with Rip Van Winkle myself,
who, when last I saw him, was a very venerable old man, and so perfectly
rational and consistent on every other point, that I think no conscientious
person could refuse to take this into the bargain; nay, I have seen a
certificate on the subject taken before a country justice, and signed with
a cross, in the justice's own handwriting. The story, therefore, is
beyond
the possibility of doubt.
D. K.
POSTSCRIPT.
The following are travelling notes from a memorandum-book of Mr.
Knickerbocker:
The Kaatsberg or Catskill Mountains have always been a region full
of fable. The Indians considered them the abode of spirits, who
influenced
the weather, spreading sunshine or clouds over the landscape,
and sending good or bad hunting seasons. They were ruled by an old
squaw spirit, said to be their mother. She dwelt on the highest peak of
the Catskills, and had charge of the doors of day and night, to open and
shut them at the proper hour. She hung up the new moons in the
skies, and cut up the old ones into stars. In times of drought, if
properly
propitiated, she would spin light summer clouds out of cobwebs
and morning dew, and send them off from the crest of the mountain,
flake after flake, like flakes of carded cotton, to float in the air, until,
dissolved by the heat of the sun, they would fall in gentle showers,
causing the grass to spring, the fruits to ripen, and the corn to grow an
inch an hour. If displeased, however, she would brew up clouds black
as ink, sitting in the midst of them like a bottle-bellied spider in the
midst of its web, and when these clouds broke, woe betide the valleys.
In old times, say the Indian traditions, there was a kind of Maniton or
Spirit, who kept about the wildest recesses of the Catskill Mountains,
and took a mischievous pleasure in wreaking all kinds of evils and
vexations upon the red men. Sometimes he would assume the form of
a bear, a panther, or a deer, lead the bewildered hunter a weary chase
through tangled forests and among ragged rocks, and then spring off with
a loud ho! ho! leaving him aghast on the brink of a beetling precipice
or raging torrent.
The favorite abode of this Manitou is still shown. It is a great rock
or cliff on the loneliest part of the mountains, and, from the flowering
vines which clamber about it, and the wild flowers which abound in its
neighborhood, is known by the name of the Garden Rock. Near the foot
of it is a small lake, the haunt of the solitary bittern, with water snakes
basking in the sun on the leaves of the pond-lilies which lie on the
surface
.
This place was held in great awe by the Indians, insomuch that
the boldest hunter would not pursue his game within its precincts.
Once upon a time, however, a hunter who had lost his way, penetrated
to the garden rock, where he beheld a number of gourds placed in the
crotches of trees. One of these he seized and made off with it, but in
the hurry of his retreat, he let it fall among the rocks, when a great
stream gushed forth, which washed him away, and swept him down
precipices, where he was dashed to pieces, and the stream made its way
to the Hudson, and continues to flow to the present day, being the
identical
stream known by the name of the Kaaters-kill.
WOLFERT WEBBER, OR GOLDEN
DREAMS.
In
the year of grace one thousand seven hundred andblank
for I do not remember the precise date; however, it was
somewhere in the early part of the last century, there lived in
the ancient city of the Manhattoes a worthy burgher, Wolfert
Webber by name. He was descended from old Cobus Webber
of the Brille in Holland, one of the original settlers, famous for
introducing the cultivation of cabbages, and who came over to
the province during the protectorship of Oloffe Van Kortlandt,
otherwise called the Dreamer.
The field in which Cobus Webber first planted himself and
his cabbages had remained ever since in the family, who
continued
in the same line of husbandry, with that praiseworthy
perseverance for which our Dutch burghers are noted. The
whole family genius, during several generations, was devoted
to the study and development of this one noble vegetable; and
to this concentration of intellect may doubtless be ascribed the
prodigious renown to which the Webber cabbages attained.
The Webber dynasty continued in uninterrupted succession;
and never did a line give more unquestionable proofs of
legitimacy
.
The eldest son succeeded to the looks, as well as the
territory of his sire; and had the portraits of this line of tranquil
potentates been taken, they would have presented a row of
heads marvellously resembling in shape and magnitude the
vegetables over which they reigned.
The seat of government continued unchanged in the family
mansion:a Dutch-built house, with a front, or rather
gableend
of yellow brick, tapering to a point, with the customary
iron weathercock at the top. Everything about the building
bore the air of long-settled ease and security. Flights of
martins
peopled the little coops nailed against its walls, and
swallows
built their nests under the eaves; and every one knows
that these house-loving birds bring good luck to the dwelling
where they take up their abode. In a bright sunny morning in
early summer, it was delectable to hear their cheerful notes, as
they sported about in the pure sweet air, chirping forth, as it
were, the greatness and prosperity of the Webbers.
Thus quietly and comfortably did this excellent family
vegetate
under the shade of a mighty button-wood tree, which by
little and little grew so great as entirely to overshadow their
palace. The city gradually spread its suburbs round their
domain. Houses sprang up to interrupt their prospects. The
rural lanes in the vicinity began to grow into the bustle and
populousness of streets; in short, with all the habits of rustic
life, they began to find themselves the inhabitants of a city.
Still, however, they maintained their hereditary character and
hereditary possessions, with all the tenacity of petty German
princes in the midst of the empire. Wolfert was the last of the
line, and succeeded to the patriarchal bench at the door, under
the family tree, and swayed the sceptre of his fathers, a kind of
rural potentate in the midst of a metropolis.
To share the cares and sweets of sovereignty, he had taken
unto himself a helpmate, one of that excellent kind, called
stirring
women; that is to say, she was one of those notable little
housewives who are always busy when there is nothing to do.
Her activity, however, took one particular direction; her whole
life seemed devoted to intense knitting; whether at home or
abroad, walking or sitting, her needles were continually in
motion
,
and it is even affirmed that by her unwearied industry she
very nearly supplied her household with stockings throughout
the year. This worthy couple were blessed with one daughter,
who was brought up with great tenderness and care;
uncommon
pains had been taken with her education so that she could
stitch in every variety of way, make all kinds of pickles and
preserves, and mark her own name on a sampler. The
influence
of her taste was seen also in the family garden, where the
ornamental began to mingle with the useful; whole rows of
fiery marigolds and splendid hollyhocks bordered the cabbage
beds; and gigantic sunflowers lolled their broad jolly faces over
the fences, seeming to ogle most affectionately the passers-by.
Thus reigned and vegetated Wolfert Webber over his
paternal
acres, peacefully and contentedly. Not but that, like all
other sovereigns, he had his occasional cares and vexations.
The growth of his native city sometimes caused him
annoyance
.
His little territory gradually became hemmed in by
streets and houses, which intercepted air and sunshine. He
was now and then subjected to the irruptions of the border
population that infest the streets of a metropolis; who would
make midnight forays into his dominions, and carry off captive
whole platoons of his noblest subjects. Vagrant swine would
make a descent, too, now and then, when the gate was left
open, and lay all waste before them; and mischievous urchins
would decapitate the illustrious sunflowers, the glory of the
garden, as they lolled their heads so fondly over the walls.
Still all these were petty grievances, which might now and then
ruffle the surface of his mind, as a summer breeze will ruffle the
surface of a mill-pond; but they could not disturb the
deep-seated
quiet of his soul. He would but seize a trusty staff, that
stood behind the door, issue suddenly out, anoint the back of
the aggressor, whether pig or urchin, and then return within
doors, marvellously refreshed and tranquillized.
The chief cause of anxiety to honest Wolfert, however, was
the growing prosperity of the city. The expenses of living
doubled and trebled, but he could not double and treble the
magnitude of his cabbages; and the number of competitors
prevented
the increase of price; thus, therefore, while every one
around him grew richer, Wolfert grew poorer, and he could
not, for the life of him, perceive how the evil was to be
remedied
.
This growing care, which increased from day to day, had its
gradual effect upon our worthy burgher; insomuch, that it at
length implanted two or three wrinkles in his brow, things
unknown
before in the family of the Webbers; and it seemed to
pinch up the corners of his cocked hat into an expression of
anxiety, totally opposite to the tranquil, broad-brimmed,
low-crowned
beavers of his illustrious progenitors.
Perhaps even this would not have materially disturbed the
serenity of his mind, had he had only himself and his wife to
care for; but there was his daughter gradually growing to
maturity
;
and all the world knows that when daughters begin to
ripen no fruit nor flower requires so much looking after. I
have no talent at describing female charms, else fain would I
depict the progress of this little Dutch beauty. How her blue
eyes grew deeper and deeper, and her cherry lips redder and
redder; and how she ripened and ripened, and rounded and
rounded in the opening breath of sixteen summers, until, in her
seventeenth spring, she seemed ready to burst out of her bodice,
like a half blown rose-bud.
Ah, well-a-day! could I but show her as she was then,
tricked out on a Sunday morning, in the hereditary finery of
the old Dutch clothes-press, of which her mother had confided
to her the key. The wedding-dress of her grandmother,
modernized for use, with sundry ornaments, handed down as
heirlooms in the family. Her pale brown hair smoothed with
buttermilk in flat waving lines on each side of her fair
forehead
.
The chain of yellow virgin gold, that encircled her
neck; the little cross, that just rested at the entrance of a soft
valley of happiness, as if it would sanctify the place. The
but, pooh!it is not for an old man like me to be prosing
about female beauty; suffice it to say, Amy had attained her
seventeenth year. Long since had her sampler exhibited hearts
in couples desperately transfixed with arrows, and true lovers'
knots worked in deep-blue silk; and it was evident she began
to languish for some more interesting occupation than rearing
of sunflowers or pickling of cucumbers.
At this critical period of female existence, when the heart
within a damsel's bosom, like its emblem, the miniature which
hangs without, is apt to be engrossed by a single image, a new
visitor began to make his appearance under the roof of Wolfert
Webber. This was Dirk Waldron, the only son of a poor
widow, but who could boast of more fathers than any lad in
the province; for his mother had had four husbands, and this
only child, so that though born in her last wedlock, he might
fairly claim to be the tardy fruit of a long course of cultivation.
This son of four fathers united the merits and the vigor of all his
sires. If he had not a great family before him, he seemed
likely to have a great one after him; for you had only to look
at the fresh bucksome youth, to see that he was formed to be
the founder of a mighty race.
This youngster gradually became an intimate visitor of the
family. He talked little, but he sat long. He filled the
father's pipe when it was empty, gathered up the mother's
knitting-needle or ball of worsted when it fell to the ground;
stroked the sleek coat of the tortoise-shell cat, and replenished
the teapot for the daughter from the bright copper kettle that
sang before the fire. All these quiet little offices may seem of
trifling import; but when true love is translated into Low
Dutch, it is in this way that it eloquently expresses itself.
They were not lost upon the Webber family. The winning
youngster found marvellous favor in the eyes of the mother;
the tortoise-shell cat, albeit the most staid and demure of her
kind, gave indubitable signs of approbation of his visits; the
teakettle seemed to sing out a cheering note of welcome at his
approach; and if the sly glances of the daughter might be
rightly read, as she sat bridling and dimpling, and sewing by
her mother's side, she was not a whit behind Dame Webber, or
grimalkin, or the teakettle, in good will.
Wolfert alone saw nothing of what was going on.
Profoundly
wrapt up in meditation on the growth of the city and
his cabbages, he sat looking in the fire, and puffing his pipe in
silence. One night, however, as the gentle Amy, according to
custom, lighted her lover to the outer door, and he, according
to custom, took his parting salute, the smack resounded so
vigorously through the long, silent entry, as to startle even the
dull ear of Wolfert. He was slowly roused to a new source
of anxiety. It had never entered into his head that this mere
child, who, as it seemed, but the other day had been climbing
about his knees, and playing with dolls and baby-houses, could
all at once be thinking of lovers and matrimony. He rubbed
his eyes, examined into the fact, and really found that while he
had been dreaming of other matters, she had actually grown to
be a woman, and what was worse, had fallen in love. Here
arose new cares for Wolfert. He was a kind father, but he
was a prudent man. The young man was a lively, stirring
lad; but then he had neither money nor land. Wolfert's ideas
all ran in one channel; and he saw no alternative in case of a
marriage, but to portion off the young couple with a corner of
his cabbage garden, the whole of which was barely sufficient
for the support of his family.
Like a prudent father, therefore, he determined to nip this
passion in the bud, and forbade the youngster the house;
though sorely did it go against his fatherly heart, and many a
silent tear did it cause in the bright eye of his daughter. She
showed herself, however, a pattern of filial piety and obedience.
She never pouted and sulked; she never flew in the face of
parental authority; she never flew into a passion, nor fell into
hysterics, as many romantic, novel-read young ladies do. Not
she, indeed! She was none such heroical rebellious trumpery,
I'll warrant ye. On the contrary, she acquiesced like an
obedient daughter, shut the street door in her lover's face, and
if ever she did grant him an interview, it was either out of
the kitchen window, or over the garden fence.
Wolfert was deeply cogitating these matters in his mind, and
his brow wrinkled with unusual care, as he wended his way
one Saturday afternoon to a rural inn, about two miles from
the city. It was a favorite resort of the Dutch part of the
community, from being always held by a Dutch line of
landlords
,
and retaining an air and relish of the good old times.
It was a Dutch-built house, that had probably been a
country-seat
of some opulent burgher in the early times of the
settlement
.
It stood near a point of land called Corlear's Hook,
which stretches out into the Sound, and against which the tide,
at its flux and reflux, sets with extraordinary rapidity. The
venerable and somewhat crazy mansion was distinguished from
afar, by a grove of elms and sycamores, that seemed to wave a
hospitable invitation; while a few weeping-willows, with their
dank, drooping foliage, resembling fallen waters, gave an idea
of coolness, that rendered it an attractive spot, during the heats
of summer.
Here, therefore, as I said, resorted many of the old
inhabitants
of the Manhattoes, where, while some played at
shuffle-board, and quoits, and ninepins, others smoked a
deliberate
pipe, and talked over public affairs.
It was on a blustering autumnal afternoon that Wolfert made
his visit to the inn. The grove of elms and willows was
stripped
of its leaves, which whirled in rustling eddies about the
fields. The ninepin alley was deserted, for the premature
chilliness of the day had driven the company within doors.
As it was Saturday afternoon, the habitual club was in session,
composed principally of regular Dutch burghers, though
mingled
occasionally with persons of various character and
country
,
as is natural in a place of such motley population.
Beside the fireplace, in a huge, leather-bottomed arm-chair,
sat the dictator of this little world, the venerable Rem, or as it
was pronounced Ramm Rapelye. He was a man of Walloon
race, and illustrious for the antiquity of his line; his
great-grandmother
having been the first white child born in the
province
.
But he was still more illustrious for his wealth and
dignity; he had long filled the noble office of alderman, and
was a man to whom the governor himself took off his hat.
He had maintained possession of the leather-bottomed chair
from time immemorial, and had gradually waxed in bulk as he
sat in his seat of government, until in the course of years he
filled its whole magnitude. His word was decisive with his
subjects; for he was so rich a man, that he was never expected to
support any opinion by argument. The landlord waited on
him with peculiar officiousness; not that he paid better than
his neighbors, but then the coin of a rich man seems always to
be so much more acceptable. The landlord had ever a
pleasant word and a joke, to insinuate in the ear of the august
Ramm. It is true, Ramm never laughed, and, indeed, ever
maintained a mastiff-like gravity, and even surliness of aspect,
yet he now and then rewarded mine host with a token of
approbation
,
which though nothing more nor less than a kind of
grunt, still delighted the landlord more than a broad laugh
from a poorer man.
This will be a rough night for the money diggers, said
mine host, as a gust of wind howled round the house, and
rattled
at the windows.
What! are they at their works again? said an English
half-pay captain, with one eye, who was a very frequent
attendant
at the inn.
Aye, are they, said the landlord, and well may they be.
They've had luck of late. They say a great pot of money
has been dug up in the fields, just behind Stuyvesant's orchard.
Folks think it must have been buried there in old times, by
Peter Stuyvesant, the Dutch governor.
Fudge! said the one-eyed man of war, as he added a
small portion of water to a bottom of brandy.
Well, you may believe it, or not, as you please, said mine
host, somewhat nettled, but everybody knows that the old
governor buried a large deal of his money at the time of the
Dutch troubles, when the English redcoats seized on the
province
.
They say, too, the old gentleman walks, aye, and in
the very same dress that he wears in the picture that hangs up
in the family house.
Fudge! said the half-pay officer.
Fudge, if you please!But didn't Corney Van Zandt see
him at midnight, stalking about in the meadow with his wooden
leg, and a drawn sword in his hand, that flashed like fire? And
what can he be walking for, but because people have been
troubling the place where he buried his money in old times?
Here the landlord was interrupted by several guttural
sounds from Ramm Rapelye, betokening that he was laboring
with the unusual production of an idea. As he was too great
a man to be slighted by a prudent publican, mine host
respectfully
paused until he should deliver himself. The corpulent
frame of this mighty burgher now gave all the symptoms of a
volcanic mountain on the point of an eruption. First, there
was a certain heaving of the abdomen, not unlike an
earthquake
;
then was emitted a cloud of tobacco-smoke from that
crater, his mouth; then there was a kind of rattle in the throat,
as if the idea were working its way up through a region of
phlegm; then there were several disjointed members of a
sentence
thrown out, ending in a cough; at length his voice forced
its way in the slow, but absolute tone of a man who feels the
weight of his purse, if not of his ideas; every portion of his
speech being marked by a testy puff of tobacco-smoke.
Who talks of old Peter Stuyvesant's walking?puff
Have people no respect for persons?puffpuffPeter
Stuyvesant knew better what to do with his money than to bury
itpuffI know the Stuyvesant familypuffevery one of
thempuffnot a more respectable family in the province
puffold standardspuffwarm householderspuffnone of
your upstartspuffpuffpuff.Don't talk to me of Peter
Stuyvesant's walkingpuffpuffpuffpuff.
Here the redoubtable Ramm contracted his brow, clasped up
his mouth, till it wrinkled at each corner, and redoubled his
smoking, with such vehemence that the cloudy volumes soon
wreathed round his head, as the smoke envelopes the awful
summit of Mount Etna.
A general silence followed the sudden rebuke of this very
rich man. The subject, however, was too interesting to be
readily abandoned. The conversation soon broke forth again
from the lips of Peechy Prauw Van Hook, the chronicler of
the club, one of those prosing, narrative old men, who seem to
be troubled with an incontinence of words, as they grow old.
Peechy could, at any time, tell as many stories in an
evening
as his hearers could digest in a month. He now resumed
the conversation, by affirming that, to his knowledge, money
had at different times been digged up in various parts of the
island. The lucky persons who had discovered them had
always dreamt of them three times beforehand, and what was
worthy of remark, those treasures had never been found but by
some descendant of the good old Dutch families, which
clearly
proved that they had been buried by Dutchmen in the olden
time.
Fiddlestick with your Dutchmen! cried the half-pay
officer. The Dutch had nothing to do with them. They
were all buried by Kidd the pirate, and his crew.
Here a key-note was touched that roused the whole
company
.
The name of Captain Kidd was like a talisman in those
times, and was associated with a thousand marvellous stories.
The half-pay officer took the lead, and in his narrations
fathered upon Kidd all the plunderings and exploits of Morgan,
Blackbeard, and the whole list of bloody buccaneers.
The officer was a man of great weight among the peaceable
members of the club, by reason of his warlike character and
gunpowder tales. All his golden stories of Kidd, however,
and of the booty he had buried, were obstinately rivalled by
the tales of Peechy Prauw, who, rather than suffer his Dutch
progenitors to be eclipsed by a foreign freebooter, enriched
every field and shore in the neighborhood with the hidden
wealth of Peter Stuyvesant and his contemporaries.
Not a word of this conversation was lost upon Wolfert
Webber. He returned pensively home, full of magnificent
ideas. The soil of his native island seemed to be turned into
gold dust, and every field to teem with treasure. His head
almost
reeled at the thought how often he must have heedlessly
rambled over places where countless sums lay, scarcely
covered
by the turf beneath his feet. His mind was in an uproar
with this whirl of new ideas. As he came in sight of the
venerable mansion of his forefathers, and the little realm where
the Webbers had so long and so contentedly flourished, his gorge
rose at the narrowness of his destiny.
Unlucky Wolfert! exclaimed he; others can go to bed
and dream themselves into whole mines of wealth; they have
but to seize a spade in the morning, and turn up doubloons like
potatoes; but thou must dream of hardships, and rise to
povertymust dig thy field from year's end to year's end, and
yet raise nothing but cabbages!
Wolfert Webber went to bed with a heavy heart; and it was
long before the golden visions that disturbed his brain permitted
him to sink into repose. The same visions, however, extended
into his sleeping thoughts, and assumed a more definite form.
He dreamt that he had discovered an immense treasure in the
centre of his garden. At every stroke of the spade he laid bare
a golden ingot; diamond crosses sparkled out of the dust; bags
of money turned up their bellies, corpulent with pieces-of-eight,
or venerable doubloons; and chests, wedged close with
moidores
,
ducats, and pistareens, yawned before his ravished eyes,
and vomited forth their glittering contents.
Wolfert awoke a poorer man than ever. He had no heart
to go about his daily concerns, which appeared so paltry and
profitless; but sat all day long in the chimney-corner, picturing
to himself ingots and heaps of gold in the fire. The next night
his dream was repeated. He was again in his garden, digging,
and laying open stores of hidden wealth. There was
something
very singular in this repetition. He passed another day
of reverie, and though it was cleaning-day, and the house, as
usual in Dutch households, completely topsy-turvy, yet he sat
unmoved amidst the general uproar.
The third night he went to bed with a palpitating heart. He
put on his red night-cap wrong side outwards, for good-luck.
It was deep midnight before his anxious mind could settle itself
into sleep. Again the golden dream was repeated, and again
he saw his garden teeming with ingots and money bags.
Wolfert rose the next morning in complete bewilderment.
A dream three times repeated was never known to lie; and if
so, his fortune was made.
In his agitation he put on his waistcoat with the hind part
before, and this was a corroboration of good luck. He no
longer doubted that a huge store of money lay buried
somewhere
in his cabbage field, coyly waiting to be sought for; and
he repined at having so long been scratching about the surface
of the soil instead of digging to the centre.
He took his seat at the breakfast table full of these
speculations
;
asked his daughter to put a lump of gold into his tea,
and on handing his wife a plate of slap-jacks, begged her to
help herself to a doubloon.
His grand care now was how to secure this immense
treasure
without its being known. Instead of working regularly in
his grounds in the daytime, he now stole from his bed at night,
and with spade and pickaxe, went to work to rip up and dig
about his paternal acres, from one end to the other. In a little
time the whole garden, which had presented such a goodly and
regular appearance, with its phalanx of cabbages, like a
vegetable
army in battle array, was reduced to a scene of
devastation
;
while the relentless Wolfert, with night-cap on head, and
lantern and spade in hand, stalked through the slaughtered
ranks, the destroying angel of his own vegetable world.
Every morning bore testimony to the ravages of the
preceding
night in cabbages of all ages and conditions, from the
tender
sprout to the full-grown head, piteously rooted from their
quiet beds like worthless weeds, and left to wither in the
sunshine
.
In vain Wolfert's wife remonstrated; in vain his darling
daughter wept over the destruction of some favorite marigold.
Thou shalt have gold of another guess sort, he would cry,
chucking her under the chin; thou shalt have a string of
crooked ducats for thy wedding necklace, my child. His
family began really to fear that the poor man's wits were
diseased
.
He muttered in his sleep at night about mines of
wealth, about pearls and diamonds and bars of gold. In the
daytime he was moody and abstracted, and walked about as if
in a trance. Dame Webber held frequent councils with all the
old women of the neighborhood; scarce an hour in the day but
a knot of them might be seen wagging their white caps together
round her door, while the poor woman made some piteous
recital
.
The daughter too was fain to seek for more frequent
consolation
from the stolen interviews of her favored swain Dick
Waldron. The delectable little Dutch songs with which she
used to dulcify the house grew less and less frequent, and she
would forget her sewing and look wistfully in her father's face,
as he sat pondering by the fireside. Wolfert caught her eye one
day fixed on him thus anxiously, and for a moment was roused
from his golden reveries.Cheer up, my girl, said he,
exultingly
,
why dost thou droop?thou shalt hold up thy head
one day with the Brinkerhoffs and the Schermerhorns, the Van
Hornes and the Van Dams.By Saint Nicholas, but the
patroon
himself shall be glad to get thee for his son!
Amy shook her head at this vainglorious boast, and was
more than ever in doubt of the soundness of the good man's
intellect.
In the meantime Wolfert went on digging and digging; but
the field was extensive, and as his dream had indicated no
precise spot, he had to dig at random. The winter set in
before one-tenth of the scene of promise had been explored.
The ground became frozen hard, and the nights too cold for
the labors of the spade.
No sooner, however, did the returning warmth of spring
loosen the soil, and the small frogs begin to pipe in the
meadows, but Wolfert resumed his labors with renovated zeal.
Still, however, the hours of industry were reversed.
Instead of working cheerily all day, planting and setting out
his vegetables, he remained thoughtfully idle, until the shades
of night summoned him to his secret labors. In this way he
continued to dig from night to night, and week to week, and
month to month, but not a stiver did he find. On the contrary,
the more he digged, the poorer he grew. The rich soil of his
garden was digged away, and the sand and gravel from
beneath were thrown to the surface, until the whole field
presented an aspect of sandy barrenness.
In the meantime the seasons gradually rolled on. The little
frogs which had piped in the meadows in early spring, croaked
as bull-frogs during the summer heats, and then sank into
silence. The peach-tree budded, blossomed, and bore its fruit.
The swallows and martins came, twittered about the roof, built
their nests, reared their young, held their congress along the
eaves, and then winged their flight in search of another spring.
The caterpillar spun its winding-sheet, dangled in it from the
great button-wood tree before the house; turned into a moth,
fluttered with the last sunshine of summer, and disappeared;
and finally the leaves of the button-wood tree turned yellow,
then brown, then rustled one by one to the ground, and
whirling about in little eddies of wind and dust, whispered that
winter was at hand.
Wolfert gradually woke from his dream of wealth as the
year declined. He had reared no crop for the supply of his
household during the sterility of winter. The season was long
and severe, and for the first time the family was really straitened
in its comforts. By degrees a revulsion of thought took place
in Wolfert's mind, common to those whose golden dreams
have been disturbed by pinching realities. The idea gradually
stole upon him that he should come to want. He already
considered himself one of the most unfortunate men in the
province, having lost such an incalculable amount of
undiscovered
treasure, and now, when thousands of pounds had
eluded his search, to be perplexed for shillings and pence was
cruel in the extreme.
Haggard care gathered about his brow; he went about with
a money-seeking air, his eyes bent downwards into the dust,
and carrying his hands in his pockets, as men are apt to do
when they have nothing else to put into them. He could not
even pass the city almshouse without giving it a rueful glance,
as if destined to be his future abode.
The strangeness of his conduct and of his looks occasioned
much speculation and remark. For a long time he was
suspected of being crazy, and then everybody pitied him; at
length it began to be suspected that he was poor, and then
everybody avoided him.
The rich old burghers of his acquaintance met him outside
of the door when he called, entertained him hospitably on the
threshold, pressed him warmly by the hand at parting, shook
their heads as he walked away, with the kind-hearted
expression
of poor Wolfert, and turned a corner nimbly, if by
chance they saw him approaching as they walked the streets.
Even the barber and the cobbler of the neighborhood, and a
tattered tailor in an alley hard by, three of the poorest and
merriest rogues in the world, eyed him with that abundant
sympathy
which usually attends a lack of means; and there is not
a doubt but their pockets would have been at his command,
only that they happened to be empty.
Thus everybody deserted the Webber mansion, as if poverty
were contagious, like the plague; everybody but honest Dirk
Waldron, who still kept up his stolen visits to the daughter,
and indeed seemed to wax more affectionate as the fortunes of
his mistress were in the wane.
Many months had elapsed since Wolfert had frequented his
old resort, the rural inn. He was taking a long lonely walk
one Saturday afternoon, musing over his wants and
disappointments
,
when his feet took instinctively their wonted direction,
and on awaking out of a reverie, he found himself before the
door of the inn. For some moments he hesitated whether to
enter, but his heart yearned for companionship; and where can
a ruined man find better companionship than at a tavern, where
there is neither sober example nor sober advice to put him out
of countenance?
Wolfert found several of the old frequenters of the inn at
their usual posts, and seated in their usual places; but one was
missing, the great Ramm Rapelye, who for many years had
filled the leather-bottomed chair of state. His place was
supplied
by a stranger, who seemed, however, completely at home
in the chair and the tavern. He was rather under size, but
deep chested, square, and muscular. His broad shoulders,
double joints, and bow knees, gave tokens of prodigious
strength. His face was dark and weather-beaten; a deep scar,
as if from the slash of a cutlass, had almost divided his nose,
and made a gash in his upper lip, through which his teeth shone
like a bull dog's. A mop of iron-grey hair gave a grizzly finish
to his hard-favored visage. His dress was of an amphibious
character. He wore an old hat edged with tarnished lace, and
cocked in martial style, on one side of his head; a rusty blue
military coat with brass buttons, and a wide pair of short
petticoat
trowsers, or rather breeches, for they were gathered up at
the knees. He ordered everybody about him with an
authoritative
air; talked in a brattling voice, that sounded like the
crackling of thorns under a pot; dd the landlord and
servants
with perfect impunity, and was waited upon with greater
obsequiousness than had ever been shown to the mighty Ramm
himself.
Wolfert's curiosity was awakened to know who and what
was the stranger who had thus usurped absolute sway in this
ancient domain. Peechy Prauw took him aside into a remote
corner of the hall, and there, in an under voice, and with great
caution, imparted to him all that he knew on the subject. The
inn had been aroused several months before, on a dark, stormy
night, by repeated long shouts, that seemed like the howlings
of a wolf. They came from the water-side; and at length
were distinguished to be hailing the house in a seafaring
manner
,
House-ahoy! The landlord turned out with his head
waiter, tapster, hostler, and errand-boythat is to say, with his
old negro Cuff. On approaching the place whence the voice
proceeded, they found this amphibious-looking personage at the
water's edge, quite alone, and seated on a great oaken sea
chest. How he came there, whether he had been set on shore
from some boat, or had floated to land on his chest, nobody
could tell, for he did not seem disposed to answer questions,
and there was something in his looks and manners that put a
stop to all questioning. Suffice it to say, he took possession
8*
of a corner room of the inn, to which his chest was removed
with great difficulty. Here he had remained ever since,
keeping
about the inn and its vicinity. Sometimes, it is true, he
disappeared, for one, two, or three days at a time, going and
returning without giving any notice or account of his
movements
.
He always appeared to have plenty of money, though
often of a very strange outlandish coinage, and he regularly
paid his bill every evening before turning in.
He had fitted up his room to his own fancy, having slung a
hammock from the ceiling instead of a bed, and decorated the
walls with rusty pistols and cutlasses of foreign workmanship.
A great part of his time was passed in this room, seated by the
window, which commanded a wide view of the Sound, a short
old-fashioned pipe in his mouth, a glass of rum toddy at his
elbow, and a pocket telescope in his hand, with which he
reconnoitred
every boat that moved upon the water. Large
square-rigged vessels seemed to excite but little attention, but
the moment he descried anything with a shoulder-of-mutton
sail, or that a barge, or yawl, or jolly-boat hove in sight, up
went the telescope, and he examined it with the most scrupulous
attention.
All this might have passed without much notice, for in those
times the province was so much the resort of adventurers of all
characters and climes, that any oddity in dress or behavior
attracted but small attention. In a little while, however, this
strange sea-monster, thus strangely cast upon dry land, began
to encroach upon the long-established customs and customers
of the place, and to interfere in a dictatorial manner in the
affairs of the ninepin alley and the bar-room, until, in the end,
he usurped an absolute command over the whole inn. It was
all in vain to attempt to withstand his authority. He was not
exactly quarrelsome, but boisterous and peremptory, like one
accustomed to tyrannize on a quarter-deck; and there was a
dare-devil air about everything he said and did, that inspired a
wariness in all bystanders. Even the half-pay officer, so long
the hero of the club, was soon silenced by him, and the quiet
burghers stared with wonder at seeing their inflammable man
of war so readily and quietly extinguished.
And then the tales that he would tell were enough to make
a peaceable man's hair stand on end. There was not a
seafight
,
nor marauding nor freebooting adventure that had
happened
within the last twenty years, but he seemed perfectly
versed in it. He delighted to talk of the exploits of the
buccaneers
in the West Indies and on the Spanish Main. How
his eyes would glisten as he described the waylaying of treasure
ships, the desperate fights, yard-arm and yard-armbroadside
and broadsidethe boarding and capturing of huge Spanish
galleons! With what chuckling relish would he describe the
descent upon some rich Spanish colony; the rifling of a church;
the sacking of a convent! You would have thought you heard
some gormandizer dilating upon the roasting of a savory goose
at Michaelmas as he described the roasting of some Spanish
Don to make him discover his treasurea detail given with a
minuteness that made every rich old burgher present turn
uncomfortably
in his chair. All this would be told with infinite glee, as
if he considered it an excellent joke; and then he would give
such a tyrannical leer in the face of his next neighbor, that the
poor man would be fain to laugh out of sheer faint-heartedness.
If any one, however, pretended to contradict him in any of his
stories he was on fire in an instant. His very cocked hat
assumed a momentary fierceness, and seemed to resent the
contradiction
.
How the devil should you know as well as I?
I tell you it was as I say; and he would at the same time let
slip a broadside of thundering oaths and tremendous sea-phrases,
such as had never been heard before within these peaceful walls.
Indeed, the worthy burghers began to surmise that he knew
more of those stories than mere hearsay. Day after day their
conjectures concerning him grew more and more wild and
fearful. The strangeness of his arrival, the strangeness of his
manners, the mystery that surrounded him, all made him
something
incomprehensible in their eyes. He was a kind of
monster
of the deep to themhe was a mermanhe was a
behemoth
he
was a leviathanin short, they knew not what he
was.
The domineering spirit of this boisterous sea-urchin at length
grew quite intolerable. He was no respecter of persons; he
contradicted the richest burghers without hesitation; he took
possession of the sacred elbow-chair, which, time out of mind,
had been the seat of sovereignty of the illustrious Ramm
Rapelye. Nay, he even went so far in one of his rough jocular
moods, as to slap that mighty burgher on the back, drink his
toddy, and wink in his face, a thing scarcely to be believed.
From this time Ramm Rapelye appeared no more at the inn;
his example was followed by several of the most eminent
customers
,
who were too rich to tolerate being bullied out of their
opinions, or being obliged to laugh at another man's jokes. The
landlord was almost in despair; but he knew not how to get rid
of this sea-monster and his sea-chest, who seemed both to have
grown like fixtures, or excrescences, on his establishment.
Such was the account whispered cautiously in Wolfert's ear,
by the narrator, Peechy Prauw, as he held him by the button,
in a corner of the hall, casting a wary glance now and then
towards the door of the bar-room, lest he should be overheard
by the terrible hero of his tale.
Wolfert took his seat in a remote part of the room in silence;
impressed with profound awe of this unknown, so versed in
freebooting history. It was to him a wonderful instance of the
revolutions of mighty empires, to find the venerable Ramm
Rapelye thus ousted from the throne, and a rugged tarpauling
dictating from his elbow-chair, hectoring the patriarchs, and
filling this tranquil little realm with brawl and bravado.
The stranger was on this evening in a more than usually
communicative mood, and was narrating a number of
astounding
stories of plunderings and burnings on the high seas. He
dwelt upon them with a peculiar relish, heightening the
frightful
particulars in proportion to their effect on his peaceful
auditors
.
He gave a swaggering detail of the capture of a Spanish
merchantman. She was lying becalmed during a long
summer's
day, just off from an island which was one of the lurking
places of the pirates. They had reconnoitred her with their
spyglasses
from the shore, and ascertained her character and force.
At night a picked crew of daring fellows set off for her in a
whaleboat. They approached with muffled oars, as she lay
rocking idly with the undulations of the sea, and her sails
flapping
against the masts. They were close under her stern
before
the guard on deck was aware of their approach. The
alarm was given; the pirates threw hand-grenades on deck,
and sprang up the main chains sword in hand.
The crew flew to arms, but in great confusion; some were
shot down, others took refuge in the tops; others were driven
overboard and drowned, while others fought hand to hand from
the main-deck to the quarter-deck, disputing gallantly every
inch of ground. There were three Spanish gentlemen on
board with their ladies, who made the most desperate resistance.
They defended the companion-way, cut down several of their
assailants, and fought like very devils, for they were maddened
by the shrieks of the ladies from the cabin. One of the Dons
was old, and soon dispatched. The other two kept their
ground vigorously, even though the captain of the pirates was
among the assailants. Just then there was a shout of victory
from the main-deck. The ship is ours! cried the pirates.
One of the Dons immediately dropped his sword and
surrendered
;
the other, who was a hot-headed youngster, and
just married, gave the captain a slash in the face that laid all
open. The captain just made out to articulate the words
no quarter.
And what did they do with their prisoners? said Peechy
Prauw, eagerly.
Threw them all overboard! was the answer. A dead
pause followed the reply. Peechy Prauw sank quietly back,
like a man who had unwarily stolen upon the lair of a
sleeping
lion. The honest burghers cast fearful glances at the deep
scar slashed across the visage of the stranger, and moved their
chairs a little further off. The seaman, however, smoked on
without moving a muscle, as though he either did not perceive
or did not regard the unfavorable effect he had produced upon
his hearers.
The half-pay officer was the first to break the silence, for he
was continually tempted to make ineffectual head against this
tyrant of the seas, and to regain his lost consequence in the
eyes of his ancient companions. He now tried to match the
gunpowder tales of the stranger by others equally tremendous.
Kidd, as usual, was his hero, concerning whom he seemed to
have picked up many of the floating traditions of the province.
The seaman had always evinced a settled pique against the
one-eyed
warrior. On this occasion he listened with peculiar
impatience
.
He sat with one arm a-kimbo, the other elbow on a
table, the hand holding on to the small pipe he was pettishly
puffing; his legs crossed, drumming with one foot on the
ground, and casting every now and then the side-glance of a
basilisk at the prosing captain. At length the latter spoke of
Kidd's having ascended the Hudson with some of his crew, to
land his plunder in secresy.
Kidd up the Hudson! burst forth the seaman, with a
tremendous
oathKidd never was up the Hudson.
I tell you he was, said the other. Aye, and they say he
buried a quantity of treasure on the little flat that runs out into
the river called the Devil's Dans Kammer.
The Devil's Dans Kammer in your teeth! cried the
seaman
.
I tell you Kidd never was up the Hudson. What a
plague do you know of Kidd and his haunts?
What do I know? echoed the half-pay officer. Why,
I was in London at the time of his trial; aye, and I had the
pleasure of seeing him hanged at Execution Dock.
Then, sir, let me tell you that you saw as pretty a fellow
hanged as ever trod shoe-leather. Aye, putting his face
nearer
to that of the officer, and there was many a land-lubber
looked on that might much better have swung in his stead.
The half-pay officer was silenced, but the indignation thus
pent up in his bosom glowed with intense vehemence in his
single
eye, which kindled like a coal.
Peechy Prauw, who never could remain silent, observed that
the gentleman certainly was in the right. Kidd never did bury
money up the Hudson, nor indeed in any of those parts, though
many affirmed such to be the fact. It was Bradish and others
of the buccaneers who had buried money; some said in
Turtle
Bay, others on Long Island, others in the neighborhood of
Hellgate. Indeed, added he, I recollect an adventure of Sam,
the negro fisherman, many years ago, which some think had
something to do with the buccaneers. As we are all friends
here, and as it will go no further, I'll tell it to you.
Upon a dark night many years ago, as Black Sam was
returning
from fishing in Hell-gate
Here the story was nipped in the bud by a sudden movement
from the unknown, who, laying his iron fist on the table,
knuckles downward, with a quiet force that indented the very
boards, and looking grimly over his shoulder, with the grin of
an angry bearHeark'ee, neighbor, said he, with significant
nodding of the head, you'd better let the buccaneers and
their money alonethey're not for old men and old women to
meddle with. They fought hard for their money; they gave
body and soul for it, and wherever it lies buried, depend upon
it he must have a tug with the devil who gets it!
This sudden explosion was succeeded by a blank silence
throughout the room. Peechy Prauw shrank within himself,
and even the one-eyed officer turned pale. Wolfert, who from
a dark corner of the room had listened with intense eagerness
to all this talk about buried treasure, looked with mingled awe
and reverence at this bold buccaneer, for such he really
suspected
him to be. There was a chinking of gold and a
sparkling
of jewels in all his stories about the Spanish Main, that
gave a value to every period, and Wolfert would have given
anything for the rummaging of the ponderous sea-chest, which
his imagination crammed full of golden chalices, crucifixes,
and jolly round bags of doubloons.
The dead stillness that had fallen upon the company was at
length interrupted by the stranger, who pulled out a prodigious
watch of curious and ancient workmanship, and which in
Wolfert's
eyes had a decidedly Spanish look. On touching a
spring it struck ten o'clock; upon which the sailor called for
his reckoning, and having paid it out of a handful of outlandish
coin, he drank off the remainder of his beverage, and without
taking leave of any one, rolled out of the room, muttering to
himself, as he stamped up stairs to his chamber.
It was some time before the company could recover from
the silence into which they had been thrown. The very
footsteps
of the stranger, which were heard now and then as he
traversed his chamber, inspired awe.
Still the conversation in which they had been engaged was
too interesting not to be resumed. A heavy thunder-gust had
gathered up unnoticed while they were lost in talk, and the
torrents of rain that fell forbade all thoughts of setting off for
home until the storm should subside. They drew nearer
together
,
therefore, and entreated the worthy Peechy Prauw to
continue the tale which had been so discourteously interrupted.
He readily complied, whispering, however, in a tone scarcely
above his breath, and drowned occasionally by the rolling of
the thunder, and he would pause every now and then, and
listen
with evident awe, as he heard the heavy footsteps of the
stranger pacing overhead.
The following is the purport of his story.
THE
ADVENTURE OF THE BLACK FISHERMAN
Everybody
knows Black Sam, the old negro fisherman, or,
as he is commonly called, Mud Sam, who has fished about the
Sound for the last half century. It is now many years since
Sam, who was then as active a young negro as any in the
province, and worked on the farm of Killian Suydam, on Long
Island, having finished his day's work at an early hour, was
fishing, one still summer evening, just about the neighborhood
of Hell-gate.
He was in a light skiff, and being well acquainted with the
currents and eddies, had shifted his station, according to the
shifting of the tide, from the Hen and Chickens to the Hog's
Back, from the Hog's Back to the Pot, and from the Pot to
the Frying Pan; but in the eagerness of his sport he did not
see that the tide was rapidly ebbing, until the roaring of the
whirlpools and eddies warned him of his danger; and he had
some difficulty in shooting his skiff from among the rocks and
breakers, and getting to the point of Blackwell's Island. Here
he cast anchor for some time, waiting the turn of the tide, to
enable him to return homewards. As the night set in, it grew
blustering and gusty. Dark clouds came bundling up in the
west, and now and then a growl of thunder or a flash of
lightning
told that a summer storm was at hand. Sam pulled over,
therefore, under the lee of Manhattan Island, and coasting
along, came to a snug nook, just under a steep beetling rock,
where he fastened his skiff to the root of a tree that shot out
from a cleft, and spread its broad branches like a canopy over
the water. The gust came scouring along; the wind threw
up the river in white surges; the rain rattled among the
leaves; the thunder bellowed worse than that which is now
bellowing; the lightning seemed to lick up the surges of the
stream; but Sam, snugly sheltered under rock and tree, lay
crouching in his skiff, rocking upon the billows until he fell
asleep. When he woke all was quiet. The gust had passed
away, and only now and then a faint gleam of lightning in the
east showed which way it had gone. The night was dark and
moonless, and from the state of the tide Sam concluded it was
near midnight. He was on the point of making loose his
skiff to return homewards, when he saw a light gleaming along
the water from a distance, which seemed rapidly approaching.
As it drew near he perceived it came from a lantern in the bow
of a boat gliding along under shadow of the land. It pulled
up in a small cove, close to where he was. A man jumped on
shore, and searching about with the lantern, exclaimed, This
is the placehere's the iron ring. The boat was then made
fast, and the man returning on board, assisted his comrades in
conveying something heavy on shore. As the light gleamed
among them, Sam saw that they were five stout desperate
looking
fellows, in red woollen caps, with a leader in a three-cornered
hat, and that some of them were armed with dirks, or long
knives, and pistols. They talked low to one another, and
occasionally
in some outlandish tongue which he could not
understand.
On landing they made their way among the bushes, taking
turns to relieve each other in lugging their burden up the rocky
bank. Sam's curiosity was now fully aroused; so, leaving his
skiff, he clambered silently up a ridge that overlooked their
path. They had stopped to rest for a moment, and the leader
was looking about among the bushes with his lantern. Have
you brought the spades? said one. They are here, replied
another, who had them on his shoulder. We must dig deep,
where there will be no risk of discovery, said a third.
A cold chill ran through Sam's veins. He fancied he saw
before him a gang of murderers, about to bury their victim.
His knees smote together. In his agitation he shook the branch
of a tree with which he was supporting himself as he looked
over the edge of the cliff.
What's that? cried one of the gang. Some one stirs
among the bushes!
The lantern was held up in the direction of the noise. One
of the red-caps cocked a pistol, and pointed it towards the very
place where Sam was standing. He stood motionless
breathless
;
expecting the next moment to be his last. Fortunately
his dingy complexion was in his favor, and made no glare
among the leaves.
'Tis no one, said the man with the lantern. What a
plague! you would not fire off your pistol and alarm the
country!
The pistol was uncocked; the burden was resumed, and the
party slowly toiled along the bank. Sam watched them as
they went; the light sending back fitful gleams through the
dripping bushes, and it was not till they were fairly out of sight
that he ventured to draw breath freely. He now thought of
getting back to his boat, and making his escape out of the
reach of such dangerous neighbors; but curiosity was
all-powerful
.
He hesitated and lingered and listened. By and by
he heard the strokes of spades. They are digging the grave!
said he to himself; and the cold sweat started upon his
forehead
.
Every stroke of a spade, as it sounded through the silent
groves, went to his heart; it was evident there was as little
noise made as possible; everything had an air of terrible
mystery
and secresy. Sam had a great relish for the horriblea
tale of murder was a treat for him; and he was a constant
attendant at executions. He could not resist an impulse, in
spite of every danger, to steal nearer to the scene of mystery,
and overlook the midnight fellows at their work. He crawled
along cautiously, therefore, inch by inch; stepping with the
utmost care among the dry leaves, lest their rustling should
betray him. He came at length to where a steep rock
intervened
between him and the gang; for he saw the light of their
lantern shining up against the branches of the trees on the other
side. Sam slowly and silently clambered up the surface of the
rock, and raising his head above its naked edge, beheld the
villains immediately below him, and so near, that though he
dreaded discovery, he dared not withdraw lest the least
movement
should be heard. In this way he remained, with his
round black face peering above the edge of the rock, like the
sun just emerging above the edge of the horizon, or the
round-cheeked
moon on the dial of a clock.
The red-caps had nearly finished their work; the grave was
filled up, and they were carefully replacing the turf. This
done, they scattered dry leaves over the place. And now,
said the leader, I defy the devil himself to find it out.
The murderers! exclaimed Sam, involuntarily.
The whole gang started, and looking up beheld the round
black head of Sam just above them; his white eyes strained
half out of their orbits; his white teeth chattering, and his whole
visage shining with cold perspiration.
We're discovered! cried one.
Down with him! cried another.
Sam heard the cocking of a pistol, but did not pause for the
report. He scrambled over rock and stone, through brush and
brier; rolled down banks like a hedgehog; scrambled up
others like a catamount. In every direction he heard some
one or other of the gang hemming him in. At length he
reached the rocky ridge along the river; one of the red-caps was
hard behind him. A steep rock like a wall rose directly in his
way; it seemed to cut off all retreat, when fortunately he espied
the strong cord-like branch of a grape-vine reaching half way
down it. He sprang at it with the force of a desperate man,
seized it with both hands, and being young and agile, succeeded
in swinging himself to the summit of the cliff. Here he stood
in full relief against the sky, when the red-cap cocked his pistol
and fired. The ball whistled by Sam's head. With the lucky
thought of a man in an emergency, he uttered a yell, fell to the
ground, and detached at the same time a fragment of the rock,
which tumbled with a loud splash into the river.
I've done his business, said the red-cap to one or two of
his comrades as they arrived panting. He'll tell no tales,
except
to the fishes in the river.
His pursuers now turned to meet their companions. Sam
sliding silently down the surface of the rock, let himself quietly
into his skiff, cast loose the fastening, and abandoned himself
to the rapid current, which in that place runs like a mill-stream,
and soon swept him off from the neighborhood. It was not,
however, until he had drifted a great distance that he ventured
to ply his oars; when he made his skiff dart like an arrow
through the strait of Hell-gate, never heeding the danger of Pot,
Frying-Pan, nor Hog's Back itself: nor did he feel himself
thoroughly secure until safely nestled in bed in the cockloft of
the ancient farm-house of the Suydams.
Here the worthy Peechy Prauw paused to take breath, and
to take a sip of the gossip tankard that stood at his elbow.
His auditors remained with open mouths and outstretched
necks, gaping like a nest of swallows for an additional
mouthful.
And is that all? exclaimed the half-pay officer.
That's all that belongs to the story, said Peechy Prauw.
And did Sam never find out what was buried by the
red-caps
?
said Wolfert eagerly, whose mind was haunted by
nothing but ingots and doubloons.
Not that I know of, said Peechy; he had no time to
spare from his work, and, to tell the truth, he did not like to
run the risk of another race among the rocks. Besides, how
should he recollect the spot where the grave had been digged?
everything would look so different by daylight. And then,
where was the use of looking for a dead body, when there was
no chance of hanging the murderers?
Aye, but are you sure it was a dead body they buried?
said Wolfert.
To be sure, cried Peechy Prauw, exultingly. Does it
not haunt in the neighborhood to this very day?
Haunt! exclaimed several of the party, opening their
eyes still wider, and edging their chairs still closer.
Aye, haunt, repeated Peechy; have none of you heard
of father Red-cap, who haunts the old burnt farm-house in the
woods, on the border of the Sound, near Hell-gate?
Oh, to be sure, I've heard tell of something of the kind, but
then I took it for some old wives' fable.
Old wives' fable or not, said Peechy Prauw, that
farm-house
stands hard by the very spot. It's been unoccupied time
out of mind, and stands in a lonely part of the coast; but
those who fish in the neighborhood have often heard strange
noises there; and lights have been seen about the wood at
night; and an old fellow in a red cap has been seen at the
windows more than once, which people take to be the ghost
of the body buried there. Once upon a time three soldiers
took shelter in the building for the night, and rummaged it from
top to bottom, when they found old father Red-cap astride of
a cider-barrel in the cellar, with a jug in one hand and a goblet
in the other. He offered them a drink out of his goblet, but
just as one of the soldiers was putting it to his mouthwhew!
a flash of fire blazed through the cellar, blinded every
mother's son of them for several minutes, and when they
recovered their eye-sight, jug, goblet, and Red-cap had
vanished
,
and nothing but the empty cider-barrel remained.
Here the half-pay officer, who was growing very muzzy and
sleepy, and nodding over his liquor with half-extinguished eye,
suddenly gleamed up like an expiring rushlight.
That's all fudge! said he, as Peechy finished his last
story.
Well, I don't vouch for the truth of it myself, said Peechy
Prauw, though all the world knows that there's something
strange about that house and grounds; but as to the story of
Mud Sam, I believe it just as well as if it had happened to
myself.
The deep interest taken in this conversation by the company
had made them unconscious of the uproar abroad among the
elements, when suddenly they were electrified by a tremendous
clap of thunder. A lumbering crash followed instantaneously,
shaking the building to its very foundation. All started from
their seats, imagining it the shock of an earthquake, or that old
father Red-cap was coming among them in all his terrors.
They listened for a moment, but only heard the rain pelting
against the windows, and the wind howling among the trees.
The explosion was soon explained by the apparition of an old
negro's bald head thrust in at the door, his white goggle eyes
contrasting with his jetty poll, which was wet with rain, and
shone like a bottle. In a jargon but half intelligible, he
announced that the kitchen chimney had been struck with
lightning.
A sullen pause of the storm, which now rose and sank in
gusts, produced a momentary stillness. In this interval the
report of a musket was heard, and a long shout, almost like a
yell, resounded from the shores. Every one crowded to the
window; another musket-shot was heard, and another long
shout, mingled wildly with a rising blast of wind. It seemed
as if the cry came up from the bosom of the waters; for though
incessant flashes of lightning spread a light about the shore,
no one was to be seen.
Suddenly the window of the room overhead was opened, and
a loud halloo uttered by the mysterious stranger. Several
hailings passed from one party to the other, but in a language
which none of the company in the bar-room could understand;
and presently they heard the window closed, and a great noise
overhead, as if all the furniture were pulled and hauled about
the room. The negro servant was summoned, and shortly
afterwards was seen assisting the veteran to lug the ponderous
sea-chest down stairs.
The landlord was in amazement. What, you are not going
on the water in such a storm?
Storm! said the other, scornfully, do you call such a
sputter of weather a storm?
You'll get drenched to the skinYou'll catch your
death! said Peechy Prauw, affectionately.
Thunder and lightning! exclaimed the merman, don't
preach about weather to a man that has cruised in whirlwinds
and tornadoes.
The obsequious Peechy was again struck dumb. The voice
from the water was heard once more in a tone of impatience;
the bystanders stared with redoubled awe at this man of storms,
who seemed to have come up out of the deep, and to be
summoned
back to it again. As, with the assistance of the negro,
he slowly bore his ponderous sea-chest towards the shore, they
eyed it with a superstitious feeling; half doubting whether he
were not really about to embark upon it and launch forth upon
the wild waves. They followed him at a distance with a
lantern.
Dowse the light! roared the hoarse voice from the water.
No one wants lights here!
Thunder and lightning! exclaimed the veteran, turning
short upon them; back to the house with you!
Wolfert and his companions shrank back in dismay. Still
their curiosity would not allow them entirely to withdraw. A
long sheet of lightning now flickered across the waves, and
discovered
a boat, filled with men, just under a rocky point, rising
and sinking with the heaving surges, and swashing the water at
every heave. It was with difficulty held to the rocks by a
boat-hook
,
for the current rushed furiously round the point. The
veteran hoisted one end of the lumbering sea-chest on the
gunwale of the boat, and seized the handle at the other end to
lift it in, when the motion propelled the boat from the shore;
the chest slipped off from the gunwale, and, sinking into the
waves, pulled the veteran headlong after it. A loud shriek
was uttered by all on shore, and a volley of execrations by
those on board; but boat and man were hurried away by the
rushing swiftness of the tide. A pitchy darkness succeeded;
Wolfert Webber indeed fancied that he distinguished a cry for
help, and that he beheld the drowning man beckoning for
assistance; but when the lightning again gleamed along the
water, all was void; neither man nor boat was to be seen;
nothing but the dashing and weltering of the waves as they
hurried past.
The company returned to the tavern to await the subsiding
of the storm. They resumed their seats, and gazed on each
other with dismay. The whole transaction had not occupied
five minutes, and not a dozen words had been spoken. When
they looked at the oaken chair, they could scarcely realize the
fact that the strange being who had so lately tenanted it, full
of life and Herculean vigor, should already be a corpse.
There was the very glass he had just drunk from; there lay the
ashes from the pipe which he had smoked, as it were, with his
last breath. As the worthy burghers pondered on these things,
they felt a terrible conviction of the uncertainty of existence,
and each felt as if the ground on which he stood was rendered
less stable by this awful example.
As, however, the most of the company were possessed of
that valuable philosophy which enables a man to bear up with
fortitude against the misfortunes of his neighbors, they soon
managed to console themselves for the tragic end of the veteran.
The landlord was particularly happy that the poor dear man
had paid his reckoning before he went; and made a kind of
farewell speech on the occasion.
He came, said he, in a storm, and he went in a storm;
he came in the night, and he went in the night; he came
nobody knows whence, and he has gone nobody knows where.
For aught I know he has gone to sea once more on his chest,
and may land to bother some other people on the other side of
the world! Though it's a thousand pities, added he, if he
has gone to Davy Jones's locker, that he had not left his own
locker behind him.
His locker! St. Nicholas preserve us! cried Peechy
Prauw. Pd not have had that sea-chest in the house for any
money; Pll warrant he'd come racketing after it at nights, and
making a haunted house of the inn. And, as to his going to
9
sea in his chest, I recollect what happened to Skipper
Onderdonk's
ship on his voyage from Amsterdam.
The boatswain died during a storm, so they wrapped him
up in a sheet, and put him in his own sea-chest, and threw him
overboard; but they neglected in their hurry-skurry to say
prayers over himand the storm raged and roared louder than
ever, and they saw the dead man seated in his chest, with his
shroud for a sail, coming hard after the ship; and the sea
breaking before him in great sprays like fire; and there they
kept scudding day after day, and night after night, expecting
every moment to go to wreck; and every night they saw the
dead boatswain in his sea-chest trying to get up with them,
and they heard his whistle above the blasts of wind, and he
seemed to send great seas mountain high after them, that
would have swamped the ship if they had not put up the
dead-lights
.
And so it went on till they lost sight of him in the
fogs off Newfoundland, and supposed he had veered ship and
stood for Dead Man's Isle. So much for burying a man at
sea without saying prayers over him.
The thunder-gust which had hitherto detained the company
was now at an end. The cuckoo clock in the hall tolled
midnight
;
every one pressed to depart, for seldom was such a late
hour of the night trespassed on by these quiet burghers. As
they sallied forth, they found the heavens once more serene.
The storm which had lately obscured them had rolled away,
and lay piled up in fleecy masses on the horizon, lighted up by
the bright crescent of the moon, which looked like a little silver
lamp hung up in a palace of clouds.
The dismal occurrence of the night, and the dismal
narrations
they had made, had left a superstitious feeling in every
mind. They cast a fearful glance at the spot where the
buccaneer
had disappeared, almost expecting to see him sailing on
his chest in the cool moonshine. The trembling rays glittered
along the waters, but all was placid, and the current dimpled
over the spot where he had gone down. The party huddled
together in a little crowd as they repaired homeward,
particularly
when they passed a lonely field where a man had been
murdered, and even the sexton, who had to complete his
journey
alone, though accustomed, one would think, to ghosts and
goblins, went a long way round, rather than pass by his own
church-yard.
Wolfert Webber had now carried home a fresh stock of
stories and notions to ruminate upon. These accounts of pots
of money and Spanish treasures, buried here and there and
everywhere, about the rocks and bays of these wild shores,
made him almost dizzy. Blessed St. Nicholas! ejaculated
he half aloud, is it not possible to come upon one of these
golden hoards, and to make one's self rich in a twinkling?
How hard that I must go on, delving and delving, day in and
day out, merely to make a morsel of bread, when one lucky
stroke of a spade might enable me to ride in my carriage for the
rest of my life?
As he turned over in his thoughts all that had been told of
the singular adventure of the negro fisherman, his imagination
gave a totally different complexion to the tale. He saw in the
gang of red-caps nothing but a crew of pirates burying their
spoils, and his cupidity was once more awakened by the
possibility
of at length getting on the traces of some of this
lurking
wealth. Indeed, his infected fancy tinged everything with
gold. He felt like the greedy inhabitant of Bagdad, when his
eyes had been greased with the magic ointment of the dervise,
that gave him to see all the treasures of the earth. Caskets
of buried jewels, chests of ingots, and barrels of outlandish
coins, seemed to court him from their concealments, and
supplicate
him to relieve them from their untimely graves.
On making private inquiries about the grounds said to be
haunted by Father Red-cap, he was more and more confirmed
in his surmise. He learned that the place had several times
been visited by experienced money-diggers, who had heard
black Sam's story, though none of them had met with success.
On the contrary, they had always been dogged with ill-luck
of some kind or other, in consequence, as Wolfert concluded,
of not going to work at the proper time, and with the proper
ceremonials. The last attempt had been made by Cobus
Quackenbos, who dug for a whole night, and met with
incredible
difficulty, for as fast as he threw one shovel full of earth
out of the hole, two were thrown in by invisible hands. He
succeeded so far, however, as to uncover an iron chest, when
there was a terrible roaring, ramping, and raging of uncouth
figures about the hole, and at length showers of blows, dealt
by invisible cudgels, fairly belabored him off of the forbidden
ground. This Cobus Quackenbos had declared on his
death-bed
,
so that there could not be any doubt of it. He was a
man that had devoted many years of his life to money-digging,
and it was thought would have ultimately succeeded, had he
not died recently of a brain fever in the alms-house.
Wolfert Webber was now in a worry of trepidation and
impatience
,
fearful lest some rival adventurer should get a scent
of the buried gold. He determined privately to seek out the
black fisherman, and get him to serve as guide to the place
where he had witnessed the mysterious scene of interment.
Sam was easily found, for he was one of those old habitual
beings that live about a neighborhood until they wear
themselves
a place in the public mind, and become, in a manner,
public characters. There was not an unlucky urchin about
town that did not know Sam the fisherman, and think that he
had a right to play his tricks upon the old negro. Sam had
led an amphibious life for more than half a century, about the
shores of the bay, and the fishing grounds of the Sound. He
passed the greater part of his time on and in the water,
particularly
about Hell-gate, and might have been taken, in bad
weather, for one of the hobgoblins that used to haunt that
strait. There would he be seen, at all times, and in all
weathers, sometimes in his skiff, anchored among the eddies,
or prowling like a shark about some wreck, where the fish
are supposed to be most abundant. Sometimes seated on a
rock from hour to hour, looking in the mist and drizzle like a
solitary heron, watching for its prey. He was well acquainted
with every hole and corner of the Sound, from the Wallabout
to Hell-gate, and from Hell-gate even unto the Devil's
Stepping-Stones
,
and it was even affirmed that he knew all the fish
in the river by their Christian names.
Wolfert found him at his cabin, which was not much larger
than a tolerable dog-house. It was rudely constructed of
fragments
of wrecks and drift-wood, and built on the rocky shore
at the foot of the old fort, just about what at present forms the
point of the Battery. A most ancient and fish-like smell
pervaded
the place. Oars, paddles, and fishing-rods were leaning
against the wall of the fort; a net was spread on the sands to
dry; a skiff was drawn up on the beach, and at the door of
his cabin was Mud Sam himself, indulging in the true negro
luxury of sleeping in the sunshine.
Many years had passed away since the time of Sam's
youthful
adventure, and the snows of many a winter had grizzled the
knotty wool upon his head. He perfectly recollected the
circumstances
,
however, for he had often been called upon to
relate
them, though in his version of the story he differed in
many points from Peechy Prauw, as is not unfrequently the
case with authentic historians. As to the subsequent researches
of money-diggers, Sam knew nothing about them; they were
matters quite out of his line, neither did the cautious Wolfert
care to disturb his thoughts on that point. His only wish was
to secure the old fisherman as a pilot to the spot, and this was
readily effected. The long time that had intervened since his
nocturnal adventure had effaced all Sam's awe of the place,
and the promise of a trifling reward roused him at once from
his sleep and his sunshine.
The tide was adverse to making the expedition by water,
and Wolfert was too impatient to get to the land of promise,
to wait for its turning; they set off, therefore, by land. A
walk of four or five miles brought them to the edge of a wood,
which, at that time, covered the greater part of the eastern side
of the island. It was just beyond the pleasant region of
Bloomen-dael. Here they struck into a long lane, straggling
among trees and bushes, very much overgrown with weeds and
mullen-stalks, as if but seldom used, and so completely
over-shadowed
as to enjoy but a kind of twilight. Wild vines
entangled
the trees, and flaunted in their faces; brambles and
briers caught their clothes as they passed; the garter-snake
glided across their path; the spotted toad hopped and waddled
before them, and the restless cat-bird mewed at them from
every thicket. Had Wolfert Webber been deeply read in
romantic
legend, he might have fancied himself entering upon
forbidden, enchanted ground, or that these were some of the
guardians set to keep watch upon buried treasure. As it was,
the loneliness of the place, and the wild stories connected with
it, had their effect upon his mind.
On reaching the lower end of the lane, they found
themselves
near the shore of the Sound in a kind of amphitheatre,
surrounded by forest trees. The area had once been a
grass-plot
,
but was now shagged with briers and rank weeds. At
one end, and just on the river bank, was a ruined building,
little
better than a heap of rubbish, with a stack of chimneys,
rising like a solitary tower out of the centre. The current of
the Sound rushed along just below it, with wildly grown trees
drooping their branches into its waves.
Wolfert had not a doubt that this was the haunted house of
Father Red-cap, and called to mind the story of Peechy Prauw.
The evening was approaching, and the light falling dubiously
among these woody places, gave a melancholy tone to the scene,
well calculated to foster any lurking feeling of awe or
superstition
.
The night-hawk, wheeling about in the highest regions
of the air, emitted his peevish, boding cry. The woodpecker
gave a lonely tap now and then on some hollow tree, and the
fire-bird
*
*
Orchard Oriole.
streamed by them with his deep-red plumage.
They now came to an inclosure that had once been a
garden
.
It extended along the foot of a rocky ridge, but was
little better than a wilderness of weeds, with here and there a
matted rose bush, or a peach or plum-tree grown wild and
ragged
,
and covered with moss. At the lower end of the garden
they passed a kind of vault in the side of a bank, facing the
water. It had the look of a root-house. The door, though
decayed, was still strong, and appeared to have been recently
patched up. Wolfert pushed it open. It gave a harsh grating
upon its hinges, and striking against something like a box, a
rattling sound ensued, and a skull rolled on the floor.
Wolfert
drew back shuddering, but was reassured on being
informed
by the negro that this was a family-vault, belonging to one
of the old Dutch families that owned this estate; an assertion
corroborated by the sight of coffins of various sizes piled within.
Sam had been familiar with all these scenes when a boy, and
now knew that he could not be far from the place of which
they were in quest.
They now made their way to the water's edge, scrambling
along ledges of rocks that overhung the waves, and obliged
often to hold by shrubs and grape-vines to avoid slipping into
the deep and hurried stream. At length they came to a small
cove, or rather indent of the shore. It was protected by steep
rocks, and overshadowed by a thick copse of oaks and
chestnuts
,
so as to be sheltered and almost concealed. The beach
shelved gradually within the cove, but the current swept deep
and black and rapid along its jutting points. The negro
paused
;
raised his remnant of a hat, and scratched his grizzled poll
for a moment, as he regarded this nook; then suddenly clapping
his hands, he stepped exultingly forward, and pointed to a large
iron ring, stapled firmly in the rock, just where a broad shelf of
stone furnished a commodious landing-place. It was the very
spot where the red-caps had landed. Years had changed the
more perishable features of the scene; but rock and iron yield
slowly to the influence of time. On looking more closely,
Wolfert remarked three crosses cut in the rock just above the
ring, which had no doubt some mysterious signification. Old
Sam now readily recognised the overhanging rock under which
his skiff had been sheltered during the thunder-gust. To follow
up the course which the midnight gang had taken, however,
was a harder task. His mind had been so much taken up on
that eventful occasion by the persons of the drama, as to pay
but little attention to the scenes; and these places look so
different by night and day. After wandering about for some
time, however, they came to an opening among the trees which
Sam thought resembled the place. There was a ledge of rock
of moderate height like a wall on one side, which he thought
might be the very ridge whence he had overlooked the diggers.
Wolfert examined it narrowly, and at length discovered three
crosses similar to those above the iron ring, cut deeply into the
face of the rock, but nearly obliterated by moss that had grown
over them. His heart leaped with joy, for he doubted not they
were the private marks of the buccaneers. All now that
remained
was to ascertain the precise spot where the treasure lay
buried; for otherwise he might dig at random in the
neighborhood
of the crosses, without coming upon the spoils, and he
had already had enough of such profitless labor. Here,
however
,
the old negro was perfectly at a loss, and indeed perplexed
him by a variety of opinions; for his recollections were all
confused
.
Sometimes he declared it must have been at the foot of
a mulberry-tree hard by; then beside a great white stone; then
under a small green knoll, a short distance from the ledge of
rocks; until at length Wolfert became as bewildered as himself.
The shadows of evening were now spreading themselves over
the woods, and rock and tree began to mingle together. It
was evidently too late to attempt anything further at present;
and, indeed, Wolfert had come unprovided with implements to
prosecute his researches. Satisfied, therefore, with having
ascertained
the place, he took note of all its landmarks, that he
might recognise it again, and set out on his return homewards,
resolved to prosecute this golden enterprise without delay.
The leading anxiety which had hitherto absorbed every
feeling
,
being now in some measure appeased, fancy began to
wander
,
and to conjure up a thousand shapes and chimeras as he
returned through this haunted region. Pirates hanging in
chains seemed to swing from every tree, and he almost
expected
to see some Spanish Don, with his throat cut from ear to
ear, rising slowly out of the ground, and shaking the ghost of a
money-bag.
Their way back lay through the desolate garden, and
Wolfert's
nerves had arrived at so sensitive a state that the flitting
of a bird, the rustling of a leaf, or the falling of a nut, was
enough to startle him. As they entered the confines of the
garden, they caught sight of a figure at a distance advancing
slowly up one of the walks, and bending under the weight of a
burden. They paused and regarded him attentively. He wore
what appeared to be a woollen cap, and still more alarming,
of a most sanguinary red.
The figure moved slowly on, ascended the bank, and stopped
at the very door of the sepulchral vault. Just before entering
it he looked around. What was the affright of Wolfert, when
he recognised the grizzly visage of the drowned buccaneer! He
uttered an ejaculation of horror. The figure slowly raised his
iron fist, and shook it with a terrible menace. Wolfert did not
pause to see any more, but hurried off as fast as his legs could
carry him, nor was Sam slow in following at his heels, having
all his ancient terrors revived. Away, then, did they scramble
through bush and brake, horribly frightened at every bramble
that tugged at their skirts, nor did they pause to breathe, until
they had blundered their way through this perilous wood, and
fairly reached the high road to the city.
Several days elapsed before Wolfert could summon courage
enough to prosecute the enterprise, so much had he been
dismayed
by the apparition, whether living or dead, of the grizzly
buccaneer. In the meantime, what a conflict of mind did he
suffer! He neglected all his concerns, was moody and restless
all day, lost his appetite, wandered in his thoughts and words,
and committed a thousand blunders. His rest was broken;
and when he fell asleep, the nightmare, in shape of a huge
money-bag, sat squatted upon his breast. He babbled about
incalculable sums; fancied himself engaged in money-digging;
9*
threw the bedclothes right and left, in the idea that he was
shovelling away the dirt; groped under the bed in quest of
the treasure, and lugged forth, as he supposed, an inestimable
pot of gold.
Dame Webber and her daughter were in despair at what
they conceived a returning touch of insanity. There are two
family oracles, one or other of which Dutch housewives
consult in all cases of great doubt and perplexitythe dominie
and the doctor. In the present instance they repaired to the
doctor. There was at that time a little dark mouldy man of
medicine, famous among the old wives of the Manhattoes for
his skill, not only in the healing art, but in all matters of
strange and mysterious nature. His name was Dr.
Knipperhausen
,
but he was more commonly known by the appellation
of the High German Doctor.
*
*
The same, no doubt, of whom mention is made in the history of
Dolph Heyliger.
To him did the poor women
repair for counsel and assistance touching the mental vagaries
of Wolfert Webber.
They found the doctor seated in his little study, clad in his
dark camlet robe of knowledge, with his black velvet cap;
after the manner of Boorhaave, Van Helmont, and other
medical sages; a pair of green spectacles set in black horn
upon his clubbed nose, and poring over a German folio that
reflected back the darkness of his physiognomy. The doctor
listened to their statement of the symptoms of Wolfert's malady
with profound attention; but when they came to mention his
raving about buried money, the little man pricked up his ears.
Alas, poor women! they little knew the aid they had called in.
Dr. Knipperhausen had been half his life engaged in seeking
the short cuts to fortune, in quest of which so many a long
lifetime is wasted. He had passed some years of his youth
among the Harz mountains of Germany, and had derived
much valuable instruction from the miners, touching the mode
of seeking treasure buried in the earth. He had prosecuted his
studies also under a travelling sage who united the mysteries
of medicine with magic and legerdemain. His mind therefore
had become stored with all kinds of mystic lore; he had
dabbled a little in astrology, alchemy, divination; knew how
to detect stolen money, and to tell where springs of water lay
hidden; in a word, by the dark nature of his knowledge he
had acquired the name of the High German Doctor, which is
pretty nearly equivalent to that of necromancer. The doctor
had often heard rumors of treasure being buried in various parts
of the island, and had long been anxious to get on the traces
of it. No sooner were Wolfert's waking and sleeping vagaries
confided to him, than he beheld in them the confirmed
symptoms
of a case of money-digging, and lost no time in probing
it to the bottom. Wolfert had long been sorely oppressed in
mind by the golden secret, and as a family physician is a kind
of father confessor, he was glad of any opportunity of
unburdening
himself. So far from curing, the doctor caught the
malady from his patient. The circumstances unfolded to him
awakened all his cupidity; he had not a doubt of money being
buried somewhere in the neighborhood of the mysterious
crosses, and offered to join Wolfert in the search. He informed
him that much secresy and caution must be observed in
enterprises
of the kind; that money is only to be digged for at night;
with certain forms and ceremonies; the burning of drugs; the
repeating of mystic words; and above all, that the seekers must
first be provided with a divining rod, which had the wonderful
property of pointing to the very spot on the surface of the
earth under which treasure lay hidden. As the doctor had
given much of his mind to these matters, he charged himself
with all the necessary preparations, and, as the quarter of the
moon was propitious, he undertook to have the divining rod
ready by a certain night.
*
*
The following note was found appended to this passage in the
handwriting
of Mr. Knickerbocker. There has been much written against
the divining rod by those light minds who are ever ready to scoff at the
mysteries of nature; but I fully join with Dr. Knipperhausen in giving
it my faith. I shall not insist upon its efficacy in discovering the
concealment
of stolen goods, the boundary stones of fields, the traces of
robbers and murderers, or even the existence of subterraneous springs
and streams of water: albeit, I think these properties not to be readily
discredited: but of its potency in discovering veins of precious metal,
and hidden sums of money and jewels, I have not the least doubt.
Some said that the rod turned only in the hands of persons who had
been born in particular months of the year; hence astrologers had
recourse
to planetary influence when they would procure a talisman.
Others declared that the properties of the rod were either an effect of
chance, or the fraud of the holder, or the work of the devil. Thus saith
the reverend father Gaspard Sebett in his Treatise on Magic: `Propter
hc et similia argumenta audacter ego promisero vim conversivam
virgul bifurcat nequaquam naturalem esse, sed vel casu vel fraude
virgulam tractantis vel ope diaboli,' &c.
Georgius Agricola also was of opinion that it was a mere delusion of
the devil to inveigle the avaricious and unwary into his clutches, and in
his treatise `de re Metallica,' lays particular stress on the mysterious
words pronounced by those persons who employed the divining rod
during his time. But I make not a doubt that the divining rod
is one of those secrets of natural magic, the mystery of which is to be
explained by the sympathies existing between physical things operated
upon by the planets, and rendered efficacious by the strong faith of the
individual. Let the divining rod be properly gathered at the proper time
of the moon, cut into the proper form, used with the necessary
ceremonies
,
and with a perfect faith in its efficacy, and I can confidently
recommend
it to my fellow-citizens as an infallible means of discovering
the various places on the Island of Manhattoes where treasure hath
been buried in the olden time. D. K.
Wolfert's heart leaped with joy at having met with so
learned and able a coadjutor. Everything went on secretly,
but swimmingly. The doctor had many consultations with
his patient, and the good woman of the household lauded the
comforting effects of his visits. In the meantime the wonderful
divining rod, that great key to nature's secrets, was duly
prepared
.
The doctor had thumbed over all his books of
knowledge
for the occasion; and the black fisherman was engaged
to take them in his skiff to the scene of enterprise; to work
with spade and pickaxe in unearthing the treasure; and to
freight his bark with the weighty spoils they were certain of
finding.
At length the appointed night arrived for this perilous
undertaking
.
Before Wolfert left his home he counselled his
wife and daughter to go to bed, and feel no alarm if he should
not return during the night. Like reasonable women, on being
told not to feel alarm, they fell immediately into a panic. They
saw at once by his manner that something unusual was in
agitation
;
all their fears about the unsettled state of his mind were
revived with tenfold force; they hung about him, entreating
him not to expose himself to the night air, but all in vain.
When once Wolfert was mounted on his hobby, it was no easy
matter to get him out of the saddle. It was a clear starlight
night, when he issued out of the portal of the Webber palace.
He wore a large flapped hat tied under the chin with a
handkerchief
of his daughter's, to secure him from the night damp,
while Dame Webber threw her long red cloak about his
shoulders
,
and fastened it round his neck.
The doctor had been no less carefully armed and accoutred
by his housekeeper, the vigilant Frau Ilsy, and sallied forth in
his camlet robe, by way of surcoat; his black velvet cap under
his cocked hat, a thick clasped book under his arm, a basket
of drugs and dried herbs in one hand, and in the other the
miraculous rod of divination.
The great church clock struck ten as Wolfert and the
doctor
passed by the churchyard, and the watchman bawled in
hoarse voice a long and doleful all's well! A deep sleep
had already fallen upon this primitive little burgh; nothing
disturbed this awful silence, excepting now and then the bark
of some profligate night walking dog, or the serenade of some
romantic cat. It is true, Wolfert fancied more than once that
he heard the sound of a stealthy footfall at a distance behind
them: but it might have been merely the echo of their own
steps along the quiet streets. He thought also at one time
that he saw a tall figure skulking after themstopping when
they stopped, and moving on as they proceeded; but the dim
and uncertain lamp-light threw such vague gleams and
shadows, that this might all have been mere fancy.
They found the old fisherman waiting for them, smoking his
pipe in the stern of his skiff, which was moored just in front of
his little cabin. A pickaxe and spade were lying in the
bottom
of the boat, with a dark lantern, and a stone bottle of
good Dutch courage, in which honest Sam no doubt put even
more faith than Dr. Knipperhausen in his drugs.
Thus then did these three worthies embark in their
cockleshell
of a skiff upon this nocturnal expedition, with a wisdom
and valor equalled only by the three wise men of Gotham, who
adventured to sea in a bowl. The tide was rising and running
rapidly up the Sound. The current bore them along, almost
without the aid of an oar. The profile of the town lay all in
shadow. Here and there a light feebly glimmered from some
sick chamber, or from a cabin window of some vessel at
anchor
in the stream. Not a cloud obscured the deep starry
firmament
,
the lights of which wavered on the surface of the
placid river; and a shooting meteor, streaking its pale course
in the very direction they were taking, was interpreted by the
doctor into a most propitious omen.
In a little while they glided by the point of Corlaer's Hook
with the rural inn which had been the scene of such night
adventures
.
The family had retired to rest, and the house was
dark and still. Wolfert felt a chill pass over him as they
passed
the point where the buccaneer had disappeared. He pointed
it out to Dr. Knipperhausen. While regarding it, they thought
they saw a boat actually lurking at the very place; but the
shore cast such a shadow over the border of the water that they
could discern nothing distinctly. They had not proceeded far
when they heard the low sounds of distant oars, as if cautiously
pulled. Sam plied his oars with redoubled vigor, and knowing
all the eddies and currents of the stream, soon left their
followers
,
if such they were, far astern. In a little while they
stretched
across Turtle bay and Kip's bay, then shrouded themselves
in the deep shadows of the Manhattan shore, and glided swiftly
along, secure from observation. At length the negro short his
skiff into a little cove, darkly embowered by trees, and made it
fast to the well-known iron ring. They now landed, and
lighting the lantern, gathered their various implements and
proceeded
slowly through the bushes. Every sound startled them,
even that of their own footsteps among the dry leaves; and the
hooting of a screech-owl, from the shattered chimney of the
neighboring ruin, made their blood run cold.
In spite of all Wolfert's caution in taking note of the
landmarks
,
it was some time before they could find the open place
among the trees, where the treasure was supposed to be buried.
At length they came to the ledge of rock; and on examining
its surface by the aid of the lantern, Wolfert recognised the
three mystic crosses. Their hearts beat quick, for the
momentous
trial was at hand that was to determine their hopes.
The lantern was now held by Wolfert Webber, while the
doctor produced the divining rod. It was a forked twig, one
end of which was grasped firmly in each hand, while the centre,
forming the stem, pointed perpendicularly upwards. The doctor
moved this wand about, within a certain distance of the earth,
from place to place, but for some time without any effect,
while Wolfert kept the light of the lantern turned full upon it,
and watched it with the most breathless interest. At length
the rod began slowly to turn. The doctor grasped it with
greater earnestness, his hands trembling with the agitation of
his mind. The wand continued to turn gradually, until at
length the stem had reversed its position, and pointed
perpendicularly
downwards, and remained pointing to one spot as
fixedly as the needle to the pole.
This is the spot! said the doctor, in an almost inaudible
tone.
Wolfert's heart was in his throat.
Shall I dig? said the negro, grasping the spade.
Pots tausends
, no! replied the little doctor, hastily. He
now ordered his companions to keep close by him, and to
maintain the most inflexible silence. That certain precautions
must be taken and ceremonies used to prevent the evil spirits
which kept about buried treasure from doing them any harm.
He then drew a circle about the place, enough to include the
whole party. He next gathered dry twigs and leaves and made
a fire, upon which he threw certain drugs and dried herbs which
he had brought in his basket. A thick smoke rose, diffusing a
potent odor, savoring marvellously of brimstone and asaftida,
which, however grateful it might be to the olfactory nerves of
spirits, nearly strangled poor Wolfert, and produced a fit of
coughing and wheezing that made the whole grove resound.
Doctor Knipperhausen then unclasped the volume which he
had brought under his arm, which was printed in red and black
characters in German text. While Wolfert held the lantern,
the doctor, by the aid of his spectacles, read off several forms
of conjuration in Latin and German. He then ordered Sam
to seize the pickaxe and proceed to work. The close-bound
soil gave obstinate signs of not having been distrubed for many
a year. After having picked his way through the surface, Sam
came to a bed of sand and gravel, which he threw briskly to
right and left with the spade.
Hark! said Wolfert, who fancied he heard a trampling
among the dry leaves, and rustling through the bushes. Sam
paused for a moment, and they listened. No footstep was
near. The bat flitted by them in silence; a bird, roused from
its roost by the light which glared up among the trees, flew
circling about the flame. In the profound stillness of the
woodland, they could distinguish the current rippling along
the rocky shore, and the distant murmuring and roaring of
Hell-gate.
The negro continued his labors, and had already digged a
considerable hole. The doctor stood on the edge, reading
formul every now and then from his black-letter volume, or
throwing more drugs and herbs upon the fire; while Wolfert
bent anxiously over the pit, watching every stroke of the spade.
Any one witnessing the scene thus lighted up by fire, lantern,
and the reflection of Wolfert's red mantle,might have mistaken
the little doctor for some foul magician busied in his
incantations
,
and the grizzly-headed negro for some swart goblin,
obedient to his commands.
At length the spade of the fisherman struck upon something
that sounded hollow. The sound vibrated to Wolfert's heart.
He struck his spade again.
'Tis a chest, said Sam.
Full of gold, Pll warrant it! cried Wolfert, clasping his
hands with rapture.
Scarcely had he uttered the words when a sound from above
caught his ear. He cast up his eyes, and lo! by the expiring
light of the fire he beheld, just over the disk of the rock, what
appeared to be the grim visage of the drowned buccaneer,
grinning hideously down upon him.
Wolfert gave a loud cry, and let fall the lantern. His panic
communicated itself to his companions. The negro leaped
out of the hole; the doctor dropped his book and basket, and
began to pray in German. All was horror and confusion.
The fire was scattered about, the lantern extinguished. In
their hurry-scurry they ran against and confounded one
another. They fancied a legion of hobgoblins let loose upon
them, and that they saw, by the fitful gleams of the scattered
embers, strange figures, in red caps, gibbering and ramping
around them. The doctor ran one way, the negro another,
and Wolfert made for the water side. As he plunged
struggling
onwards through brush and brake, he heard the tread of
some one in pursuit. He scrambled frantically forward. The
footsteps gained upon him. He felt himself grasped by his
cloak, when suddenly his pursuer was attacked in turn: a fierce
fight and struggle ensueda pistol was discharged that lit up
rock and bush for a second, and showed two figures grappling
togetherall was then darker than ever. The contest
continued
the
combatants clinched each other, and panted, and
groaned, and rolled among the rocks. There was snarling and
growling as of a cur, mingled with curses, in which Wolfert
fancied he could recognise the voice of the buccaneer. He
would fain have fled, but he was on the brink of a precipice,
and could go no further.
Again the parties were on their feet; again there was a
tngging
and struggling, as if strength alone could decide the
combat
,
until one was precipitated from the brow of the cliff, and
sent headlong into the deep stream that whirled below.
Wolfert
heard the plunge, and a kind of strangling, bubbling
murmur
,
but the darkness of the night hid everything from him,
and the swiftness of the current swept everything instantly out
of hearing. One of the combatants was disposed of, but
whether friend or foe, Wolfert could not tell, nor whether
they might not both be foes. He heard the survivor
approach, and his terror revived. He saw, where the profile
of the rocks rose against the horizon, a human form
advancing
.
He could not be mistaken; it must be the buccaneer.
Whither should he fly!a precipice was on one sidea
murderer
on the other. The enemy approachedhe was close at
hand. Wolfert attempted to let himself down the face of the
cliff. His cloak caught in a thorn that grew on the edge. He
was jerked from off his fect, and held dangling in the air,
half-choked
by the string with which his careful wife had fastened the
garment round his neck. Wolfert thought his last moment
was arrived; already had he committed his soul to St.
Nicholas
,
when the string broke, and he tumbled down the bank,
bumping from rock to rock, and bush to bush, and leaving the
red cloak fluttering like a bloody banner in the air.
It was a long while before Wolfert came to himself.
When he opened his eyes, the ruddy streaks of morning were
already shooting up the sky. He found himself grievously
battered, and lying in the bottom of a boat. He attempted to
sit up, but was too sore and stiff to move. A voice requested
him in friendly accents to lie still. He turned his eyes towards
the speaker; it was Dirk Waldron. He had dogged the
party
,
at the earnest request of Dame Webber and her daughter,
who, with the laudable curiosity of their sex, had pried into
the secret consultations of Wolfert and the doctor. Dirk had
been completely distanced in following the light skiff of the
fisherman, and had just come in time to rescue the poor
money-digger
from his pursuer.
Thus ended this perilous enterprise. The doctor and Black
Sam severally found their way back to the Manhattoes, each
having some dreadful tale of peril to relate. As to poor
Wolfert
,
instead of returning in triumph laden with bags of gold, he
was borne home on a shutter, followed by a rabble rout of
curious urchins. His wife and daughter saw the dismal pageant
from a distance, and alarmed the neighborhood with their
cries; they thought the poor man had suddenly settled the
great debt of nature in one of his wayward moods. Finding
him, however, still living, they had him speedily to bed, and a
jury of old matrons of the neighborhood assembled, to
determine
how he should be doctored. The whole town was in a
buzz with the story of the money-diggers. Many repaired to
the scene of the previous night's adventures; but though they
found the very place of the digging, they discovered nothing
that compensated them for their trouble. Some say they found
the fragments of an oaken chest, and an iron pot-lid, which
savored strongly of hidden money, and that in the old family vault
there were traces of bales and boxes, but this is all very dubious.
In fact, the secret of all this story has never to this day
been discovered; whether any treasure were ever actually
buried at that place; whether, if so, it were carried off at
night by those who had buried it; or whether it still remains
there under the guardianship of gnomes and spirits, until it
shall be properly sought for, is all matter of conjecture. For
my part, I incline to the latter opinion, and make no doubt
that great sums lie buried, both there and in other parts of this
island and its neighborhood, ever since the times of the
buccaneers
and the Dutch colonists, and I would earnestly
recommend
the search after them to such of my fellow citizens as are
not engaged in any other speculations.
There were many conjectures formed, also, as to who and
what was the strange man of the seas who had domineered
over the little fraternity at Corlaer's Hook for a time,
disappeared
so strangely, and reappeared so fearfully. Some
supposed
him a smuggler stationed at that place to assist his
comrades
in landing their goods among the rocky coves of the
island. Others that he was one of the ancient comrades of
Kidd of Bradish, returned to convey away treasures formerly
hidden in the vicinity. The only circumstance that throws
anything like a vague light on this mysterious matter, is a
report
which prevailed of a strange, foreign built shallop, with
much the look of a picaroon, having been seen hovering about
the Sound for several days, without landing or reporting
herself
,
though boats were seen going to and from her at night,
and that she was seen standing out of the mouth of the
harbor
in the grey of the dawn after the catastrophe of the
money-diggers
.
I must not omit to mention another report, also, which I
confess is rather apocryphal, of the buccaneer, who was
supposed
to have been drowned, being seen before daybreak, with
a lantern in his hand, seated astride of his great sea-chest, and
sailing through Hell-gate, which just then began to roar and
bellow with redoubled fury.
While all the gossip world was thus filled with talk and
rumor
,
poor Wolfert lay sick and sorrowful in his bed, bruised
in body, and sorely beaten down in mind. His wife and
daughter did all they could to bind up his wounds, both
corporal
and spiritual. The good old dame never stirred from his
bedside, where she sat knitting from morning till night, while
his daughter busied herself about him with the fondest care.
Nor did they lack assistance from abroad. Whatever may be
said of the desertion of friends in distress, they had no complaint
of the kind to make. Not an old wife of the neighborhood but
abandoned her work to crowd to the mansion of Wolfert
Webber, inquire after his health, and the particulars of his
story. Not one came moreover, without her little pipkin of
pennyroyal, sage, balm, or other herb tea, delighted at an
opportunity of signalizing her kindness and her doctorship.
What drenchings did not poor Wolfert undergo, and all in
vain! It was a moving sight to behold him wasting away day
by day, growing thinner and thinner, and ghastlier and
ghastlier
,
and staring with rueful visage from under an old
patchwork
counterpane, upon the jury of matrons kindly assembled
to sigh, and groan, and look unhappy around him.
Dirk Waldron was the only being that seemed to shed a ray
of sunshine into this house of morning. He came in with
cheery look and manly spirit, and tried to reanimate the
expiring
heart of the poor money-digger, but it was all in vain.
Wolfert was completely done over. If anything was wanting
to complete his despair, it was a notice served upon him in the
midst of his distress, that the corporation were about to run a
new street through the very centre of his cabbage garden. He
now saw nothing before him but poverty and ruin; his last
reliance
,
the garden of his forefathers, was to be laid waste, and
what then was to become of his poor wife and child?
His eyes filled with tears as they followed the dutiful Amy
out of the room one morning. Dirk Waldron was seated
beside him; Wolfert grasped his hand, pointed after his
daughter
,
and, for the first time since his illness, broke the silence he
had maintained.
I am going! said he, shaking his head feebly, and when
I am gonemy poor daughter
Leave her to me, father! said Dirk, manfullyI'll take
care of her!
Wolfert looked up in the face of the cheery, strapping
youngster, and saw there was none better able to take care of a
woman.
Enough, said heshe is yours!and now fetch me a
lawyerlet me make my will and die.
The lawyer was broughta dapper, bustling, round-headed
little man, Roorback (or Rollebuck as it was pronounced) by
name. At the sight of him the women broke into loud
lamentations, for they looked upon the signing of a will as the
signing of a death-warrant. Wolfert made a feeble motion for
them to be silent. Poor Amy buried her face and her grief in
the bed-curtain. Dame Webber resumed her knitting to hide
her distress, which betrayed itself, however, in a pellucid tear,
which trickled silently down, and hung at the end of her
peaked nose; while the cat, the only unconcerned member of
the family, played with the good dame's ball of worsted, as it
rolled about the floor.
Wolfert lay on his back, his night-cap drawn over his
forehead
;
his eyes closed; his whole visage the picture of death.
He begged the lawyer to be brief, for he felt his end
approaching
,
and that he had no time to lose. The lawyer nibbed his
pen, spread out his paper, and prepared to write.
I give and bequeathe, said Wolfert, faintly, my small
farm
Whatall! exclaimed the lawyer.
Wolfert half opened his eyes and looked upon the lawyer.
Yesall, said he.
What! all that great patch of land with eabbages and
sunflowers
,
which the corporation is just going to run a main street
through?
The same, said Wolfert, with a heavy sigh, and sinking
back upon his pillow.
I wish him joy that inherits it! said the little lawyer,
chuckling and rubbing his hands involuntarily.
What do you mean? said Wolfert, again opening his
eyes.
That he'll be one of the richest men in the place! cried
little Rollebuck.
The expiring Wolfert seemed to step back from the threshold
of existence; his eyes again lighted up; he raised himself in his
bed, shoved back his red worsted night-cap, and stared broadly
at the lawyer.
You don't say so! exclaimed he.
Faith, but I do! rejoined the other. Why, when that
great field and that huge meadow come to be laid out in streets,
and cut up into snug building lotswhy, whoever owns it need
not pull off his hat to the patroon!
Say you so? cried Wolfert, half thrusting one leg out of
bed, why, then I think I'll not make my will yet!
To the surprise of everybody the dying man actually
recovered
.
The vital spark, which had glimmered faintly in the
socket, received fresh fuel from the oil of gladness which the
little lawyer poured into his soul. It once more burnt up into
a flame.
Give physic to the heart, ye who would revive the body of a
spirit-broken man! In a few days Wolfert left his room; in a
few days more his table was covered with deeds, plans of streets,
and building lots. Little Rollebuck was constantly with him,
his right-hand man and adviser; and instead of making his
will, assisted in the more agreeable task of making his fortune.
In fact Wolfert Webber was one of those worthy Dutch
burghers of the Manhattoes whose fortunes have been made, in
a manner, in spite of themselves; who have tenaciously held
on to their hereditary acres, raising turnips and cabbages about
the skirts of the city, hardly able to make both ends meet,
until the corporation has cruelly driven streets through their
abodes, and they have suddenly awakened out of their lethargy,
and, to their astonishment, found themselves rich men.
Before many months had elapsed, a great bustling street
passed through the very centre of the Webber garden, just
where Wolfert had dreamed of finding a treasure. His golden
dream was accomplished; he did indeed find an unlooked-for
source of wealth; for, when his paternal lands were distributed
into building lots, and rented out to safe tenants, instead of
producing a paltry crop of cabbages, they returned him an
abundant crop of rents; insomuch that on quarter-day, it was
a goodly sight to see his tenants knocking at his door, from
morning till night, each with a little round-bellied bag of
money, a golden produce of the soil.
The ancient mansion of his forefathers was still kept up; but
instead of being a little yellow-fronted Dutch house in a garden,
it now stood boldly in the midst of a street, the grand house
of the neighborhood; for Wolfert enlarged it with a wing on
each side, and a cupola or tea-room on top, where he might
climb up and smoke his pipe in hot weather; and in the course
of time the whole mansion was overrun by the chubby-faced
progeny of Amy Webber and Dirk Waldron.
As Wolfert waxed old, and rich, and corpulent, he also set
up a great gingerbread-colored carriage, drawn by a pair of
black Flanders mares, with tails that swept the ground; and
to commemorate the origin of his greatness, he had for his
crest, a full-blown cabbage painted on the panels, with the
pithy motto Alles Ropf, that is to say, ALL HEAD; meaning
thereby that he had risen by sheer head-work.
To fill the measure of his greatness, in the fulness of time
the renowned Ramm Rapelye slept with his fathers, and
Wolfert Webber succeeded to the leather-bottomed arm-chair,
in the inn parlor at Corlaer's Hook; where he long reigned
greatly honored and respected, insomuch that he was never
known to tell a story without its being believed, nor to utter a
oke without its being laughed at.
THE END
.